(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
““[They] are a big influence on Donald and sometimes he takes other opinions into account and does something they disagree with,” the insider exclusively told Us.”
“So, he doesn’t get involved in all that.”An Ivanka source recently told Us Weekly that the former model and Kushner, 36, often go toe-to-toe with the commander in chief.”
“He is somebody who just likes to get things done.”
““At the end of the day, we are all focused on the work, and that’s very true for Jared.”
““There is a 24-hour news cycle that gets fed by and is encouraged by lots of salacious details,” Ivanka said.”
“During Monday’s interview, Ivanka also shut down reports that her husband, White House senior adviser Jared Kushner, was involved in palace intrigue.”
““We are really focused on why the American people elected Donald Trump as their president,” the fashion designer added.”
“(Trump abruptly fired Comey in May amid the FBI’s investigation into whether Russia interfered with the results of the 2016 U.S. presidential election.)”
““My father felt very vindicated in all the statements that he has been making and feels incredibly optimistic,” Ivanka said.”
“...testimony last week...”


"(they) have a great influence on Donald, sometimes he will consider other opinions and do something they don't agree with," the insider told us exclusively
A source from Ivanka recently told us weekly that the former model and 36 year old Kushner often confront the commander in chief
"He's the one who likes to get things done."
"At the end of the day, we're all focused on work, and so is Jared."
"It's a 24-hour news cycle and it's attracted and encouraged by a lot of obscene details," Ivanka said
"In Monday's interview, Ivanka also shut down reports that her husband, Jared Kushner, a senior White House adviser, was involved in the palace plot."
"What we really care about is why the American people elected Donald Trump president," the fashion designer added
"(trump fired Komi suddenly in May when the FBI investigated whether Russia intervened in the results of the 2016 US presidential election)"
"My father felt very right and optimistic in all the statements he made," Ivanka said
“… Last week's testimony



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured image by Jamie McCarthy/Getty Images for Yeezy Season 3]”
“ET.”
“The video starts with the line “No matter how far they go, they never go alone” while showing old home video clips of the famous family and Momager Kris Jenner flying a helicopter.”
“The slogan ‘Keep It Kardashian’ flashes on the screen as Kourtney is shown lounging near the swimming pool while a pool guy is checking her out.”
“Khloe displays her incredibly fit physique while working out in the gym.”
“Kendall runs off backstage just before she was set to strut the catwalk.”
“Kylie is pulled over and given a ticket before speeding off with her lavish orange Lamborghini.”
“Kirby Jenner, Kendall’s faux fraternal twin brother, is also featured on the video during the Jenner sister’s part.”
“Kirby became famous on Instagram for flawlessly Photoshopping himself onto Kendall’s photos.”
“The last part of the video shows the KarJenners being brought together on the set.”


"[Jamie McCarthy / Getty pictures are selected pictures of the third season of Yates]"
"Wait a minute."
The video begins with the line "no matter how far they go, they'll never be alone." it also shows a video clip of the famous family and mother Chris Jenner's helicopter home
"The slogan 'come on, Kardashian' flashed on the screen, showing a pool man lying lazily near the pool when he was checking Courtney."
"Khloe showed incredible fitness while working out in the gym."
"Kendall ran backstage, just before she was ready to take the catwalk."
"Kelly was stopped and given a ticket before speeding in her luxurious orange Lamborghini."
"Kendall's fake twin brother Kirby Jenner also appeared in the video played by Jenner's sister."
"Kirby is famous on instagram for perfectly copying his own photos onto Kendall's photos."
"The last part of the video shows the kajana couple on set."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I hope we are in a pivotal moment where a sisterhood — and brotherhood of allies — is being formed in our industry.”
“Precisely because of this we must stay vigilant and ensure that the professional intimacy is not abused.”
“Harvey finally accepted my position and expressed that he still wanted to work with me at some point.”
“I was so exasperated by the end that I just kept quiet.”
“I ran out of ways of politely saying no and so did my agent.”
“He said if I did this one for him, he would do another one for me — basically guaranteeing backing a star-vehicle film for me.”
“He said he was open to making it bigger, more significant, maybe they could add a love scene.”
“I told him I simply did not feel it was a role I needed to play.”
“In the meeting, he was honest about intending to persuade me to do his movie.”
“I agreed to do it only because my agent would be present.”


"I hope we are at a critical moment where sisterhood and brotherhood are forming in our industry."
"Because of this, we must be vigilant to ensure that professional intimacy is not abused."
"Harvey finally accepted my position and said he still wanted to work with me at some point."
"In the end, I was annoyed and just kept silent."
"I can't say no politely. So can my agent."
"He said that if I make this one for him, he will make another one for me - basically promising to make a star car movie for me."
"He said he was willing to make it bigger and more meaningful, maybe they could add a love scene."
"I told him I didn't feel like that was the role I needed to play at all."
"At the meeting, he frankly expressed his intention to persuade me to make his film."
"I agree to do it just because my agent will be there."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Transaltion from: Narcity Quebec...”
“It's not your ordinary police drama... we promise.”
“Naturally, I've been binge watching a ton of Netflix shows looking for 'the one'.”
“And for the most part, I've been pretty seriously disappointed... well up until I came across Mindhunter that is.”
“The new Netflix series, produced by David Fincher, Charlize Theron and few other big names, is everything any crime junkie craves!”
“The story takes place in 1977 and follows a FBI team studying the psychology of serial killers and murderers.”
“They use their skills and expertise to solve impossibly difficult crimes.”
“The show is based the true story of an FBI team that came up with the concept of a"serial killer" profile.”
“Playwright Joe Penhall adapted the series from the non-fiction book co-written by John E. Douglas, the FBI agent who helped invent modern criminal profiling.”
“...via @entertainmentweeklyThe show starts with the team on the road as they investigate the new and interesting phenomenon of killers murdering in a sequence (the term serial killer hasn't yet been coined).”


"Transaction location: Quebec anesthesia Center..."
"It's not your usual police play... We promise. "
"Naturally, I've been watching a lot of Netflix shows, looking for the only one."
"For the most part, I'm very disappointed... I didn't know until I met the mind hunter
"The new Netflix series, made by David Finch, Charlize Theron and several other big names, is exactly what crime fans want!"
"The story, set in 1977, is about a team of FBI researchers who study the psychology of serial killers and murderers."
"They use their skills and expertise to solve unimaginable crimes."
"The play is based on the true story of an FBI team proposing the concept of" serial killer. "
Adapted from John Douglas by playwright Joe penhall（ johne.Douglas ）Co author of a nonfiction book, he is an FBI agent who helped invent modern crime files
“… At the beginning of @ entertainment week, the team was on the road as they investigated new and interesting phenomena, killer murder sequences (the term serial killer has not yet been created)



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Story continues below advertisementFor those interested, the weather in Dublin on Friday was warm and partly cloudy with winds gusting up to 30 km/h.”
“Once he recovered, Hartigan was seen holding his ravaged umbrella, which the wind had turned inside out and ripped from its ribbing.”
““He’s OK,” one anchor laughingly reassured viewers.”
“Hartigan’s misfortune left his in-studio colleagues in hysterics.”
“READ MORE: Global Calgary anchors lose it over ‘swinging’ mistakeThe shock caused Hatigan to let out a yell as he was whisked off camera.”
“Deric Hartigan was outside the studio promoting the weather forecast later in the show when a major gust of wind grabbed hold of his umbrella and nearly blew him over.”
“Send this page to someone via emailIreland’s weather has a reputation for being a bit wicked at times and a weatherman for TV3’s Ireland AM morning show learned that first-hand.”


For those interested, it was warm and partly cloudy in Dublin on Friday, with wind speeds of up to 30 kilometers per hour
As soon as hadigan recovered, he was seen with a broken umbrella in his hand. The wind turned the umbrella upside down and cracked its rib
"He's OK," one anchor said with a smile
"Hartigan's misfortune made his colleagues in the studio hysterical."
"Guide: the shock that Calgary anchors around the world lost their minds because of" swing "mistakes made hattegan shout when he was photographed."
"When Derek Hartigan was promoting the weather forecast at the end of the show, a gust of wind grabbed his umbrella and nearly blew him down."
"Sending this page to someone by email has a bad reputation for the weather in Ireland, and a weatherman on TV3's Irish morning program first learned that."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“She then pops up and gives him a big smooch.”
“On Monday night, both the 35-year-old pop princess and her boyfriend, Sam Asghari, shared a video montage to Instagram of their romantic, PDA-filled moments.”
“"C L A S S I C M O O D ???”
“...with @samasghari #mylove," Spears captioned the post.”
“PHOTOS: Britney Spears and Boyfriend Sam Asghari Show Sweet PDA at Disneyland Celebrating Her Sons' BdaysAsghari was also feeling the love, writing: "Some classic vibes with @britneyspears ❤️❤️❤️."”
“In one snippet, Spears is seen being twirled by her guy before ending the dance move with a kiss.”
“A more scantily-clad clip shows the "Slave 4 U" singer sitting on shirtless Asghari's lap while wearing a bikini.”
“For her final video, Spears uses the bunny filter and is seen in the backseat with her guy, who goes in for a kiss.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Then she popped up and gave him a big kiss."
"On Monday night, the 35 year old pop star and her boyfriend Sam asghari shared a video montage on instagram, recording their romantic, PDA filled moments."
“C L A S I C M O D？？？”
"With @ samasghari#mylove," spears wrote under the title of the post
Photo: Britney Spears and her boyfriend Sam asgali celebrate her son's birthday at Disneyland by showing off a sweet handheld computer. Sasgali also felt the love, she wrote: "some classic atmosphere with @ BritneySpears." ❤️❤️❤️ ."”
"In one clip, spears is rotated by her boyfriend and ends the dance with a kiss."
"A more revealing clip shows the singer of" slave 4U "in bikini, sitting on asgali's lap barebacked
"In the last video, spears uses a rabbit filter and sees her in the back seat with her boyfriend, who kisses."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



**Something goes wrong**
“How does it inspire you?”
“Begley Bloom: Do you travel a lot for your job?”
“I was hesitant about selling skincare, despite the fact that I had already formulated skincare items.”
“Bahi: I started Bahi in my bedroom, just making glitters and pigments.”
“Begley Bloom: How did you get your start?”
“I want to empower others across the world to have more confidence in their skin.”
“We believe everyone should be able to use the products and feel comfortable using them.”
“Bahi: We don’t have a target market — which is part of the beauty of our company.”
“Photo courtesy of Bahi CosmeticsBegley Bloom: Who is your target market?”
“With little to no money, I started this business and now it's growing larger, one day at at time.”


"How does it motivate you?"
"Bagley bloom: do you travel a lot?"
"Even though I've developed a formula for skin care products, I'm still hesitant to sell them."
Bashi: I started Bashi in my bedroom, just flash and paint
"Bagley bloom: How did you start?"
"I want the rest of the world to have more confidence in their skin."
"We believe that everyone should be able to use these products and feel comfortable to use them."
"Bashi: we don't have a target market - it's a beautiful part of our company."
Photo courtesy of Bahi cosmotics Begley bloom: who is your target market? "
"I had almost no money. I started this business and now it's getting bigger and bigger, day by day."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now I need to process all the emotions I have and lean on God to get me and my family through this.””
““Today’s judgment tells me it was Nick Gordon.”
“The 48-year-old musician posted the clip on the Instagram account of the foundation he created in honor of his late daughter called Bobbi Kristina Serenity House.”
“In the video Bobbi belts out Adele s Someone Like You crooning Don t forget me I beg I ll remember you said Sometimes it lasts in love but sometimes it hurts instead The My Prerogative singer added information for The National Domestic Violence Hotline to the end of the...”
“...video...”
““Today we remember you #BobbiKristina ?#eN?ough #LoveShouldntHurt ?”
“?” he wrote.”
“Bobbi Kristina, who was also the daughter of Whitney Houston, was found unresponsive in a bathtub at her Georgia home in January 2015.”
“She passed away on July 26, 2015, at age 22 after spending nearly six months in a medically induced coma.”
“One month after her death, Bobbi Kristina’s estate filed a $50 million wrongful death suit against Nick Gordon, her boyfriend at the time.”


"Now I need to deal with all my emotions and rely on God to get me and my family through."
"Today's verdict tells me it's Nick Gordon."
The 48 year old musician posted a scrapbook on his foundation instagram account in memory of his late daughter, boby Christina.
"In the video, boby brought out Adele's a person like you to sing in a low voice. Don't forget me, I beg you, I will remember you saying that sometimes love is lasting, but sometimes hurt. On the contrary, my privileged singer added the information of the National Domestic Violence Hotline to end..."
“… Video... "
"We remember you today, Bobbi Kristina? #Yeah? What should love be? "
"?" he wrote. "
"Bobbie Christina, also the daughter of Whitney Houston, was found unresponsive in the bathtub at her home in Georgia in January 2015."
"She died on July 26, 2015 at the age of 22, after nearly six months of drug-induced coma."
"A month after her death, Bobbie Christina's estate filed a $50 million wrongful death lawsuit against her then boyfriend, Nick Gordon."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Now, Will and Kate Middleton have announced what the baby boy’s name is.”
“The royal baby name is Louis Arthur Charles, Kensington Palace announced on Twitter Friday.”
“His royal title will be His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“While the royal baby name odds on Louis were 33/1 could make it appear to be a surprising choice, the names Louis, Arthur and Charles have significance within the royal family.”
“Louis was the name of Prince Phillip’s grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, as well as Prince Charles’ great-uncle Earl Louis Mountbatten, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979.”
“Louis is also a middle name for both Prince William and Prince George.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and their newborn son.”
“Kirsty O'Connor - PA Images—PA Images via Getty ImagesAs for Prince Louis’ middle names, Arthur was a middle name of Queen Elizabeth’s late father King George VI and is a middle name to both William and Prince Charles.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Now, will and Kate Middleton have announced the baby boy's name."
Kensington Palace announced on twitter on Friday that the Royal baby's name is Louis Arthur Charles
"His royal title will be his Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
"Although the chance of Louis' Royal baby name is 33 / 1, it seems to be a surprising choice. The names of Louis, Arthur and Charles are of great significance in the royal family."
"Louis is the name of Prince Philip's grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, and Prince Charles's uncle count Louis montbarton, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979."
"Louis is also the middle name between Prince William and Prince George."
"The Duchess of Cambridge and their new born son."
"Costy O'Connor PA images PA images" is the middle name of Prince Louis. Arthur is the middle name of Queen Elizabeth's late father King George VI, and is also the middle name of Prince William and Prince Charles



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...editor and writer who covers home holiday DIY crafts travel and more lifestyle topics...”
“Images 15 of 17 Maren Morris and Ryan Hurd Getty Images 16 of 17 Kimberly and Aaron Watson Getty Images 17 of 17 Dierks Bentley and Cassidy Black Next 2017 CMA Awards Red Carpet Fashion Advertisement Continue Reading Below Jessica Leigh Mattern Web Editor Jessica Leigh Mattern is a web...”
“Law and Dan Smyers with Shay Mooney and Hannah Billingsley Getty Images 11 of 17 Lee Brice and Sara Reeveley Getty Images 12 of 17 Kyle Jacobs and Kellie Pickler Getty Images 13 of 17 Cam and Adam Weaver Getty Images 14 of 17 Darius Rucker and Beth Leonard Getty...”
“Paisley and Brad Paisley Getty Images 6 of 17 Gabi Dugal and Scotty McCreery Getty Images 7 of 17 Lauren Akins and Thomas Rhett Getty Images 8 of 17 Mike Fisher and Carrie Underwood Getty Images 9 of 17 Morgan Evans and Kelsea Ballerini Getty Images 10 of 17 Abby...”
“View Gallery 17 Photos Getty Images 1 of 17 Faith Hill and Tim McGraw Getty Images 2 of 17 Morgane and Chris Stapleton Getty Images 3 of 17 Caroline Boyer and Luke Bryan Getty Images 4 of 17 Anderson East and Miranda Lambert Getty Images 5 of 17 Kimberly Williams...”
“Getty Images Check out your favorite couples and twosomes making their way down the red carpet at the 2017 Country Music Association Awards.”
“More about us.”
“If you buy from a link, we may earn a commission.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“… Editors and writers who cover family holidays, DIY crafts, tourism and more lifestyle themes... "
"15 out of 17 pictures: Maren Morris and Ryan Hurd Getty 16 out of 17 pictures: Kimberly and Aaron Watson Getty 17 pieces: Dierks Bentley and Cassidy black red carpet fashion ads for the next CMA awards ceremony read on Jessica Leigh matter website editor Jessica Leigh matter is a website..."
"Lo and Dan smiles with Shea Mooney and Hannah Billingsley Getty 17 episode 11 Lee bliss and Sarah Rivery Getty 17 Episode 12 Kyle Jacobs and Kelly picker Getty 17 Episode 13 cam and Adam Weaver Getty 17 Episode 14 Darius Lacker and Beth Leonard Getty..."
"Six out of 17 photos of Paisley and Brad Paisley Getty, seven out of 17 photos of Gaby Dugar and Scotty McCurry Getty, eight out of 17 photos of Lauren Akins and Thomas Rhett Getty, nine out of 17 photos of Mike Fisher and Kelly Underwood, ten out of 17 photos of Morgan Evans and Kelsey Ballerini..."
"View gallery 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Getty 17 photos Faith Hill and Tim McGraw Getty 17 photos Getty 2 photos Morgan and Chris Stapleton 17 photos Getty 3 photos Caroline Boyle and Luke Bryan 17 photos Getty 17 photos 4 photos Anderson East and Miranda Lambert 17 photos 5 photos Kimberly·
"Getty Images at the 2017 Country Music Association Awards ceremony, see your favorite couple and Errenzhuan on the red carpet."
"More about us."
"If you buy from the link, we can earn a commission."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read the rest of Pink's candid interview when the January 2018 Issue of Cosmopolitan hits newsstands on Dec. 12.”
“The 38-year-old pop superstar said she instructed Willow to have high expectations of the boys in her life.”
“The "What About Us" singer covers the January 2018 issue of Cosmopolitan, and inside the magazine, she opens up about the dating advice she recently gave Willow, 6.”
“Pink opens up about the dating advice she gave her daughter in the January 2018 issue of Cosmopolitan.”
“Jason Kim / Cosmopolitan"She said to me the other day, 'How many boys can I have at once?'”
“And I said, 'Excuse me?'”
“Pink told the magazine.”
“"I said, 'Probably none of them because they won’t deserve you.'"”
“"They have to be kind, respectful, they have to be chivalrous, they have to be good to their moms, they have to be good looking, they have to be funny,'" the singer recalled telling her.”
“When she heard Aguilera's name, Pink simply said, "Forgiven."”


"Please read Pink's candid interview when the international metropolis newspaper in January 2018 hits the newsstand on December 12."
"The 38 year old pop star said she instructed willow to have high expectations of boys in her life."
The "about us" singer reported on the January 2018 issue of cosmopolitan, where she disclosed her recent dating advice to six-year-old Yang Liu
"Pink published her dating advice to her daughter in Cosmopolitan magazine in January 2018."
"Jason King / cosmopolitan" she said to me the other day, "how many boys can I have at a time?"
"I said," I'm sorry? "
"Pinker told the magazine."
"I said," maybe not one, because they don't deserve you. "
"They had to be kind, respectful, chivalrous, kind to their mothers, good-looking and funny," the singer recalled
"When she heard Aguilera's name, Pinker simply said," forgive me. "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From her facial features to her adorably stylish outfits — here are 16 times Princess Charlotte looked just like her royal relatives.”
“The similarities don't end with the Queen, as Charlotte also bears a resemblance to other members of the royal family, such as her mother Kate Middleton and late grandmother Princess Diana.”
“She also recently stole the show by greeting her adoring crowd with a regal wave when her new baby brother was born.”
“Not just about whether Kate Middleton's blue dress and was a sneaky hint about the gender of her third child — but also about Princess Charlotte's uncanny resemblance to her great-grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II.”
“The royal family's most recent Christmas card immediately sparked discussion when it was released last year.”


"From her facial features to her lovely fashionable clothes, Princess Charlotte looked like her royal relatives 16 times."
"These similarities don't end with the queen, because Charlotte has similarities with other members of the royal family, such as her mother Kate Middleton and her late grandmother Princess Diana."
"She's also in the limelight recently, and when her new brother was born, she waved to her admirers."
"It's not just whether Kate Middleton's blue dress and skirt suggest the gender of her third child, but also the striking resemblance between Princess Charlotte and her great grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II."
"The royal family's latest Christmas card immediately sparked discussion when it was released last year."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Golden Globe nomination...”
“The actress who graduated in 2006 from New York University s Tisch School of the Arts also knows firsthand the burdens of college costs revealing in a 2017 Late Show interview that she had only paid off her student loans a year earlier the same day she received her second...”
““Jane the Virgin” star Gina Rodriguez is putting the For Your Consideration Emmy money allotted to her by CBS TV Studios toward a four-year Princeton University education for an undocumented Latina student, according to The Hollywood Reporter.”
“She reportedly teamed up with Big Brothers Big Sisters of Los Angeles to land the ideal candidate.”
““Our show has always jumped at any opportunity to help me do something for the Latinx community,” Rodriguez, 33, told the industry mag.”
““So I asked my showrunner, Jennie (Snyder Urman), if we could do something different with the money this year.” About 65,000 undocumented students graduate high school every year, according to 2015 Department of Education estimates.”
“Ahead of Emmy nominations, networks and streaming services clamor for voters’ attention with increasingly elaborate For Your Consideration campaigns.”
“(An L.A. Times article last year, for example, spotlighted Netflix’s 24,000-square-foot Beverly Hills campaigning space, complete with installations for “Orange Is the New Black,” “Stranger Things” and “Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt” aimed at giving voters an “experience.”) “FYC is a bizarre dance," Rodriguez said.”
“Whatever you do requires an insane amount of money Also read Houston Texans NFL quarterback Deshaun Watson donates his first paycheck to Hurricane Harvey victims While it s unclear how much Rodriguez s FYC allowance entailed the estimated cost of attending Princeton for the 2018 19 academic year is 70”
“010”


"Golden Globe nomination..."
"The actress, who graduated from Tisch School of the arts at New York University in 2006, also realized the burden of college tuition. In a program interview later in 2017, she revealed that she only paid off the student loan one year in advance on the same day that she received the second loan..."
Gina Rodriguez, who starred in virgin Jane, used the Emmy prize from the CBS studio for her four-year education at Princeton University for an undocumented Latino student, the Hollywood Reporter reported
"It's reported that she joined hands with her big brother and sister in Los Angeles and won the ideal candidate."
"Our show always takes every opportunity to help me do something for the Latin American community," Rodriguez, 33, told industry magazine
"So I asked my entertainer Jennie (Snyder Erman) if we could do something different with the money this year." In 2015, the Ministry of education estimated that about 65000 undocumented students graduate from high school every year. "
"Before Emmy nominations, online and streaming services are attracting voters' attention through more and more carefully planned campaigns for you."
Rodriguez said: "for example, an article in the Los Angeles Times last year highlighted Netflix's installation of" orange is the new black "," strange thing "and" the indestructible Kimi Schmidt "on the 24000 square foot campaign site in Beverly Hills, aiming to give voters an" experience. " "FYC is a strange dance."
"Whatever you do, you need a crazy sum of money. You can also read that Houston Texas Rugby quarterback DeShawn Watson donated his first salary to the victims of Hurricane Harvey. It's not clear how much Rodriguez's FYC allowance will cost. The estimated cost of Princeton in the 19th academic year of 2018 is 70."
“010”



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This year’s new artist of the year category is particularly competitive, with Bad Bunny, Manuel Turizo, Raymix and Sebastian Yatra vying for the award.”
“...urban...”
“On his end Balvin s Mi Gente with Willy William featuring Beyonce is up for song of the year and favorite song urban while X by Balvin with Nicky Jam is up for song of the year and favorite song...”
““Me Niego,” by Reik featuring Ozuna and Wisin is up for favorite song –pop, and “Sobredosis,” by Romeo Santos featuring Ozuna is up for favorite song - tropical.”
“In addition, Ozuna is up for song of the year and favorite song-urban for “Escápate Conmigo,” his hit with Wisin.”
“Ozuna and Balvin are also both up for favorite artist-male, favorite artist, urban and favorite album-urban and album of the year for Odisea and Vibras, respectively.”
“In terms of nominations, 10 artists are up for artist of the year: Bad Bunny, Banda MS de Sergio Lizárraga, Christian Nodal, Daddy Yankee, J Balvin, Luis Fonsi, Maluma, Nicky Jam, Ozuna and Shakira.”


"This year's new artist category competition is particularly fierce, bad rabbit, Manuel turizo, RAMIX and Sebastian Yatra are all competing for the award."
“… City... "
"In the end, Beyonce's" Bowen's Tantra "and" Willie Williams "will be nominated as the song of the year and the most popular song" city ", while Bowen's" X "and" Nicky jam "will be nominated as the song of the year and the most popular song..."
"Me niego" starring reik and "sobredosis" starring ozuna and wisin are the most popular songs, while "sobredosis" starring Romeo Santos is the most popular song "tropics" starring ozuna
In addition, ozuna will also win the song of the year award, as well as his favorite song "urban" for his hit song "ESC á pate Comigo" with vicin
"Ozuna and Baldwin are also the most popular artists for men, the most popular artist for city and the most popular album for city and the album of the year for odici and viblas, respectively."
"In terms of nominations, 10 artists were named artist of the year: Bad Rabbit, Ms. Banda de Sergio rizaraga, Christian nodal, Yankee dad, J. Baldwin, Louis fonsey, maruma, Nicky jam, ozuna and Shakira."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below.”
“She was asked, "If you have nine pizzas and then cut each pizza into eight slices, how many slices do you have?"”
“Poehler's love of an extra slice of pizza helped her with one of her answers.”
“On Tuesday s The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon the late night host paid tribute to Amy Poehler s Smart Girls organization by inviting the actress to compete against him in a game of Are You Smarter Than a Smart...”
“Girl...”
“The contest involved Fallon and Poehler each partnering up with a young girl to answer questions about math, science, geography and grammar.”
“Before the game got underway, Fallon's partner Maya showed off her French rap skills, rapping a song from Hamilton, while Poehler's partner Anaya displayed her talent for making purses out of duct tape.”
“As the competition began, Poehler started off by choosing math.”
“Poehler confidently said, "73 slices," before immediately doubting her answer.”
“The game continued with coaxing from Anaya and Maya until the final question about the number of bones in a human body.”


"Pay attention to the bottom."
She was asked, "if you have nine pizzas and cut each into eight slices, how many slices do you have?"
"Poller likes to eat an extra slice of pizza, which helps her find an answer."
"On Tuesday, the host of tonight's show, starring Jimmy Fallon, paid tribute to Amy poller's" smart girls "organization and invited the actress to have a" are you smarter than smart girls... "
"Girl..."
During the competition, Fallon and poller were paired with a young girl to answer questions about mathematics, science, geography and grammar
"Before the competition, Falun's partner Maya showed her French rap skills and a Hamilton song, while poller's partner Anaya showed her gift of making wallets out of tape."
At the beginning of the competition, poller chose mathematics
"Poller said confidently," 73, "and immediately doubted her answer."
"The game continues under the coax of Anaya and Maya until the last question about the number of human bones."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There is a reason she has so many friends and people around her that love her.””
““She has so many incredible qualities I’m learning about each day,” he began.”
“Ashley, you friend-zoned me," Kevin Wendt joked on Wednesday's episode of the Ben and Ashley I.”
“Almost Famous PodcastBachelor Winters Games’ Ashley Iaconetti and Kevin Wendt are opening up about their breakup.”
“Just weeks after audiences watched the pair find romance with each other on the Olympic-themed Bachelor spinoff, PEOPLE confirmed on Monday that they have gone their separate ways.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Now, Los Angeles-based Iaconetti — who competed on The Bachelor and Bachelor in Paradise — and Wendt, a former Canadian Bachelorette contestant who lives in Canada, are sharing exactly why they decided to call it quits.”
““It sounds a little harsh, but it’s just that lack of — there’s magic.”
“We get along very well, it’s just there’s a little something missing and you can’t really pinpoint what it is.”
“That’s just how I feel,” Iaconetti, 30, told former Bachelor star Ben Higgins on Wednesday’s episode of their Ben and Ashley I.”


"There are so many friends and people around her who love her, that's for a reason."
"She has a lot of incredible qualities and I study every day," he began
"Ashley, your friends rowed me," Kevin winter joked in Wednesday's Ben and Ashley I
"Ashley aconetti and Kevin winter, who are almost famous podcasts of singles Winter Games, have made their break-up public."
"Just a few weeks after viewers watched the two find each other romantic in the Olympic themed bachelor series, people confirmed on Monday that they had gone their separate ways."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Now iaconetti of Los Angeles, who competed in singles and singles in heaven, shares with former Canadian single woman winter, who lives in Canada, the exact reason for their decision to quit."
"It sounds a little harsh, but it's just a lack of magic."
"We get along very well, but there is something missing. You really can't find out what it is."
"That's how I feel," 30-year-old akonetti told former bachelor star Ben Higgins on Wednesday's Ben and Ashley I show



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“We were so excited to travel the world.”
“The 38-year-old actress, who gave birth to her second bundle of joy in June with husband Scott Campbell, revealed that the couple welcomed a baby boy named Ozzy (short for Osgood) during an appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Wednesday, August 16.”
“Bell, who showed off her post-baby body in a green, formfitting dress, revealed that the couple didn’t plan their second pregnancy.”
“(They are already parents of Daughter Nova, 2.)”
““It was one of those things where my husband and I were so excited to have just one kid,” the New York City native said.”
““We have a beautiful daughter, Nova.”
“She’s awesome — named after the Chevy, obviously.”
“It’s also celestial, but you know what I mean — more so the Chevy.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"We are so excited to travel around the world."
The 38 year old actress, who gave birth to her second child in June with her husband, Scott Campbell, revealed that the couple had a baby boy named Osgood on the live show of Jimmy Kimmel
“…… Wednesday, 16 August. "
Bell showed her body after birth in a green dress and revealed that the couple had no plans for a second pregnancy
"They are the parents of their 2-year-old daughter, Nova."
"My husband and I are very happy to have a child," the New York native said
"We have a beautiful daughter, Nova."
"She's great - obviously named after Chevy."
"It's heavenly, too, but you know what I mean - even more so for Chevy."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...can be paired with any outfit...”
“Related Cute Maternity Workout Clothes You ll Actually Want to Wear While Pregnant Here browse the best yoga pants for women that aren t Lululemon but offer all the same features like a flattering fit and stylish versatile look that...”
“And the best part is the majority of these options can double as maternity yoga pants thanks to their stretchy material and flexible, comfortable fit.”
“...what works for you here...”
“Whether you re a seasoned yogi looking for performance ready yoga pants with pockets for your next Bikram class or a casual wearer looking for seamless and flattering high waisted yoga pants to wear while running errands you ll find...”
“And while you’ve probably heard about the Lululemon yoga pants and leggings that have gained a cult following, these top-notch picks boast all of the same features—but at lower prices.”
“So to help you sift through the seemingly endless options of the most flattering workout clothes, we’ve compiled a list of 16 of our favorite pairs below, from a variety of brands and price points.”
“Now that this style has become so popular, there are tons of different yoga pants for women out there to choose from.”
“Or if you prefer something that you can lounge in at home, opt for cotton yoga pants that’ll feel soft and comfortable enough for everyday wear.”
“If you plan on sporting them to your next gym sesh or hot yoga class, look for pairs made with performance-ready fabrics that’ll keep you cool during the sweatiest workouts.”


“… Can go with any outfit... "
"Related to lovely maternity sportswear, the woman you really want to wear here to browse the best yoga pants during pregnancy is not lulumen, but provides all the same functions, such as a flattering fit and fashionable multi-functional appearance..."
"The best part is that most of these options can also be used as pregnant women's Yoga Pants due to the elastic material and flexible and comfortable fit."
“… What works for you... "
"Whether you are an experienced yoga lover or a casual wearer, you will find that whether you are looking for high-performance yoga pants with pockets for your next Bikram course, or you want to wear seamless high waist yoga pants when running errands, you will find that..."
"While you may have heard that lululemon yoga pants and tights are gaining a huge following, these top picks share the same features, but at a lower price."
"Therefore, to help you select the most popular sportswear that seems to emerge in an endless stream, we list 16 of our favorite sportswear from different brands and prices below."
"Now this style is very popular, there are many different yoga pants for women to choose from."
"Or, if you like something you can rest at home, you can choose Cotton Yoga Pants, which will make you feel soft and comfortable, suitable for daily wear."
"If you're going to take them to your next fitness class or hot yoga class, find a pair made of high-performance fabrics to keep you cool during the most sweaty training."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘””
““Being in a movie with 10 really unique and diverse women…I kind of looked around and was really like, ‘Oh, this might not ever happen again.”
“Image zoom“I didn’t appreciate it fully until the third movie,” she says.”
“Looking back on her experience with the franchise, Kendrick says she feels lucky to have worked with so many talented women.”
“Along with Kendrick, Rebel Wilson, Anna Camp, Elizabeth Banks and more return for the film.”
“The acapella-singing friends come together to perform in an overseas tour.”
“The film, which has been dubbed the “Farewell tour” in previews, reunites the Bellas after they’ve graduated college.”
“Go to People.com/peopletv, or download the app on your favorite streaming device.”
““We are all at peace with the idea that it would make sense if this was the last one.”Image zoom Credit: Quantrell Colbert/Universal StudiosWatch the full episode of The Jess Cagle Interview: Anna Kendrick, streaming now on PeopleTV.”
““It certainly does feel like it’s the finale,” she says.”


“‘””
"In a movie, there are 10 very unique and diverse women I looked around and really thought, "Oh, this may not happen again."
"Image zooming" I didn't fully appreciate it until the third movie, "she said
"Looking back on her experience in franchising, Kendrick said she felt lucky to work with so many talented women."
"There's Kendrick, there's rebel Wilson, there's Anna camp, there's Elizabeth Banks, there's more coming back to the movies."
"The friends of the acapela choir are touring overseas."
The movie, known in the trailer as a "farewell trip," reunites after Bella's family graduated from college
"Go to people's net / people's TV, or download the app on your favorite streaming media device. “
"If it's the last time, we'll all find it meaningful." Image zooming source: quantum Colbert / Universal Studios watch the full episode of an interview with Jess Cagle: Anna Kendrick, now on peopletv
"It really makes people feel like this is the last scene," she said



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And it’s entirely up to you to get that help.”Weinstein has denied “any allegations of non-consensual sex,” according to his spokesperson.”
““And there is help for a guy like you, too.”
““What I would say to Harvey is, I love you and I understand you are sick and suffering,” she added.”
““There has to be a real profound understanding on the part of the sexual predator that what he was doing was wrong and criminal,” Judd said.”
“Still, Judd said she believes there is “hope and help” for everyone, including sexual predators.”
““But it’s been an absolutely, tremendously moving two and a half or three weeks.”Judd said she could never forgive Weinstein for what he had done to women, and added that he “absolutely” should go to jail if the sexual assault allegations against him are true.”
“...told Sawyer fighting back tears...”
“AshleyJudd on Harvey Weinstein What I d say to Harvey is I love you and I understand that you re sick there s help for a guy like you pic twitter com 3mBkJQ8uMl Good Morning America GMA October 26 2017 I didn t expect that I would feel tearful Judd...”
“.”
““[Weinstein] had her sent up to his room, where he appeared in a bathrobe and asked if he could give her a massage or she could watch him shower, she recalled in an interview,” reported the Times.”


A spokesman for Weinstein said Weinstein denied "any charges of involuntary sex."
"People like you help, too."
"What I want to say to Harvey is that I love you and I know you're sick and miserable," she added
"The sex offender must have a really deep understanding that what he is doing is wrong and criminal," Zhu said
"Despite this, Judd said she believes everyone has" hope and help, "including sex offenders."
Jude said she would never forgive Weinstein for what he had done to women, adding that if the sexual assault charges against Weinstein were true, he should "absolutely" go to jail
“… Tell Sawyer to hold back tears... "
"Ashleyjudd about Harvey Weinstein, what I want to say to Harvey is that I love you and I understand that you are sick. People like you can help. Pic twitter com 3mbkjq8uml good morning GMA October 26, 2017 I didn't expect that I would feel tearful Judd..."
“.”
"He asked her to go to his room and he showed up in his bathrobe and asked if he could give her a massage or if she could watch him take a bath," the Times reported



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Prince William thus becomes His Royal Highness The Duke of Cambridge and Miss Catherine Middleton on marriage will become Her Royal Highness The Duchess of Cambridge."”
“His titles will be Duke of Cambridge, Earl of Strathearn and Baron Carrickfergus," Buckingham Palace said at the time.”
“His bride, Meghan Markle, will be known as Her Royal Highness the Duchess of Sussex after today's ceremony.”
“"The Queen has today been pleased to confer a Dukedom on Prince Henry of Wales.”
“His titles will be Duke of Sussex, Earl of Dumbarton and Baron Kilkeel," a Buckingham Palace spokesperson said.”
“"Prince Harry thus becomes His Royal Highness The Duke of Sussex, and Ms. Meghan Markle on marriage will become Her Royal Highness The Duchess of Sussex."”
“[NATL] Royal Wedding 2018: Best Moments From Meghan Markle, Prince Harry's WeddingThe previous Duke of Sussex was married twice, but neither marriage was approved by his father.”
“As such, they were considered unlawful.”
“And so, Meghan is the first Duchess of Sussex.”
“It is customary for members of the Royal Family to be offered at least one title by the monarch upon marriage.”


"Prince William becomes his Royal Highness the Duke of Cambridge, and Miss Catherine Middleton will become her Royal Highness The Duchess of Cambridge when she gets married."
Buckingham Palace said at the time: "his titles will be Duke of Cambridge, Earl of stratson and Baron Carrickfergus."
His bride, Megan markel, will be called her Royal Highness The Duchess of Sussex after today's wedding
"The queen is pleased to confer the title of Duke Henry, Prince of Wales, today."
A Buckingham palace spokesman said: "his titles will be Duke of Sussex, count Dunbarton and Baron kilcoll."
"So Prince Harry became his Royal Highness the Duke of Sussex, and Ms. Megan Marcel will become her Royal Highness The Duchess of Sussex."
"Royal wedding in 2018: the best time for Megan marcel, Prince Harry's wedding before the Duke of Sussex married twice, but did not get his father's approval."
As a result, they are considered illegal
So Megan was the first Duchess of Sussex
"It is customary for members of the royal family to be given at least one title by the monarch when they marry."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The current season will crown the latest winner on May 21.”
“After 15 seasons on Fox, American Idol returned in March on a new network with a new set of judges.”
““EXCITED TO ANNOUNCE that @lukebryanofficial, @lionelrichie, @ryanseacrest and yours truly will be BACK with another season of #AmericanIdol on @ABCnetwork.”Bryan, Richie, and Seacrest also shared their excitement on social media.”
“?” tweeted Perry.”
“I’m having TWO much fun to stop now… so why don’t we keep it going!”
““Y’ALL!”
“On Friday, the network announced a renewal for the singing competition series, while also revealing that judges Katy Perry, Luke Bryan, and Lionel Richie, as well as host Ryan Seacrest, will be all be back.”
“American Idol renewed: Katy Perry & Co. all set to returnAmerican Idol Close Streaming OptionsThe results are in… and American Idol will return for a second season on ABC.”


"This season will crown the latest champions on May 21."
"After 15 seasons on Fox, American Idol returned in March with a new group of judges."
"I'm glad to announce that @ lukebryanofficial, @ lionelrichie, @ RyanSeacrest and your true will launch another season of" American Idol "on @ abcnetwork." Brian, rich and Seacrest also shared their excitement on social media
"?" Perry tweeted. "
"I have two interesting stops So why don't we go on! "
"You
"Last Friday, LETV announced the renewal of the singing competition series, and revealed that judges Katie Perry, Luke Bryan, Lionel Ritchie and host Ryan Seacrest will all be back."
"American Idol" sequel: Katy Perry & Co. will re launch "American Idol" close streaming selection results American Idol will air its second season on ABC



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Mama June's Pregnant Daughter Lauryn 'Pumpkin' Shannon Reveals the Gender of Her BabyMama June's Daughter, Lauryn 'Pumpkin' Shannon, Gives Birth to a Baby Girl This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Mama June's Daughter Lauryn 'Pumpkin' Shannon Welcomes Baby Girl: Find Out Her Name!”
“RELATED CONTENT:Mama June Channels Marilyn Monroe in Iconic White Halter Dress: Pics!”
“In case you missed it, watch the video below to see highlights from season two of the series.”
“Getty ImagesPumpkin's pregnancy was played out on her mother's WE tv reality show, Mama June: From Hot to Not.”
“The baby girl made her first red carpet appearance one month later, at the season two premiere party of Growing Up Hip Hop: Atlanta in Georgia.”
“Pumpkin and Efird became engaged in June 2016, and welcomed their first child together, daughter Ella Grace, last December.”
“Our source tells us cameras were on site, and the ceremony will be featured on the new season of Mama June: From Not to Hot.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Mama June's pregnant daughter Lauryn 'pumping' Shannon revealed the gender of the baby. Mama June's daughter Lauryn 'pumping' Shannon gave birth to a baby girl. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"June mother's daughter Laurine 'pumpkin' Shannon welcomes baby girl: find out her name!"
"Related content: June mom Marilyn Monroe in the iconic white suspender skirt: picture!"
"If you missed it, please watch the video below to learn about the highlights of the second season of the series."
"Gerty Putin's pregnancy was shown on her mother's June Mom: hot or not."
A month later, the baby girl made her debut on the red carpet at the second season premiere of growing hip hop: Atlanta, Georgia
"Pumpkin and efird got engaged in June 2016 and had their first child, Ella grace, in December last year."
"Our sources told us that there were cameras on the scene, and the wedding will be broadcast in the new season of mom in June: never hot to hot."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Back when “I <3 TS” was only a Hiddleswift meme, Hiddleston himself explained how he came to wear said shirt.”
“Also, just because the symbol needs to be mentioned, Swift has $60 snake rings in her online shop as well.”
“If this is something you’re into, you can buy it here.”
“To think that a thing everyone made fun of is going to be worn on the backs of every pre-teen fan in the audience at her shows is mind-boggling.”
“She also sells a crop-top version.”
“In her online shop, she sells them for $50 a pop.”
“Yeah, Swift sells “I <3 TS” shirts now.”
“One of those visions was seizing every narrative that’s ever been crafted about her and monetizing it.”
“The stans were screaming, “YAS,” and everyone else was like, “Hmm, okay.” No matter what you think of it, it’s clear that Swift had a vision.”
“Last night, Taylor Swift premiered her new music video for “Look What You Made Me Do,” and it was met with reactions.”


When "I < 3 ts" was just a fan of sidleston, sidleston himself explained how he put on the shirt
"And because of this symbol, swift also has a $60 snake ring in his online store."
"If it's something you like, you can buy it here."
"It's incredible to think that what everyone teases will be worn on the back of every teenage fan in the audience."
"She also sells a jacket."
"In her online store, she sells it for $50 a bottle."
"Yes, swift is selling 'I < 3 ts' shirts now."
"One of them is to capture every narrative about her and monetize it."
"The stans screamed," Yass, "and the others said," well, all right. "No matter what you think, it's clear that Swift is hallucinating."
"Last night, Taylor Swift premiered her new music video for see what you asked me to do, and the response was overwhelming."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““How many episodes she’s in is being determined.””
“The Don’t Be Tardy star “won’t be a full-time Housewife, but will be in a smaller role,” a source told Us in April.”
“It’s bad.” The insider added that that Parks’ actions were “incredibly painful and shocking.”At the time, Parks’ rep slammed the rumors that the lawyer was fired as “untrue.”Parks’ exit could mean more screen time for Kim Zolciak-Biermann, who will be returning to RHOA for season 10.”
““It wouldn’t be Phaedra’s decision, but Bravo’s.”
““It would be understandable if Phaedra didn’t come back, but it’s not finalized yet,” the source said.”
“I’m sorry that it hurt Kandi as well.”A source previously told Us in late April that the reunion episodes were “disastrous” for Parks.”
“I apologized already and the person I’m most concerned about is Porsha.”
“When host Andy Cohen said that she was caught in a “megawatt lie,” Parks said, “What more can I do?”
“Parks’ departure comes after the finale of the four-part season 9 reunion revealed that she spread a rumor that Kandi Burruss and her husband, Todd Tucker, were planning to drug and take home fellow cast member Porsha Williams.”
““Bravo is not planning to ask her back.” (Bravo had no comment.)”


"How many episodes she has played are being determined."
In April, a source told us, "the star who doesn't come late" won't be a full-time housewife, but will play a smaller role
"It's bad." The insider added that parks' actions were "incredibly painful and shocking." At the time, parks' representatives attacked the "untrue" rumors about lawyers being fired. Pax's exit may mean Kim zolciak Biermann has more screen time and will return to Roya in the 10th season
"It's not Federer's decision, it's Bravo's."
"It's understandable if Federa doesn't come back, but it hasn't been finalized," the source said
"I'm sorry. It hurt Kandy, too." A source told us in late April that the reunion was "catastrophic" for the park
"I've apologized. The person I care about most is Posha."
When Andy Cohen, the host, said she was in "megawatt lies," Parks said, "what else can I do?"
"Parks's departure is revealed in the final episode of the reunion of season 9. She spreads rumors that Candie Burroughs and her husband Todd Tucker plan to take drugs and take actor Bertha Williams home."
"Bravo doesn't want her back." (Bravo didn't comment.)



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s just when you can tell other people and I kind of would like to be on that totem pole somewhere — I don’t have to be at the top, I just would like to be on it.””
““What you did before you met me is what you did before you met me, I don’t need to know everything about you.”
““I don’t care,” he told her.”
“She revealed to John that she had previously been married for three years and he was extremely forgiving and understanding — probably because he was also previously married to his high school sweetheart and got divorced after only three years, too.”
“But Nikki eventually gathered enough courage to tell John at her sister Brie Bella’s 2014 wedding to her husband Daniel Bryan.”
“She was worried about breaking the news to him because they’ve had multiple conversations about marriage before and she never mentioned her own previous marriage to him.”
“But her family weren’t the only ones in the dark — she hadn’t even told John at that point.”
“...kept such a big secret from her for all those years and Nikki said that it was because she was ashamed of the whole situation...”
“We drove to Vegas did it and even when I started walking down the aisle I know this was a huge mistake like how can I get out of it and I couldn t and I tried to forget about it Nikki s mom Kathy Colace was shocked that she...”
““Basically, we got married by Elvis.”


"You can tell people that I kind of want to stand on a totem pole somewhere - I don't have to stand on the top, I just want to stand on it."
"What you did before you met me is what you did before you met me. I don't need to know everything about you."
"I don't care," he told her
"She revealed to John that she had been married for three years before, and he was very tolerant and understanding - probably because he had been married to his sweetheart in high school before, and divorced after only three years."
"But Nicky finally summoned up enough courage to tell John at her sister Bree Bella's wedding to her husband Daniel Blaine in 2014."
"She was worried about telling him the news because they had talked about marriage many times before and she never mentioned her previous marriage to him."
"But it wasn't just her family - she didn't even tell John at the time."
“…… He kept a big secret from her for so many years. Nicky said it was because she was ashamed of the whole situation... "
"We drove to Vegas, and even though I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake, just like how I could get rid of it, I couldn't, I tried to forget it, and Nicky's mother Kathy CORAS was shocked that she
"Basically, we were married by Elvis."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Prince Harry is the “best husband ever,” Meghan proclaimed with a smile on Thursday.”
“The ecstatic newlywed royal, 36, told well-wishers she was “really enjoying” married life as she met locals in Chester alongside Queen Elizabeth for a series of events.”
“Sharon Briscoe, 61, who had traveled about 25 miles east from Chirk, Wales, for the chance to meet Meghan asked her how she was enjoying her new life.”
““It is wonderful,” Meghan told her.”
““I’m really enjoying it.”Briscoe adds, “I said to give our love to Harry and to look after him.”Meghan then replied: “I will do.”
“That means an awful lot to us.”
“He’s the best husband ever.”Image zoom Meghan Markle | Credit: Tim Rooke/REX/ShutterstockShe added that the new Duchess of Sussex “looked radiant” and Meghan said, “That’s so kind.”“She seems so genuine and really warm and not rushing with people,” Briscoe said.”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Prince Harry is" the best husband ever, "Megan announced with a smile on Thursday
The ecstatic 36 year old newlywed Royal told her benefactors that she "really enjoyed" her marriage because she was in Chester with Queen Elizabeth at a series of events and met local people
Sharon Briscoe, 61, walked 25 miles east from chick, Wales, to get a chance to meet Megan, and asked her how to enjoy her new life
"Great," Megan told her
"I really enjoyed it," brisko added. "I said we would give Harry our love and take care of him." Megan then replied, "I will."
"It means a lot to us."
"He's the best husband ever." Image zoom Megan Markle | source: Tim Luke / Rex / stuttstock, she added that the new Duchess of Sussex "looks radiant," Megan said, "great." "She looks sincere, enthusiastic and not in a hurry to get along with people," brisko said



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She also stars with her family on the Bravo series Don't Be Tardy, which completed a fifth season in December.”
“It can happen to anyone at any age!”
“The reality star told fans she's feeling "great" in a post the same day, nearly two years after having a stroke at age 37.”
“Photo by Kim Zolciak /InstagramJuly 17 (UPI) -- Kim Zolciak says she's "almost fully recovered" from her 2015 stroke.”
“The 39-year-old reality star told fans she's feeling "great" in a post Sunday, nearly two years after having a stroke at age 37.”
“She opened up about the experience while sharing the warning signs of a stroke with her followers.”
“Advertisement"As you know I had a stroke in Sept 2015," Zolciak wrote.”
“"Im so thankful for everyone's quick thinking.”
“I've never seen doctors/nurses move as fast as they did the second I was wheeled in.”
“I'm so thankful for my medical team.”


"She also starred with her family in the Bravo series don't be late, which completed its fifth season in December."
"It can happen to people of any age!"
Nearly two years after her 37 year old stroke, the reality TV star told fans in a blog post on the same day that she felt "great."
"Photo by Kim zolciak / instagram July 17," said Kim zolciak, who has "almost completely recovered" from her stroke in 2015
The 39 year old reality star told fans on Sunday, nearly two years after her 37 year old stroke, that she felt "great."
"She made her story public and shared with her followers the warning signs of a stroke."
"Advertising" as you know, I had a stroke in September 2015
"I really appreciate your quick thinking."
"I've never seen a doctor / nurse move so fast the moment I was pushed in."
"I am very grateful to my medical team."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...months...”
“Adams was unable to be with his girlfriend during her hospitalization because he was filming the newest season of Bachelor in Paradise in Mexico but promised her that he was Coming home soon baby Us Weekly exclusively revealed in October 2017 that the pair had been seeing each other for...”
“Hyland didn’t reveal what she was suffering from but she has previously spoken about undergoing a kidney transplant in 2012 and battling a medical condition that caused her to lose muscle mass.”
“The 27-year-old shared a photo of her swollen face on Instagram and revealed that she was forced to leave work on her new movie, The Wedding Year, in order to seek treatment.”
“...the actress and her boyfriend after she recently battled health issues that landed her in the hospital in June...”
“They were stuck on the runway for more than an hour but managed to make the most of their time together by sharing silly videos and a sweet photo that the reality TV star captioned Honestly it doesn t matter where we are The getaway was a welcome break for...”
“The couple also posted Instagram Story videos on Sunday, July 15, that showed them on a plane, waiting to take off for a Mexican vacation.”
““Love is going to your girlfriend’s high school reunion when you never even went to your own high school reunion.”He also shared videos with the actress and her friends from the Professional Performing Arts School in NYC goofing off.”
““You want to know what love is?” the Bachelor in Paradise star said in one clip.”
“The Bachelorette alum, 33, shared videos from the Modern Family star’s get-together on his Instagram Story on Saturday, July 14.”


“… Month... "
"Adams couldn't be with his girlfriend while she was in hospital because he was filming the latest season of" Bachelor in heaven "in Mexico, but he promised her that he would go home soon." baby weekly exclusively disclosed in October 2017 that they had met
"Hyland did not disclose her condition, but she had previously talked about receiving a kidney transplant in 2012 and fighting the disease that caused her to lose muscle."
"The 27 year old shared a picture of her swollen face on instagram and revealed that she was forced to quit shooting her new film" the year of marriage "in order to seek treatment."
“… The actress and her boyfriend were recently hospitalized in June for health problems
"They were trapped on the T-stage for more than an hour, but by sharing a stupid video and a sweet photo, they managed to make the most of their time together, and the reality show star honestly said, no matter where we are, running away is a popular break..."
"The couple also released an instagram story video on Sunday, July 15, showing them on a plane waiting to take off for a holiday in Mexico."
"Love is going to your girlfriend's high school reunion, and you've never been to your own." He also shared the video with the actress and her friends at the New York School of professional performing arts
"Do you want to know what love is? "The bachelor star in heaven said in a video."
"The 33 year old single alumni shared a video of the modern family star's party on instagram on Saturday, July 14."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We’ll get a court order requiring them to come to my office and answer questions under oath if necessary.”The child support modification request is apparently due to be heard in court in December.”
“...the Bloom Firm for their failure to support Ms White s spurious allegations with actual evidence...”
“Bloom announced Wednesday...”
““For over a year, Blac Chyna has been fighting to get her day in court against Robert Kardashian, Kris Jenner, Kim Kardashian West, Khloe Kardashian and Kylie Jenner,” the attorney said.”
““Chyna alleges that she was slut-shamed, defamed and the victim of a plot to kill her hit show, Rob & Chyna, causing her significant financial damages.”
“Today the court REJECTED the Kardashian family’s request to strike Chyna’s entire lawsuit.”
“Most importantly, all of Chyna’s legal claims stay in.”
“Chyna will therefore be permitted to have her day in court.”Meanwhile the Kardashians' lawyer shared with ET: "The Bloom Firm’s tweet is not an accurate statement of what happened in court today.”
“In fact the Kardashians have successfully chipped away at Ms White s outlandish claims since her lawsuit was filed culminating in today s hearing a hearing at which the Court invited counsel for the Kardashians to seek attorney fees against...”
“ICYMI, Chyna is seeking unspecified damages following a much-publicized July 2017 incident in which Rob posted nude pictures of her on social media.”


"We will have a court order for them to come to my office and answer questions on oath if necessary." It is clear that the request to amend child support will be heard in court in December
“…… Bloom did not support Ms. White's false accusation with factual evidence.... "
"Bloom announced on Wednesday..."
"For more than a year, Blake Zina has been fighting in court against Robert Kardashian, Chris Jenner, Kim Kardashian West, helo Kardashian and Kelly Jenner," the lawyer said
"Chyna claims that she has been humiliated and slandered by a slut and is the victim of a plot to kill her popular show rob & Chyna, causing her huge economic losses."
"Today, the court rejected the Kardashian family's request to remove chener from the whole lawsuit."
"Most importantly, all of chener's legal claims have been preserved."
"So Chyna will be allowed to appear in court." Meanwhile, Kardashian's lawyer shared with ET: "Bloom's Twitter is not an accurate statement of what happened in court today."
"In fact, since Ms. white filed a lawsuit, the Kardashian family has successfully reduced her eccentric claims. Finally, at today's hearing, the court invited the Kardashian family's lawyer to ask for the lawyer's fee..."
"Icymi, Chyna claimed unspecified damages after rob posted her nude photo on social media in July 2017."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Marc Lupo...”
““Everyone always thinks of me as the rule breaker and the troublemaker,” the former Fox News contributor said.”
“Jedediah Bila and her fiancé, Jeremy Scher, are married, Us Weekly can confirm.”
“The 39-year-old former View cohost and her love tied the knot in Huntington, New York, on Saturday, February 17.”
““As 60 of their closest family and friends filled the room, Jedediah walked down the aisle as Jeremy beamed with joy — you could truly feel the love in this magical evening!” wedding planner Michael Russo tells Us.”
“The glowing bride opened up to Us and shared exclusive details of the happy couple’s fairytale wedding.”
““I’m super excited.”
“Super, super excited,” Bila told Us.”
““I always wanted to get married, but I never thought I would do the big wedding dress and the beautiful venue.”
“I always thought I was gonna be on a beach somewhere, just a couple of friends, doing it really casual.”


"Mark Lupo's story..."
"Everyone thinks I'm a rule breaker and trouble maker," said a former fox news writer
American weekly confirmed that jadidia bila and her fiance Jeremy Schell are married
On Saturday, February 17, in Huntington, New York, the 39 year old former "view" cohabitant married her lover
"When their closest 60 family members and friends filled the room, jededia walked down the aisle, and Jeremy's face was filled with a smile of joy - you can really feel love on this magical night!"! "Wedding planner Michael lasso told us."
"The radiant bride opened her heart to us and shared the exclusive details of the fairy tale wedding of the happy couple."
"I'm super excited."
"Super, super excited," bila told us
"I've always wanted to get married, but I never thought I would make a big wedding dress and a beautiful venue."
"I always thought I'd be on the beach somewhere, just a few friends, doing it casually."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if West’s insightful and reliably zany return to Twitter is any indication, he is not wanting for consciousness-shifting ideas.”
“He and his wife, Kim Kardashian, welcomed a third child, Chicago, in January, and he’s also hard at work on the latest collection for his clothing line, Yeezy.”
“Even without the 40-year-old rapper’s daily musings, the Twitterverse remained as addictive and corrosive as ever, thanks in large part to it having become, under the 45th president, a flashpoint for international diplomacy, partisan combat and ruthless trollery.”
“But this past weekend, seemingly out of nowhere, Yeezy returned to the site where he once admitted to getting “emotional over fonts”, declared The Life of Pablo “the album of the life” and wondered about the providence of a water bottle he discovered while on an airplane.”
“Having deleted all those old tweets, West started anew on Sunday with a remarkably on-brand, and predictably existentialist, message.”
““Some people have to work within the existing consciousness while some people can shift the consciousness,” he wrote, following it up with photos of forthcoming Yeezy footwear and the word “Saint”, West’s son’s name, in various typefaces.”
“...often people working with the existing consciousness are jealous of those who are more in touch and they become hard core capitalist in hopes of creating the illusion that the value of money is worth more than the value of time and friends KANYE WEST kanyewest April 16 2018 Following...”
“...a 24 hour break he returned again on Tuesday with a string of aphorisms As a creative your ideas are your strongest form of currency read one tweet...”
““Try to avoid any contractual situation where you are held back from your ideas,” he wrote in another, which the MSNBC anchor Chris Hayes called “extremely good advice”.”
“West went on to call distraction “the enemy of vision” and instructed his 7.6 million followers to “make decisions based on love not fear”.”


"But if West's deep insight and reliable comical return to Twitter is a sign, it's that he doesn't want the idea of a change of consciousness."
In January, he and his wife, Kim Kardashian, had their third child in Chicago, and he is still working hard to create the latest collection for his clothing line, yeezy
"Even without the 40 year old rapper's daily meditations, twitterverse remains as addictive and corrosive as ever, thanks in large part to its emergence as a flashpoint of international diplomacy, partisanship and ruthless spoof under the leadership of the 45th president."
But last weekend, as if from nowhere, Yezi went back to the website where he once admitted that he was "emotional because of font", declared that Pablo's life was "a photo album of life", and was curious about the fate of a water bottle he found on the plane
"After deleting all these old tweets, West started a new journey on Sunday, sending out a striking message about the brand's predictable existentialism."
"Some people have to work in their existing consciousness, while others can change their consciousness," he wrote, followed by the upcoming pictures of yeezy shoes and various typefaces for West's son's name "saint."
“…… Usually, people with existing consciousness will envy those who are closer to each other. They will become diehard capitalists, hoping to create an illusion that the value of money is more important than the value of time. My friends, after April 16, 2018... "
“… 24-hour break. He came back on Tuesday with a series of mottos. As an idea, your idea is your most powerful form of currency. Read a tweet... "
"Try to avoid any contractual situation in which your ideas will be blocked," he wrote in another article Chris Hayes, anchor of MSNBC, called it "very good advice."
West continues to call distraction "the enemy of vision," and instructs his 7.6 million followers to "make decisions based on love rather than fear."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fans are now hoping that they’ll get to see more of their holiday celebrations when Keeping Up With the Kardashians begins airing a brand new season in August.”
“Meanwhile, Kourtney Kardashian celebrated the Fourth of July in Italy.”
“Kourtney, Kim, and Khloe Kardashian all celebrated America’s birthday in style and in their own way.”
“According to a July 4 report by E!”
“Online, Kourtney, Kim, and Khloe all celebrated the holiday in true Kardashian fashion.”
“Kim showed off her big Fourth celebration via Instagram.”
“The mother of three headed to the lake where she and her group of friends tried wakeboarding for the first time.”
““This was way harder than it looks!!”
“!” Kim wrote via her Instagram story.”
“Kim Kardashian wore a blue and white bikini for her holiday outing, and paired the swimsuit with a pair of sunglasses.”


"Fans now hope to see more festive celebrations when follow Kardashian starts its new season in August."
Meanwhile, Courtney Kardashian celebrated July 4 in Italy
Coultney, Kim and Carol Kardashian all celebrated America's birthday in their own way
"According to July 4th e!"
"On the Internet, Courtney, Kim and Chloe celebrate the festival in a real Kardashian way."
"Kim showed off her fourth big celebration through instagram."
"The mother of three went to the lake, and she and her friends tried water surfing for the first time."
"It's much harder than it looks!"
"!" Kim wrote through instagram's story. "
"Kim Kardashian went on holiday wearing a blue and white bikini and a pair of sunglasses on her swimsuit."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See All of the Celebrity Looks From the 2018 Oscars Red Carpet:”
“Just your average, couture dress–wearing, three-time-Oscar-nominated 23-year-old.”
““She’s 23—it’s mind-blowing already.” The Lady Bird star and Best Actress nominee’s arrival tonight on the Oscars red carpet, in a pink Calvin Klein By Appointment dress, did just that and more, striking a cheerful, optimistic tone.”
“Designed by Raf Simons, the piece found its roots through early conversations with Saltzman, with the color being determined immediately.”
“It is a pink which is what I was trying not to do added Saltzman who conceded but it was just right The resulting bow trimmed gown coupled with Ronan s new cropped hair is poised to sit alongside other memorable Oscar red carpet moments including Nicole Kidman s mandarin...”
“...inspired Galliano for Dior couture dress in 1997 and Julia Roberts s black and white Valentino stunner from 2001”
““I want this to be timeless,” said Saltzman.”
““It needed to be about Saoirse, as a person.” It also functioned as Simons’s statement on elegance, femininity, and what it means to dress as a woman on the awards show circuit.”
““It’s what girls are made of, and what women can wear,” said Saltzman.”
““It’s just so beautiful.”The dress itself married couture-level craftsmanship with modern design.”


"See all the celebrities on the red carpet for the 2018 Oscars":
"It's just the haute couture you normally wear, the 23-year-old girl nominated for three Oscars."
"She's 23 years old, and that's amazing." The bird actress and best actress nominees came to the Oscar red carpet tonight, dressed in a pink Calvin Klein appointment dress, which is exactly what they did, and played a cheerful and optimistic tone
"This work was designed by Raf Simons of the British Royal Air Force. Through the early dialogue with Saltzman, the origin of the work was found, and the color was immediately determined."
"It's a pink, it's something I'm trying not to do," added Salzman, who admitted, but it's just right that the bow trimmed Dress Plus Ronan's new haircut is ready to sit on other unforgettable Oscar red carpet moments, including Nicole Kidman's Mandarin... "
“…… Inspired by Galliano's Dior fashion design in 1997 and Julia Roberts's black and white Valentino stunts in 2001
"I hope it's eternal," Salzman said
"It should be about saorse, as a person." It also played a role for Simmons about elegance, femininity and what it means to dress up as a woman at the awards ceremony
"It's a girl's nature and a woman can wear it," Salzman said
"It's beautiful." The dress itself combines fashion level craftsmanship with modern design



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She continued on to say that the decision to take on that role was one she'll "never regret."”
“And Robbie's not looking back.”
“She's laying her cards on the table."”
“She has to be naked.”
“So when Marty [Scorsese] was trying to help me out, and said in the scene where she seduces Jordan, perhaps I could have a robe on, I said she wouldn't.”
“She said, "The whole point of Naomi is that her body is her only form of currency in this world.”
“She stayed true to the role and knew what she had to do in order to fully become her character.”
“But I also think it's disgusting when someone would have [gotten] naked in real life, [but] in the film they conveniently leave their bra on, or hold up the bed sheet."”
“And you can always tell ...”
“If they've put it in just so that a girl gets her top off, then that's disgusting.”


She went on to say that she would "never regret" her decision to play the role
"And Robbie didn't look back."
"She's putting on airs."
"She has to be naked."
"So when Marty (Scorsese) wanted to help me, in the scene of her seducing Jordan, she said, maybe I can put on a robe, I said she won't."
"Naomi's whole point is that her body is her only form of money in the world," she said
"She's committed to the role and knows what she has to do to become her own character."
"But I also think that if someone is naked in real life, (but) in the movie, it's very convenient for them to leave their bras in front of their chests or lift the sheets, it's disgusting."
"And you can always see..."
"If they put it in just to get a girl to take off her coat, it's disgusting."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The former couple has not yet announced what led to the split.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another."”
“Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else's fictional narrative.”
“"Normally we would do this privately, but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent, we wanted to convey the truth directly.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship," the Feb. 15 statement read.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“>> Read more trending news"In an effort to reduce any further speculation, we have decided to announce our separation.”
“In mid-February, Theroux and Aniston released a joint statement confirming that they were ending their two-year marriage.”


"The first two haven't announced what caused the breakup."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
"Anything printed about us, not directly from us, is someone else's fiction."
"Normally, we do it in private, but as the gossip industry can't resist the opportunities of speculation and invention, we want to convey the truth directly."
"We are two good friends who have decided to break up, but we look forward to continuing our cherished friendship," the February 15 statement said
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
"> > read more popular news" to reduce speculation, we decided to announce a separation
In mid February, seru and Aniston issued a joint statement confirming that they would end their two-year marriage



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple had several movie-themed wedding shoots prior to the wedding, inspired by everything from Clueless to American Wedding.”
“Rose clearly wasn’t afraid to let her mom, who wore a black-and-white color-block gown, shine too on the big day.”
“The 35 year old Texas based contestant from Lorenzo Borghese s season of the show was known for being the center of attention and at the time for exclusively wearing tiaras and although she didn t win Borghese s final rose she went on to appear on several Bachelor specials...”
“...and on seasons two and three of Bachelor Pad...”
“And now, the life coach and mother of one has found her true love — Rose was married over the weekend in Houston, Texas to fiancé Charles Sanders!”
“And both the wedding and the events leading up to it were in true Erica Rose form (that is, fit for a Texan princess).”
“From the star’s two gowns to her multiple showers, here’s everything you need to know about her over-the-top nuptials.”
“Rose wore two wedding gowns: the first, a plunging white lace dress from Ventura’s Bridal Fashions, for the ceremony (above); and then a custom blush lace number with a see-through panel designed by her “friend and fashionista Alex Martinez,” for the reception.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“2.”


"Before the wedding, the couple took several film themed wedding photos, inspired by everything from ignorance to American wedding."
"Ruth is obviously not afraid to let her mother in black and white dress shine on big day."
"The 35 year old Texas contestant is from Lorenzo Borghese's performance season. She is famous for being the focus of attention. At that time, she only wore the crown. Although she didn't win Borghese's last rose, she still appeared in several bachelor special programs..."
“… In season 2 and season 3 of apartment for singles... "
"Now, the life coach and the mother of a child have found her true love - Rose married fiance Charles Sanders in Houston, Texas, at the weekend!"
"The wedding and the Pre Wedding events are really Erica Roth style (that is, suitable for Texas princesses)."
"From the star's two dresses to her many showers, here's everything you need to know about her super top wedding."
"Ross wore two wedding dresses: the first is the white lace dress of Ventura's Bridal Fashions (the bride's Bridal Fashions) for the wedding (see above); the second is the custom blush lace number with transparent panels designed for her" friend and fashion master Alex Martinez "for wedding reception.
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“2.”



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hold them accountable, and let them know you are no longer willing to tolerate their hurtful actions anymore.”
“Learn how to put boundaries in place, so that instead of avoiding your partner’s temper, you begin to directly address it and what makes it flare up.”
“To begin with, if you push back in any way, they might accuse you of not being appreciative of all they think they do for you.”
“...can also play a role.”
“You slowly give up all the facets of your life that make them act up.”
“At this point, it is likely that you have relinquished your own voice entirely in order to appease them, and will do anything to avoid their criticism, , and assault of words.”
“Eventually, it might even become more about avoiding their disapproval and possible wrath than it is about getting their approval.”
“If you believe this, you might begin to trust the other person’s judgment and opinion of you over your own, and as a result, your goal becomes to please them.”
“Their controlling behavior can feel like it is their way of showing you how much they love you, by being so involved and caring about everything you do.”
“You also might be sticking around, because you tell yourself that this pattern of abuse and affection is simply the way that your partner shows concern.”


"Let them take responsibility and let them know that you are no longer willing to tolerate their harmful behavior."
"Learn how to set boundaries so that you can begin to solve it directly and what makes it explode instead of avoiding your partner's tantrums."
"First of all, if you refuse in any way, they may accuse you of not being grateful for what they think they have done for you."
“…… It can also work. "
"You slowly give up all aspects of your life that get them to act."
"At this point, you are likely to give up your voice completely to appease them, and will do everything possible to avoid their criticism and attack."
"In the end, it may even be more to avoid their opposition and possible anger than to get their approval."
"If you believe that, you may start to believe in other people's judgments and opinions about you, not your own, and as a result, your goal becomes to please them."
"Their control behavior will make people feel that it's a way for them to show you how much they love you, how committed they are to what you do."
"You may also stay because you tell yourself that this pattern of abuse and love is just a way for your partner to show concern."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These moments signal at potential conflict down the line and keep the episode moving forward.”
“Also, Clo mentions that Nola broke the code by sleeping with Mars and that Clo really liked him too.”
“My favorite is the album covers that flash on the screen after almost every scene.”
“Hella jazz, referential dialogue, and playful visual tricks.”
“There are some classic Spike Lee touches that feel reinvigorated in this new format.”
“The whole show feels like your 20's with better art direction Nola’s bed, one of a few locations in the episode, is epic but it also feels like something she built herself from found wood.”
“It feels intimate and familiar and lush and stylized.”
“Particularly this first episode.”
“AdvertisementThat’s the beauty of She’s Gotta Have It.”
“She sounds like someone you went to college with.”


"These moments Herald potential conflict and keep events moving forward."
"In addition, clo mentioned that Nora broke the code by sleeping with Mars, and clo liked him very much."
"My favorite is the album cover, which flashes on the screen after almost every scene."
"Hella jazz, reference dialogue, and fun visual skills."
"There are some classic Spike Lee touches that feel rejuvenated in this new format."
"The whole show feels like you had a better art director in your 20s, Nora's bed, which is one of the places in this episode, epic, but it also feels like something she built herself out of the wood she found."
"Feel kind, familiar, lush, stylized."
"Especially the first episode."
"This is her beauty. She must have it."
"She sounds like someone you went to college with."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Netflix may have cancelled the Wachowski’s cult hit “Sense 8,” but its adding two of their defining works to its streaming library next month.”
“All three entries in “The Matrix” trilogy are heading to Netflix, as is the ambitious “Cloud Atlas,” which means you’ll be able to bring summer to an end by bingeing mind-melting science fiction.”
“READ MORE: Netflix Is Not the Problem: Why Bad Theatrical Presentations Are Destroying the ExperienceOther titles joining the streaming service include underrated gems from Quentin Tarantino and Michael Haneke, plus two of the year’s most exciting documentary films.”
“Check out a complete list of all the new movies joining Netflix in August 2017 below, including our 7 must-binge choices.”
““The Matrix” Trilogy (August 1)August kicks off with “The Matrix,” “The Matrix Reloaded” and “The Matrix Revolutions” all becoming available to stream on Netflix.”
“Say what you want about the two sequels, but the original still remains one of the greatest movies of the 1990s.”
“The Wachowskis mixed together Asian film wire work (choreographer Yuen Woo-ping) and gun play, cyber punk anime, some tricks of their own (bullet time) and philosophical texts to create a completely different type of Hollywood film.”
““Clouds Atlas” (August 1)The Wachowskis and Tim Twyker’s “Cloud Atlas” was probably too ambitious to ever have a shot at doing well at the box office, but the sprawling adaptation of David Mitchell’s 2004 novel of the same name is exhilarating and profound from start to finish.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
Netflix may have canceled Wachowski's hit feel 8, but next month it will add two of its classics to its streaming library
"In the Matrix trilogy, all three works will go to Netflix, and the ambitious cloud atlas will go to Netflix, which means that you will be able to end the summer with crazy science fiction."
"Read more: Netflix isn't the problem: why bad theatrical performances are ruining the experience of other streaming titles, including the underrated treasures of Quentin Tarantino and Michael hanek, as well as the two most exciting documentaries of the year."
"Check out the full list of all the new movies that joined Netflix in August 2017, including our seven must play options."
The Matrix Trilogy (August 1) opens in August, and the matrix, the matrix remake, and the matrix revolution are all available on Netflix
"Tell me what you think of these two sequels, but the original is still one of the greatest films of the 1990s."
"The wadrowski family has created a completely different type of Hollywood film by combining Asian Film informant (choreographer yuan Yuping) with gunfight, online punk animation, some of their own tricks (bullet time) and philosophical texts."
"Cloud atlas" (August 1) wachovsky and Tim twick's "cloud atlas" may be too ambitious to achieve good results at the box office, but David Mitchell's overwhelming adaptation of the novel of the same name in 2004 has always been exciting and profound



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Earlier this month, she volunteered with Rising Above Disabilities, the largest residential camp for adults and children with developmental disabilities in Southern California at their reality TV-themed summer camp.”
“Stanton is also spending her summer giving back.”
“Amanda Stanton revealed the totally relatable way she met her boyfriend, Bobby Jacobs.”
““We met on Instagram,” The Bachelor alum, 28, exclusively told Us Weekly earlier this month, noting that Jacobs slid into her DMs.”
““We don’t really have a great story.”
“I wish we had a more exciting story.”
“We were saying that we should just say we met at the dog park or something.”However, the season 3 and season 4 Bachelor in Paradise star is proud of the way she first came across her beau.”
““I guess it’s pretty normal these days,” she teased.”
““It just is funny to say.”Stanton’s daughters, Kinsley and Charlie, also approve of the relationship.”
““They love him.”


Earlier this month, she volunteered at a reality TV themed summer camp in rising above disabilities, the largest residential camp for adults and children with developmental disabilities in Southern California
"Stanton's summer vacation is also giving back."
"Amanda Stanton revealed her intimate contact with her boyfriend, Bobbie Jacobs."
"We met on instagram," the 28 year old single alumni told us exclusively earlier this month that Jacobs slipped into her DMS
"Our story is not wonderful."
"I hope we have a more exciting story."
"We mean we should say we met in the dog park." However, the star of the third and fourth seasons of singles in heaven is proud of the way she met her boyfriend for the first time
"I think these days are normal," she joked
"It's interesting to say." Stanton's daughters Kingsley and Charlie agreed with the relationship
"They love him."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Next Met Gala 2019: After Party Dresses Advertisement - Continue Reading BelowThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“30 of 71 Neelam Gill The model wore a Nicole + Felicia Couture two=piece with Chopard jewellery.”
“Getty Images 16 of 71 Hana Cross and Brooklyn Beckham Cross wore a Salvatore Ferragamo dress.”
“Getty Images 15 of 71 Camila Morrone Morrone wore Miu Miu with Bulgari jewellery.”
“Getty Images 14 of 71 Winnie Harlow The model wore Jean Paul Gaultier.”
“Getty Images 13 of 71 Margot Robbie Robbie wore archive SS11 Chanel Couture.”
“Getty Images 12 of 71 Dakota Fanning Fanning wore Armani.”
“Getty Images 11 of 71 Michelle Rodriguez The actress wore Rami Kadi.”
“Getty Images 10 of 71 Chiara Ferragni The influencer wore Philosophy.”
“Getty Images 9 of 71 Leomie Anderson The Victoria's Secret model wore a Rami Kadi playsuit.”


"Next met Gala 2019: After Party Dresses Advertising - continue to read the following content, which is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Thirty of the 71 niram gill models wore a Nicole and Felicia two-piece outfit with joppard's jewelry on it."
"Seventy one Hannah cross and Brooklyn beckhamcross, photographed by Getty Images on the 16th, were wearing Salvatore Ferragamo dresses."
"71 pictures of Getty 15 Camilla Morone Morone is wearing a wonderful dress with Bulgarian jewelry."
"Getty picture 14 71 Winnie Harlow's model wears Paul Gautier."
"Getty Images 13 of 71 Margot Robbie Robbie wears chanel fashion in spring and summer of 11."
"Getty Images 71 12 photos of fanning, Dakota, wearing an Armani."
"Getty Images photo 11 of Michelle Rodriguez in '71. The actress wears rami Kadi."
"Getty pictures 10 71 Kiara ferrani's influencers wear philosophy."
"Photo 9 of Getty 71 Remy Anderson Victoria's Secret model is wearing a rummy caddy sportswear."



**Something goes wrong**
“Curry isn’t the only Black star to recently join the COVERGIRL family.”
“It looks like daughters Riley and Ryan will have some big shoes to fill now if they want to walk in their mama’s footsteps!”
“The new product will hit shelves in November.”
“For her first COVERGIRL campaign, Curry will be promoting the brand’s soon-to-be-launched Peacock Flare Mascara.”
“...to seeing The Seasoned Life author s upcoming work with the makeup giant...”
“I ve shared a lot about how I do this with food family and faith and now through my partnership with CoverGirl I want to share how makeup helps create those moments of happiness confidence and self expression Considering Curry s infectious personality and practically permanent smile we look forward...”
“In an official statement, Curry said, “My philosophy is all about seeking joy and creating balance in life.”
“There’s clearly a lot of #blackgirlmagic going on at the beauty brand.”
“And just last week, actress Issa Rae also announced that she was named a COVERGIRL.”
“Curry, who is the wife of NBA star Steph Curry and star of Ayesha’s Home Kitchen on the Food Network, is a natural beauty so this new role is definitely fitting.”


"Curry is not the only black star who recently joined the cover girl family."
"It seems that daughter Riley and Ryan have big shoes to wear now, if they want to follow their mother's footsteps!"
"The new product will be on sale in November."
"In her first cover girl event, Currie will promote the brand's upcoming peacock flash mascara."
“… In order to see the work that the author of the old way of life is going to cooperate with the makeup giant
"Food family and faith and I shared a lot about how I did this. Now through my cooperation with Covergirl, I want to share how make-up can help create moments of happiness, self-confidence and self-expression, considering Curry's infectious personality and the almost permanent smile we expect..."
"My philosophy of life is to pursue happiness and create balance in life," curry said in an official statement
"This beauty brand obviously has a lot of advertisements for" black girls. "
Just last week, actress Issa ray also announced that she was named cover girl
"Curry is the wife of NBA star Steph curry and the kitchen star of FoodNet Aisha. He is a natural beauty, so this new role is absolutely suitable."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Both O'Donnell and her daughter have been vocal about their tumultuous relationship.”
“A rep for the 56-year-old former The View co-host tells ET that O'Donnell and her 20-year-old daughter have "reconnected."”
““Rosie said, yes, she’s pregnant and they reconnected,” the rep stated.”
“People was first to report the news.”
“Alliegro revealed that she was pregnant in an interview with Daily Mail in September of last year, but at the time said she didn’t want O'Donnell to be a part of her baby's life.”
“The expecting mother, who was reported missing by O'Donnell in 2015 (she was later found at the house of another man), said she and O'Donnell didn't "have a relationship anymore" and she didn't think "it [could] be mended."”
“"I've always wanted a family and I'm looking forward to it.”
“But Rosie will not be in my child's life -- and no, I do not feel sad about that to be honest," Alliegro said.”
“Following Alliegro's comments, O'Donnell responded by taking to Twitter and writing, "She's 20...not a teen...she is married and pregnant...she doesn't want anything to do with me...great stop...doing interviews go live ur life.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Both O'Donnell and her daughter are outspoken about their chaotic relationship."
A representative of the 56 year old former co presenter of point told et that O'Donnell and her 20-year-old daughter had "reconnected"
"Rosie said, yes, she's pregnant and they're reconnecting," the representative said
"People are the first to report the news."
"Allegro revealed in an interview with the daily mail last September that she was pregnant, but she said at the time that she did not want O'Donnell to be a part of her child's life."
"The pregnant mother, who was reported missing by O'Donnell in 2015 (she was later found in another man's home), said she and O'Donnell were" no longer related "and that" it's (possibly) irreparable, "she said
"I've always wanted a family and I'm looking forward to it."
"But Rosie won't be in my child's life - no, to be honest, I'm not sad about that," said aliegro
"After alliegro's comments, O'Donnell tweeted," she's 20 years old Not teenagers She's married, pregnant She didn't want to have anything to do with me Great Do interviews and live your life. "



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'It will be following our lifestyle, which will be great because we've got a lot going on at the moment.'”
“And now we have this.”
“The stuff that I've always been.'”
“Career orientated and independent.”
“I will be back strong.”
“'Tomorrow morning, I will be back.”
“The reality star then made sure to thank those that have shown her support and added: 'To all my wonderful followers that have sent me supportive messages, don't worry.”
“She had included a caption across her video that read: 'Maybe that's my way of asking for help or reaching out to my mom.'”
“So f**k all of you.'”
“'None of you know that I'm not speaking to my family, none of you know that I ended up calling the police last night because I was terrified.”


"It will follow our way of life, which will be great because we have a lot of things to do now."
"Now we have this."
"I've always been like this."
"Career orientation and independence."
"I'll come back strong."
"Tomorrow morning, I'll be back."
"The reality TV star then made sure to thank those who supported her, adding: 'don't worry to all the great followers who sent me support messages.'
"She added a title to the video, which said: 'maybe that's how I ask for help or contact my mother.'"
"So I'm going to take out all of you."
"None of you know that I don't talk to my family. No one knows that I called the police last night because I was afraid."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I really appreciate how vocal you’ve been.””
““It’s been incredibly moving,” Faris tells the couple.”
“McNearney for being so open about their son s condition and championing for better access to pediatric and maternal healthcare...”
“Image zoom Credit Jimmy Kimmel Instagram Jimmy Kimmel and family Image zoom Credit Tommaso Boddi WireImage Anna Faris son Jack and Chris Pratt FROM PEOPLETV Grey s Anatomy s Chandra Wilson Opens Up About Daughter s Mysterious Vomiting Syndrome and There s No Cure The Mom star thanked Kimmel and...”
““Jack had a few surgeries — he had a few hernia surgeries, he’s had a few eye surgeries and he had a little heart issue as well,” reveals Faris.”
“It was tough.”“But kids are so resilient — he had open-heart surgery on a Monday and we were home on Friday,” adds the mother of two (she and Kimmel also share daughter Jane, 3½, while Kimmel is dad to Kevin, 24, and Katie, 26).”
““He had his second surgery and he’ll have one more when he’s older.”
“With Baby Son Billy in His Arms“Billy’s great,” says McNearney, 39.”
“Image zoom Credit: Anna Faris/InstagramJimmy Kimmel and wife Molly McNearney join Anna Faris for an episode of her Unqualified podcastRELATED VIDEO: Jimmy Kimmel Holds Back Tears as He Returns to Live!”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"I really appreciate your voice."
"It's incredibly moving," Faris told the couple
"McNeil is so open to his son's condition and supports better access to child and maternal health care..."
"Photo zooming thanks to Jimi Kimmel instagram and family photo zooming thanks to Tomaso bodi and Anna Faris' sons Jack and Chris Platt Chandra Wilson from anatomy magazine of peopletv grey tells about her daughter's mysterious vomiting syndrome and incurable mother's star. Thanks to Kimmel and ”
"Jack had several surgeries - he had several hernia surgeries, he had several eye surgeries, and he had a little heart problem," Faris revealed
"It's hard." "But the kids are resilient - he had open heart surgery on Monday and we were at home on Friday," the mother of two added (she and Kimmel have a 3-and-a-half-year-old daughter, Jane, who is the father of Kevin, 24, and Katie, 26)
"He had a second operation, and he'll do it again when he grows up."
McNeil, 39, said: "it's great to hold my little son Billy."
Image zooming credit: Anna Faris / instagram Jimmy Kimmel and his wife Molly mcnearney join Anna Faris' video: Jimmy Kimmel holds back tears when he returns to the scene
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“It’s as important to us as it is to you, and we don’t want to deliver anything until it’s ready, but we’re working on it, so..."This content is imported from YouTube.”
“I think we should wait for—if a script comes in, let’s wait for that.”
“I’m not sure if it’s the right timing, but I think to work with Annie [Anne Hathaway, who played Princess Mia] would be lovely again, and sure I’d be up for it.”
“I’m getting awfully old and crotchety.”
“I think I would [do it].”
“"It’s long been talked about but nothing sort of been on my desk or anything like that.”
“"I heard that there might be one," she revealed.”
“During a virtual interview with The Talk in April, the Oscar winner managed to both inspire optimism and cast doubt when it comes to PD3.”
“Queen Andrews herself gave the latest update on the third movie.”


You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It's as important to us as you are, we don't want to deliver anything until we're ready, but we're working on it, so..." This content was imported from YouTube
"I think we should wait. If there's a script coming in, we'll wait."
"I'm not sure the timing is right, but I think working with Anne (Anne Hathaway as Princess MIA) will be lovely again, and I'm sure I'll be ready."
"I'm old and bad tempered."
"I think I will."
"It's been a long talk, but there's nothing on my desk."
"I heard there might be one," she revealed
"In a virtual interview in April, when the Oscar winner talked about PD3, he was both optimistic and skeptical."
"Queen Andrews gave a personal update on the third film."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After all, Rob really could use all the support he can get right now, especially if Lamar is sober and taking care of himself again.”
“Maybe there is a chance that, in the future, Lamar and Rob can reconnect.”
“Despite the former brother in laws being on the outs, it really sounds like Lamar Odom still cares for his former roommate.”
“The former NBA star claims to be sober and very happy.”
“Lamar said that he’s in a really good place right now.”
“That was due to the fact that Lamar hurt Khloe so bad and Rob is her brother, after all.”
“Lamar Odom also recently said that he doesn’t blame Rob for walking away from him after his split from Khloe.”
“It’s not like he can travel back and not post Blac Chyna’s nude photos to Instagram.”
“News that Rob should “Stay strong.”Then Lamar followed up his first little bit of wisdom by saying, “Put God first.”That might be some pretty good advice, especially in Rob’s case where the damage is already done.”
“Lamar told Erin Lim from E!”


"After all, rob really needs all the support he can get now, especially if Lamar is sober and can take care of himself."
"Maybe in the future, Lamar and rob will have a chance to get back in touch."
"Although the ex brother-in-law is out, it sounds like Odom is still concerned about his ex roommate."
"The former NBA star claims to be sober and happy."
"Lamar says he's in a good position now."
"That's because Lamar hurt Chloe so badly. Rob is her brother after all."
"Lamar Odom recently said he would not blame Rob for leaving him after breaking up with Heller."
"He can't go back, he can't post a naked picture of blac Chyna on instagram."
There is news that rob should "stay strong.". Then Lamar went on with his first bit of wisdom and said, "put God first." This could be some very good advice, especially if rob has done damage
"Lamar told Erin to go from e!"



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Former One Directioner Harry Styles, Grammy winner Miguel, Hamilton alum Leslie Odom Jr. and Chinese pop sensation Jane Zhang are set to sing on the runway, VSFS executive producer Ed Razek said in a statement.”
““We are incredibly thrilled to have them with us,” he added.”
“Styles performing on tour in September Getty ImagesThe announcement follows reports that Katy Perry, who was rumored to perform in Shanghai, was banned from entering China.”
“Gigi Hadid, who was confirmed to walk in this year’s show, was also reportedly denied entry.”
“Word spread that the event was turning into a “media crisis,” but Razek denied those rumors.”
““The news reports I’ve been reading from the US here in Shanghai regarding this year’s Victoria’s Secret Fashion Show are not an accurate reflection of what I’m seeing and experiencing on site,” he told People.”
““The Chinese have been wonderful and enthusiastic hosts and partners,” he added.”
““From granting more than 700 visas, collaborating with us on every detail and introducing us to local experts who have helped us elevate our event in this renowned fashion city.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Former director Harry styles, Grammy Award winner Miguel, Hamilton alumni Leslie Odom Jr. and Chinese pop singer Jane Zhang will perform on stage T," VSFS executive producer ed razek said in a statement
"We are very happy to have them with us," he added
In September, it was reported that Katie Perry, who was rumored to be performing in Shanghai, was banned from China
"Gigi Hadid was confirmed to be on this year's show and he was also reported to have been denied entry."
"It is said that this incident is evolving into a" media crisis ", but razek denied these rumors."
"The news reports I read in Shanghai from the United States about this year's Victoria Secret fashion show do not accurately reflect what I saw and experienced at the scene," he told people magazine
"The Chinese have always been great and enthusiastic hosts and partners," he added
"From issuing more than 700 visas, working with us on every detail and introducing us to local experts, they have helped us enhance our activities in this famous fashion city."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prattes told PEOPLE that he was thrilled — but nervous — to step into Swayze’s shoes for the iconic role.”
“While Twitter users largely slammed the Dirty Dancing remake online they were fans of Prattes and his body...”
“...ahead of the remake Colt Prattes decided to follow an unconventional diet to prep for his role in the Dirty Dancing remake one inspired by Matthew McConaughey s extreme weight loss plan to play an AIDS patient in Dallas Buyer...”
“...s Club...”
“Prattes — whose abs and love of weight lifting are well-documented on his Instagram — says he had to slim down to fit the look of the era.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I actually had to lose about 20 to 30 lbs.”
“...for the movie because nobody was that big in the ’60s,” he told E!”
“...at the movie’s PaleyLive premiere.”
“I went on Matthew McConaughey s Dallas Buyer s Club diet as quick as I could Image zoom Matthew McConaughey in Dallas Buyer s Club Credit Anne Marie Fox Focus Features Everett Prattes who took on Patrick Swayze s original...”


"Platts tells people that he's excited, but also nervous, to be able to play this iconic role in Swazi's shoes."
"When Twitter users attacked this dirty dance remake online, they were fans of Pratt and his body..."
“…… Before the remake, colt Platt decided to follow an unconventional diet to prepare for his role in the remake of dirty dance, which was inspired by Matthew McConaughey's extreme weight loss program. He will play an AIDS patient in Dallas... "
“… S Club... "
"Pratt's ABS and love of weightlifting are well documented on his instagram, and he says he has to lose weight to fit in with the look of the times."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I actually have to lose 20 to 30 pounds."
“…… Because nobody in the '60s was that big a movie, "he told e!"
“… "At the premiere of the movie's Paley live"
"I'm on a diet at Matthew McConnell Dallas buyers club as soon as I can image zoom Matthew McConnell at Dallas Buyers Club Credit Anne Mary fox key features Everett Platt who bears Patrick Swazi's original..."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, when Julius signs with >>”
“Meanwhile, Corey >>WAGS Miami Season 2 Episode 3 – ‘Dueling Matchmakers’ On episode 3, Hencha goes ballistic when Faven sets up Astrid instead of her, and Darnell realizes that she needs to reprioritize her career.”
“Ashley s WAGS Miami Season 2 Episode 4 Hencha s Revenge On episode 4 Hencha gets revenge on Astrid and Ashley dreads breaking the news to her opinionated soon to be mother in law that they are having a destination wedding...”
“Meanwhile sparks fly when Darnell interviews a new athlete for her podcast and WAGS Miami Season 2 Episode 5 LA Bachelorette Bound On episode 5 things get heated when Astrid finds out that Kayla has been acting two faced on the low and sparks fly when the ladies clash during...”
“>>WAGS Miami Season 2 Episode 6 – Double D’s On episode 6, Ashley’s bachelorette party jumps off while Phil has his own night out.”
“...season finale sparks fly when Ashley and Phyllis get into a huge fight the day before her wedding when Phyllis starts to question Ashley s mothering skills...”
“WAGS Atlanta Season 1 Episode 1 Peaches Prayers and Players On the season premiere Kaylin deals with shocking news about her pro baseball player husband and Kesha enlists the help of her friend Telli to deal with trust issues with WAGS Miami Season 2 Episode 7 Hurricane Phyllis On the...”


"At the same time, when Julius signed > >"
"At the same time, Corey wavered in Miami Season 2 Episode 3 duel matchmaker. When French arranged Astrid to replace her, Henchard was furious, and Danielle realized that she needed to rearrange her career."
"Ashley swing Miami Season 2 Episode 4 hencha revenge Episode 4 hencha revenge Astrid and Ashley afraid to break the news, her opinionated mother-in-law, they are holding a destination wedding..."
"At the same time, when Danielle interviewed a new athlete for her podcast and released the fifth episode of" Bachelor "in Miami Season 2, Episode 5, sparks were all over the place. When Astrid found out that Kayla had been playing a double faced role in the low places, things got heated when the ladies were When there is a conflict, sparks are everywhere. "
"> > swing Miami Season 2 Episode 6 - Episode 6 double D, Ashley's bachelor party jumps down, and Phil has his own night."
“…… When Ashley and Phyllis have a big fight the day before the wedding and Phyllis begins to question Ashley's parenting skills, the last episode of the season is full of sparks.... "
"WAGGS Atlanta Season 1 Episode 1 peaches pray and players deal with shocking news at this season's premiere. Her professional baseball player husband and Kesha fight for her friend Terry to help deal with trust issues with WAGGS Miami Season 2 Episode 7 hurricane Phyllis in..."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It changes everything when you accept who you are and don't try to change yourself."”
“"They also say that you should never let what other people do affect what you want to do.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoCindy Crawford speaks at the Partnership for a Healthier America summit on May 12.”
“File Photo by Kevin Dietsch/UPI | License PhotoCindy Crawford (R) with son Presley Gerber, husband Rande Gerber and daughter Kaia Gerber (L-R) at the Disneyland premiere of "Tomorrowland" on May 9, 2015.”
“The model congratulated Kaia on earning her driver's license Tuesday.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoSept. 6 (UPI) -- Cindy Crawford celebrated another milestone in daughter Kaia Gerber's life this week.”
“The 51-year-old model congratulated Gerber, her younger child with husband Rande Gerber, after the burgeoning model earned her driver's license days after her 16th birthday.”
“Advertisement"Baby driver.”
“Congrats on passing your driver's test @KaiaGerber!"”
“...she captioned a photo on Instagram of the teenager.”


"Everything changes when you accept who you are and don't try to change yourself."
"They also say you must not let what others do affect what you want to do."
"On May 12, Jim rumen / UPU information photo | Yin Crawford spoke at the" healthy America partnership "summit."
"On May 9, 2015, at the premiere of tomorrow's World Disneyland, Indy Crawford (right) posed with his son Presley Gerber, husband Rand Gerber and daughter Kaya Gerber (left-right) for a photo of Kevin dittesh / UPI | license."
"The model congratulated Kaya on her driver's license on Tuesday."
"Information photo / UPI | license photo of Jim ruymen. On the 6th, Cindy Crawford celebrated another milestone in her daughter Kaya Gerber's life this week
The 51 year old model got her driver's license just days after her 16th birthday and congratulated Gerber, the youngest daughter of her husband and her husband, Rand Gerber
"Advertising" baby drivers
"Congratulations on passing Kaia Gerber's driving test!"
“…… She added a title to the teenager's photo on instagram. "



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are paired with professional dancers as they vie for the title of “America’s Favorite Dancer.”“So You Think You Can Dance” starts its 14th season on June 12.”
“The series features a group of contestants aged 18 to 30 who must showcase their skills in a variety of dance styles.”
“!” she said.”
““So excited!!”
“Hudgens, who came to fame as a star of the “High School Musical” franchise, starred last year as Betty Rizzo in Fox’s live presentation of “Grease.”The 28-year-old actress celebrated the new job with a late night tweet.”
““There was instant chemistry in the audition rounds, and I know the ‘SYTYCD’ fans will love her as much as we do.”“Vanessa is an accomplished artist and brings her own brand of enthusiasm and energy to our panel,” he added.”
““I am so excited for Vanessa to join Mary and me on the judging panel for the 14th season of ‘So You Think You Can Dance,’” said Lythgoe, who also serves as one of the shows executive producers, in a statement.”
“Actress Vanessa Hudgens will be joining Nigel Lythgoe and Mary Murphy at the judges table of the popular Fox reality dance show.”
“Story highlights The actress starred last year in Fox's live presentation of "Grease" SYTYCD's new season starts June 12(CNN) —“So You Think You Can Dance” is getting a new judge.”


They partner with professional dancers and compete for the title of "America's most popular dancer". "So you think you can dance" Season 14 starts on June 12
"This series features a group of players aged between 18 and 30 who have to show their skills in a variety of dance styles."
"!" she said
"So excited!"
Huggins is a star in the high school musical series. Last year, she played Betty Rizzo on Fox's grease live show. The 28 year old actress celebrated her new job on late night twitter
He added: "during the audition, the audience instantly resonated and I knew that fans of 'sytycd' would love her as much as we do."
"I'm glad Vanessa and Mary and I were on the jury for Season 14 of make you think you can dance," lesgo, who is also one of the show's executive producers, said in a statement
"Actress Vanessa Huggins will join Nigel lesgo and Mary Murphy on the fox reality show
The story focuses on the actress's live performance "so you think you can dance" in the new season "grease" broadcast on Fox TV on June 12 last year, which won a new judge



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fans of “The Rock” will remember his rise to fame as a professional wrestler where his famous saying was, “Can you smell what “The Rock” is cooking?””
“In fact, he comes in at number 2 on Forbes 2017 list just after Mark Wahlberg.”
“Advertisement“My good friend and the godfather of Universal, Ron Meyer, has granted me the time to do just that.” As for the former-wrestler-turned-actor, Dwayne Johnson, in recent years, has worked hard to make himself one of the highest paid actors in the world.”
“Diesel added that like any well-used vehicle, the franchise requires maintenance.”
“...movie of the series...”
“Such a beautiful island According to the leading star of the series a woman on Facebook requested that he work with The Rock and Vin listened to her request and he became Hobbs Additionally Vin said it s not anyone s fault when referring to the rescheduling of the ninth...”
“I can remember it like it was yesterday.”
“...he wrote on his Instagram page Brotherhood and all its complexities He added this scene was filmed in Puerto Rico...”
“Just a few days before Tyrese s ex wife accused him of child abuse the actor used his social media account to insult Dwayne s role in Baywatch while simultaneously stating the actor made the franchise all about him However Vin appears to be unfazed by all of the drama...”
“As you may already know, this angered Tyrese Gibson, who took to Instagram several times to blame Dwayne for the delay of the movie.”


Fans of rock will remember when he became famous as a professional wrestler. His famous saying was, "can you smell what rock is cooking?"
"In fact, he ranked second on the Forbes 2017 list, after mark Warburg."
"Advertising" is my good friend and godfather of Universal Pictures. Ron Meyer has given me such time. "As for Dwyane Johnson, a former wrestler, he has made great efforts to become one of the highest earning actors in the world in recent years."
"Like any well used vehicle, the franchise needs to be maintained," he added
“… Movie series... "
"Such a beautiful island, according to the protagonist of the series, a woman asks him on Facebook with rock and Wen. After listening to her request, he becomes Hobbes. In addition, Wen says that it's not anyone's fault when it comes to rearranging ninth..."
"I remember it just like yesterday."
“… He wrote on instagram about brotherhood and its complexity, adding that the scene was filmed in Puerto Rico... "
"Just a few days before tyris's ex-wife accused him of child abuse, the actor used his social media account to insult Dwayne's role in Gulf watch, and said that the actor had made a series for himself, but Wen didn't seem to be worried about it..."
"As you probably know, this infuriated tyris Gibson, who had been on instagram several times accusing Dwayne of delaying the film."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spoiling yourself this V-Day is all about wants rather than needs—but trust me when I say you prob also need these in your life.”
“Below, I've rounded up 32 of the best Valentine's Day gifts for yourself—from a luxury candle that'll sit gorgeously on your coffee table to a fancy blow dryer that's well worth the money.”
“And if you've never used V-Day as an excuse indulge in a little retail therapy, then I highly recommend you try it this year.”
“...random Sunday...”
“No I love Valentine s Day because I use it as an excuse to buy myself a really freaking good makeup gift or new trendy pair of shoes ya know stuff that I wouldn t normally buy myself on a...”
“...a fan of it...”
“And it s not because of the cheesy IG captions or the in your face decorations or the fancy romantic dates or the existential crises that can creep up on you if you re single on V Day and not...”
“I freaking love Valentine’s Day.”


"On this Valentine's day, you spoil yourself for what you want, not for what you need, but trust me when I say you may need it in your life."
"Now, I've selected 32 of the best Valentine's Day gifts for you, from the luxurious candles on your coffee table to the very worthwhile hairdryer."
"If you've never used V-day as an excuse to indulge in a little retail therapy, I strongly recommend you try it this year."
“… "Sunday..."
"No, I like Valentine's day, because I bought myself a very good make-up gift or a pair of fashionable shoes on this excuse. You know, I usually don't buy things for myself..."
“… Its fans... "
"It's not because of the tacky funny subtitles, or the decorations on your face, or the fancy romantic dates, or if you're single on Valentine's day instead of..."
"I love Valentine's day very much."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In one of the pictures, the Baywatch star was seen stepping out of a car with Jonas opening the door for her.”
“The rumoured couple also attended the Beauty and the Beast Live in Concert at the Hollywood Bowl a few weeks ago.”
“However, while the duo were here in India, they kept us enthralled with their many appearances.”
“From her and Nick s two dinner outing with her mother Madhu Chopra their high profile Goa vacation and their show of love at the big fat Ambani engagement Akash and Shloka s engagement party was held on Thursday in Mumbai the power duo have been trending on the internet...”
“...since day 1 of their arrival...”
“It was in India that the duo made their relationship Instagram official -- while Nick shared a video of Priyanka as she walked towards him, simply writing ‘her’ on it, Priyanka shared a photo of her ‘favourite men’ Nick and brother Siddharth from Goa.”
“No surprise then that speculation suggests that before August is over, we will have Nick and Priyanka engaged to each other.”
“Priyanka and Nick are also each other’s ‘plus one’ these days.”
“If Nick had the Quantico star with him as he attended his cousin’s wedding, Priyanka -- looking red hot -- walked hand-in-hand with Nick at a pre-wedding bash hosted by Mukesh Ambani for son Aksha Ambani and Shloka Mehta.”
“Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas pose for photos at the Ambani bash.”


"In one of the photos, someone saw the" Bay watch "star walk out of a car and Jonas opens the door for her."
"The couple in the rumor also attended the Hollywood Bowl live concert of beauty and the beast a few weeks ago."
"However, when they were in India, we were fascinated by their multiple appearances."
"Starting from her two dinner trips with Nick and her mother Madu Chopra, their high-profile Goa holiday and their love show at the big fat Ambani engagement party, the engagement party of Akash and shyloka was held in Mumbai on Thursday, and the power combination was all the rage on the Internet..."
“… From the first day they arrived... "
"It was in India that the two formally established their relationship on instagram - Nick shared a video of Priyanka walking towards him, only with" she "written on it, while Priyanka shared a picture of her" favorite man "Nick and her brother sidath from Goa."
"There's no doubt we'll get Nick and Priyanka engaged by the end of August."
"Priyanka and Nick are also adding one to each other these days."
"If Nick is accompanied by a Quantico star at his cousin's wedding, Priyanka - it looks hot - will walk with Nick at Mukesh Ambani's premarital carnival for his sons aksha Ambani and shyloka Mehta."
"Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas at the Ambani party."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Most people would be achy and woozy and unattractive to anyone in the vicinity, but most people are not Pete Davidson, aka the love of Ariana Grande's life.”
“Take a look at some photos from Ariana Grande nursing Pete Davidson back to health after surgery, and side note: Please enjoy the variety of celebrities that have commented on the saga.”
“They need to make appointments for maxillofacial surgeries that require intense aftercare, too.”
“Ariana Grande supported Pete Davidson after wisdom teeth surgery, and the resulting photos are hilarious.”
“It's not currently known how many teeth the comedian had pulled, but it was obviously enough to make him a little more groggy than usual.”
“Grande and Davidson, true to form, documented the entire experience on social media, and honestly?”
“It's the most relatable the couple has seemed yet.”
“Unlike so many aspects of their relationship, this one brings out a resounding #beenthere from fans.”
“Grande began to nurse Davidson to health after his surgery on Friday, July 13 according to their Instagram posts.”
“They took a few goofy photos of Davidson with filters, but he napped through most of the day.”


"Most people will feel pain, dizziness and unattractive to anyone nearby, but most people are not the love of Peter Davidson or Arianna grand's life."
"Take a look at some photos of Ariana Grande nursing Pete Davidson back to health after the operation, sidenote: please enjoy the comments of various celebrities on this legend."
"They also need to make an appointment for maxillofacial surgery, which also requires intensive care."
"Ariana Grande supported Peter Davidson after wisdom tooth surgery, and the picture was funny."
"It's not known how many teeth the comedian pulled out, but it's obviously enough to make him sleepier than usual."
"Grand and Davidson, in real form, record the whole social media experience, to be honest?"
"This is the couple's closest ever."
"Unlike many aspects of their relationship, this time it brought a warm welcome from fans."
"On Friday, July 13, grand began nursing Davidson to get him back to health."
"They took some silly pictures of Davidson with a filter, but he was napping most of the day."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When Emma meets with Fiona, she rips out her heart but she cannot crush it.”
“Henry, upset that Emma has decided to turn over her heart to Fiona, throws his book in disgust, only to discover a page in the book that reveals that Emma's heart was gifted with the magic of song, placed there by The Blue Fairy.”
“[clarification needed] In Oz, Zelena spies on their conversation and believes that Rumplestiltskin might come to regret choosing Regina over her.”
“He then tells her to figure out a way in order to prove herself.”
“Regina asks for his help in erasing the wish, but he refuses, telling her that he would rather gouge out his eyes with a rusty fork than sing.”
“Regina visits Rumplestiltskin, who is not affected by the wish, at his cell.”
“Hook refuses their offer of gold and explains that revenge on Rumplestiltskin is all that he desires ("Revenge Is Gonna Be Mine").”
“Meanwhile, David and Snow visit a tavern to enlist Hook to help them search for Regina.”
“The wish also affects Regina, who notices that the entire forest is singing ("The Queen Sings") and makes a plan to destroy everyone's happiness ("Love Doesn't Stand a Chance").”
“The next day, the wish comes true: Snow and David break into song and realize that they can defeat Regina through the power of music ("Powerful Magic").”


"When Emma meets Fiona, she tears her heart, but she can't crush it."
Henry is upset about Emma's decision to give her heart to Fiona. He throws away his book in disgust, only to find a page in the book that shows that Emma's heart is put there by the Smurfs and endowed with magic.
"[to be clarified] in the wizard of Oz, zelina spies into their conversation and believes that rumpstilsky may regret choosing Regina over her."
"Then he asked her to find a way to prove herself."
"Regina asked him to help him eliminate his desire, but he refused, telling her that he would rather dig out his eyes with a rusty fork than sing."
"Regina went to her cell to see rempstilski, who was not affected by her wishes."
"Hooker rejected the gold they offered and explained that revenge on rumpstilkin was his only wish (" revenge will be mine ")
"Meanwhile, David and snow visit a pub and ask hooker to help them find Regina."
"This desire also affected Regina, who noticed that the whole forest was singing (" Queen singing ") and planned to destroy everyone's happiness (" love is untenable ")
The next day, the wish came true: snow and David began to sing, realizing that they could defeat Regina through the power of music ("powerful magic")



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...be another moment...”
“I mean, we’ve, like, been through it.”Bryant also detailed how the former SNL writer proposed.”
“The Saturday Night Live star recently wed her longtime love, Conner O’Malley.”
“Bryant, 30, shared the news on Monday, April 30, via Instagram.”
““,” she simply wrote alongside a photo of herself walking down the aisle with her new husband.”
“The I Feel Pretty actress announced during an April 2017 appearance on Late Night with Seth Meyers that she was engaged to O’Malley.”
““We’ve been together a long time; we’ve been together almost nine years.”
“So, a lot of the shimmer and shine has faded and we’re just living every damn day as best we can,” Bryant told Meyers about her relationship.”
““We’ve seen each other through a lot.”
“Like, he used to work as a full-blown garbage man — not a joke, just a garbage man.”


“… In a moment... "
"I mean, we've been through it." Kobe also detailed how the former SNL writer proposed
"The Saturday night live star recently married her beloved Connor O'Malley."
"Kobe, 30, shared the news on Monday, April 30 through instagram."
"She just wrote next to a picture of herself and her new husband walking down the aisle."
"I think the beautiful actress announced in a late night appearance with Seth Meyers in April 2017 that she was engaged to O'Malley."
"We've been together for a long time; we've been together for nearly nine years."
"So a lot of the flash and light has faded, and we're just doing our best every day," Kobe told Meyers of her relationship
"We've been through a lot with each other."
"For example, he used to be a complete dustman - no kidding, just a dustman."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“...the frigid English climate...”
“The 13 Reasons Why star took to social media on Tuesday after a “Best of Grindr” Instagram account posted a screenshot of a tweet poking fun at pics of the cute couple sharing a passionate makeout session outside of the Soho House in London earlier this week.”
““Congratulations to Sam Smith on what looks like his first ever kiss,” the tweet read.”
“Flynn weighed in on the post with a comment, conveying his thoughts with a simple crying emoji.”
“BackgridInstagramSam Smith Admits He's In Love But Says His Music Will 'Never Be That Happy' (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Embed Code Restart Sam Smith Admits He s In Love But Says His Music Will Never Be That Happy Exclusive The cute couple is spending some time in London following the Brit Awards last week and it appears that Flynn a Florida native is having a hard time adjusting to...”
“He posted an Instagram pic on Tuesday captioned “F***ing Freezing,” with a photo credit to Smith.”
“Official See the Cute Pic...”


Related libraries
“… Cold British climate... "
Star appeared on social media on Tuesday for 13 reasons after an instagram account called "the best Grindr" earlier this week posted a microblog screenshot of the lovely couple's passionate blind date outside London's Soho building
"Congratulations to Sam Smith, it looks like his first kiss," tweeted
Flynn commented on the post, using a simple sobbing expression to express his thoughts
"Backgrid instagram Sam Smith admitted that he was in love, but he said his music would never be so happy." (exclusive) this video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information. "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Sam Smith admits that he's in love, but he says his music will never be so happy. The lovely couple spent some time in London after last week's British Music Awards. It seems that Flynn is a native of Florida and it's hard to adapt..."
On Tuesday, he posted an image on instagram, titled "frozen," from Smith
"Look at that lovely picture..."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Only the voice actor for Black Order member Corvus Glaive has yet to be revealed.”
“Both Notary and Vaughn-Lawlor also performed the motion capture for their characters on set.”
““The Square” star Terry Notary is voicing fellow member Cull Obsidian.”
“The in-demand actress has also recently completed production on “Kin,” directed by Jonathan and Josh Baker, and Steve McQueen’s Chicago-set crime drama “Widows.”Proxima Midnight is the only female member of the Black Order, the league of Thanos’ henchmen.”
““Legacy” premiered at the South by Southwest festival last month.”
“The Legacy of a Whitetail Deer Hunter opposite Josh Brolin who voices and performed the motion capture for Thanos in Avengers Infinity War...”
“Carrie Coon carriecoon April 16 2018 Coon was nominated for a Primetime Emmy for leading actress in a limited series or movie for her role as Gloria Burgle in the third season of FX s Fargo She recently appeared in Steven Spielberg s The Post and Jody Hill s comedy...”
“#MoCapWhilePregnant.”To be fair, my face is in there somewhere.”
“To be fair my face is in there somewhere.”
“My voice and a dazzle of gifted animators have teamed up to play Proxima Midnight.”


"Only the dubbing actors of the Black Knights, kofus gleev, have not been revealed."
"The notary and Vaughn Lawler also did motion capture for their characters on the set."
"Plaza" star Terry notary is speaking to fellow member Carl obsidian
The popular actress also recently completed the production of Jonathan and Josh Baker's family and Steve McQueen's Chicago crime drama widow. Prosima midnight is the only female member of the black order, that is, tanos's followers Union
Heritage premiered at the south by Southwest Film Festival last month
"The legacy of a white tailed deer hunter is the opposite of Josh Brolin, who voiced tanos and performed motion capture in the endless war of the Avengers..."
"Carrie coon carricon April 16, 2018 coon received an Emmy nomination for her role as Gloria Burge in the third season of FX s Fargo. She recently starred in Steven Spielberg's post and Jodie Hill's comedy..."
“MoCapWhilePregnant。” To be fair, my face is somewhere there
"To be fair, my face is somewhere over there."
"My voice played" before midnight "with a group of talented animators."



**Something goes wrong**
“"I would very much like to be excluded from this narrative, one that I have never asked to be a part of, since 2009."”
“Taylor and Kanye's beef reached a head after Kanye released his track Famous with the lyrics: "I feel like me and Taylor might still have sex, Why?”
“The Luther actor, 45, said he had to present an award with Taylor Swift who was deep in her feud with Kim Kardashian and Kanye West at the time.”
“He admitted he was clueless about their longstanding beef, but did sense something was off.”
“In a game of Confirm or Deny with the New York Times , he was asked if playing the role of co-host at the Oscars of fashion was stressful.”
““Deny.”
“It was great.”
“I felt really famous that day,” he shared.”
““It was a bit awkward because Taylor Swift and I had to present an award.”
“"We were walking through the crowd and obviously, there was a little beef between Taylor and Kanye.”


"I very much want to be excluded from this narrative, and I have never asked to be a part of it since 2009."
After Taylor and Kanye's beef reached the head, Kanye released the famous lyrics of his song: "I think Taylor and I may still have sex. Why?"
The 45 year old Lutheran actor said he had to present the award to Taylor Swift, who had deep grudges with Kim Kardashian and Kanye West
"He admitted that he knew nothing about their long-term beef, but he did feel something was wrong."
"In a confirmation or denial game with the New York Times, he was asked if there was pressure to play the role of co host at the fashion Oscars."
"Refused. “
"Great."
"I felt famous that day," he said
"It's a bit embarrassing because Tyler swift and I have to give awards."
"We were walking through the crowd, and obviously there was a little bit of a dispute between Taylor and Kanye."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: GettyWhat are your thoughts on Miles' adorably family photo?”
“She accompanied her parents to the launch of his new Legend Vineyards Exclusive (LVE) rosé in Beverly Hills earlier this week.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyDon't forget about little Luna though!”
“She debuted him to the world only a couple of days after giving birth.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: INSTARImagesChrissy gave birth to her second child in mid-May (they are already parents to 2-year-old Luna).”
“Her baby boy adorably looked to the side as Dede and Marjorie flashed a big smile for the beautiful family photo.”
“Awe!”
“...she captioned the photo.”
“"Miles with Dede and Granny!"”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: what do you think of miles' lovely family photo?"
"Earlier this week, she accompanied her parents at Beverly Hills to the launch of his new legend vineyards exclusive (LV) rose."
The article continues with the following advertising source: don't forget little Luna
"She introduced him to the world a few days after giving birth."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: instarimages Chrissy gave birth to her second child in mid May (they are the parents of Luna, 2 years old)
"As Dede and Marjorie smile for this beautiful family photo, her baby boy looks lovingly to one side."
"Awe
“… She added a title to the photo. "
"Miles is with Dede and grandma!"



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But the truth is we just weren’t getting along.””
“...on the show...”
“...couple officially split the 52 year old former countess was once again faced with rumors of Tom s infidelities from her fellow New York City Housewives this time allegedly taking place after the couple had said their I dos Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“Of course, Luann has a lot of experience knocking down these sorts of claims, having spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance.”
“But on the reunion, Luann showed a more vulnerable side — admitting that it alarms her to hear the constant rumors.”
“Asked what she would do if those claims ended up having validity, Luann gave a swift answer.”
““I would definitely leave,” she said in a clip of the reunion released Wednesday morning.”
““I would.”
“After I kill him.”
“I’d kill him first and then I’d leave.”


"But the truth is we don't get along well."
“… In the show
“… The 52 year old former countess, who is officially separated from the couple, is once again facing rumors of Tom's infidelity from a New York City housewife, this time after the couple said they "will receive news features and more tweets..."
"Of course, Luan has a lot of experience in refuting this claim. He spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance."
"But during the reunion, Luan showed a more vulnerable side - admitting that she was alerted by constant rumors."
"When asked what she would do if these statements worked out, Luan gave a quick answer."
"I will definitely leave," she said in a reunion clip released on Wednesday morning
"I will."
"After I killed him."
"I'll kill him first and then leave."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Thank you to @HRC, my friends and family who have given me superpowers, and to all those who came before me and made my journey that much easier," he wrote on Twitter.”
“Rippon was in Los Angeles Saturday to accept HRC's Visibility Award.”
“Fortunately, Greisman didn't have to wait that long.”
“The skater told "The View" co-hosts that he reached out to Field and her son to offer them tickets to "Stars on Ice," which he will join when it debuts next month.”
“How brazen!"”
“Recently on ABC's "The View," Rippon shared his reaction after seeing Field's tweet: "Sally!”
“While Greisman was careful not to reveal the athlete's identity, his mother had no such qualms, retweeting Greisman's tweet and addressing it directly to the 28-year-old figure skater.”
“Find a way," Field texted.”
“"Sam ... he’s insanely pretty.”
“Greisman shared a text message conversation with his mother about the athlete.”


"Thank you @ HRC, my friends and family, for giving me superpowers and all the people who came here before me to make my journey easier," he tweeted
"Rippon received the Human Rights Council's visibility award in Los Angeles on Saturday."
"Fortunately, gresman didn't have to wait that long."
The skater told the co hosts that he contacted field and her son to offer them tickets for "ice star," which he will join next month at its premiere
"What a shame!"
Recently, on ABC's "opinion" program, Rippon shared his reaction after seeing field's microblog: "Sally!"
"Although gresman was very careful not to disclose the identity of the athlete, his mother didn't have such concerns. She forwarded gresman's microblog and addressed the 28 year old figure skater directly."
"Find a way," field texted
"Sam... He's beautiful. "
"Gresman shared a text conversation with his mother about the athlete."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“Not only does he connect people with their past but he brought back a memory for Becky that showed off a very vulnerable and very real side for her fans.”
“That frame was one of the things I took from my room.”
“I was obsessed with Disney.”
“The frame … at the same time as I had it, one of my rooms, everything was decorated Tinker Bell.”
“That’s so weird.”
“During the clip, Becky responds, "What was it?”
“I don’t know what that is."”
“RELATED: Becky G and Austin Mahone Reunite On Stage Proving Yes, They Indeed Are Still FriendsTyler, at first, said, "Tinker Bell.”
“Tyler is literally incredible.”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
"He not only connects people with their past, but also brings back a memory for Becky, showing her fans a very fragile and real side."
"That frame is one of the things I took from the room."
"I'm crazy about Disney."
"This framework Just as I had it, I had a room where everything was jingling
"It's strange."
During the editing, Becky replied, "what's that?"
"I don't know what that is."
"Related reports: Becky g and Austin Mahone's reunion on stage proved that, yes, they were still friends at first," Tinker said
"Taylor is incredible."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH BELOW: Prince Harry talks about his mother, Princess Diana...”
“The series was nominated for plenty of high-profile awards, so no doubt former Oscar-nominee Rosamund will be hotly-tipped during awards season.”
“The series will centre around Diana and Charles' relationshipRosamund Pike is the actress tipped to play Princess Diana in the next series of Feud, according to The Evening Standard's The Londoner column.”
“The article also predicts that Matthew Goode, who played Lord Snowdon in The Crown, will take on the part of Prince Charles.”
“The next installment of the series, created by American Horror Story and American Crime Story executive producer Ryan Murphy, was confirmed to be focused on Charles and Diana in April 2017.”
“If true, this will be the Gone Girl actress' first big TV role since appearing in Women In Love in 2011.”
“The series will centre around Charles and Diana's relationshipREAD MORE: Royal baby excitement: see Kate Middleton, Prince William, Prince Harry as babiesAccording to the column, the production company is yet to confirm the casting news, but filming is set to start next month.”
“The show will address the year between Diana and Charles' divorce and her tragic death in 1997.”
“Speaking about the new series on an industry panel last year, executive producer Ryan said: "Having a show called Feud is interesting because...feuds are about pain.”
“So Charles and Diana’s story literally begins with the filing of the divorce papers.”


"Look below: Prince Harry talks about his mother, Princess Diana..."
"The series has received a lot of high-profile nominations, so there is no doubt that former Oscar nominee Rosamund will be popular in the award season."
According to the London column of the evening news, the play will focus on the relationship between Princess Diana and Charles. Rosamund Peck is Princess Diana in the next revenge
"The article also predicts that Matthew good, who plays Lord Snowden on the throne, will play Prince Charles."
"The next issue of the series, by Ryan Murphy, executive producer of American horror story and American crime story, confirms that it will focus on Charles and Diana in April 2017."
"If that's true, it's going to be the dead actress's first big TV role since she starred in women in love in 2011."
"The series will focus on the relationship between Charles and Diana. Read more: the excitement of the Royal baby: treat Kate Middleton, Prince William and Prince Harry as babies. According to the column, the production company has yet to confirm the casting news, but filming will start next month."
"It's about the year between Diana and Charles' divorce and her tragic death in 1997."
"There's a show called old grudge that's very interesting because Old grudges are about pain. "
"So the story of Charles and Diana begins with the filing of divorce papers."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read on to see the photos of Goldberg at Jason Wu.”
“Fingers crossed.”
“Can we get seated next to her at the next show?”
“Wearing a relaxed look consisting of a beanie, denim jacket, jeans, and the aforementioned Zebra shoes, Goldberg was the epitome of fashion week casualism—and she couldn't look any cooler.”
“Goldberg attended the Jason Wu show during the second day of New York Fashion Week, sitting next to Amy Fine Collins, Doutzen Kroes, Zosia Mamet, and Virginia Gardner.”
“Does it get any better than that?”
“But for Whoopi Goldberg, her front-row must-haves include some amazing zebra Crocs and a glass of wine.”
“Fashion week essentials usually include comfortable heels and plenty of caffeine.”


"Please continue to read Goldberg's photos in wujiesen."
"Pray."
"Can we sit next to her in the next performance?"
"Goldberg, wearing a loose robe, denim jacket, jeans and the aforementioned zebra shoes, is the epitome of fashion week's leisureness. She doesn't look cool at all."
"On the second day of New York Fashion Week, Goldberg took part in Wu's fashion show and sat next to Amy Finn Collins, Dorson cross, zoscia MAME and Virginia Gardner."
"Is there anything better?"
"But for UBI Goldberg, she has to have some amazing zebra crocodiles and a glass of wine in the front row."
"The essentials of fashion week usually include comfortable high heels and lots of caffeine."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/v4Y2MojZMA — Anacaona’s bloom (@IamCiiny) April 15, 2018”
“Lmao.”
“According to Entertainment Tonight, Tyga and Azalea began the weekend by showing up to a Palm Springs party together—arriving hand in hand.”
“The party was also attended by Tyga's ex-girlfriend Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott.”
“The Weeknd, Nicki Minaj, Quavo, Chance the Rapper, and other notable guests also made appearances at the star-studded TAO x Revolve Coachella party.”
“Then, over the weekend, Tyga and Azalea were spotted hanging out at Coachella.”
“Tyga Iggy Azalea Jasmine Sanders and Terrence JCoachella Day 2 pic.twitter.com/8RIGJUwbqq — COACHELLA 2018 (@COACHELLAFILES) April 15, 2018Later in the evening, the Shade Room captured video of the pair in the Coachella crowd together.”
“Iggy Azalea and Tyga at #Coachella tonight!”
“...pic.twitter.com/rutVqBnewC — IGGY AZALEA DAILY (@IADaily) April 15, 2018This is the second time the two have been seen at a festival this spring.”
“In March, Azalea made a surprise appearance during Tyga's set at the Jumanji Festival in Melbourne.”


“... pic.twitter.com/v4Y2MojZMA -15 April 2018
“Lmao。”
"According to entertainment tonight, TEGA and Rhododendron joined hands at a party in Palm Springs on the first day of the weekend."
"Also at the party were TEGA's ex girlfriends Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott."
"At the weekend, Nicky Minagi, kwavo, rapper chambers and other famous guests also appeared at the starry Tao x rotating Coachella party."
At the weekend, TEGA and Rhododendron were found wandering in cochella
"Tegaiji azalea Jasmine sanders and Terence chocera day 2 pic.twitter.com/8RIGJUwbqq -Colchella, 2018 (@ colchellafiles) late on April 15, 2018, a video of two people together in the colchella crowd was taken in the shade room. "
"Ejie Rhododendron and TEGA are in cochella tonight!"
“... pic.twitter.com/rutVqBnewC -On April 15, 2018, IQI azalea daily (@ iadaily) made their second appearance at the festival this spring. "
In March, rhododendrons appeared unexpectedly on the set of TEGA at the Jumanji Art Festival in Melbourne



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I hope they get an hour of total fun and wish fulfillment and escapism."”
“You don't have to be a good girl; you don't have to do anything but you."”
“And Hendricks stars as Beth, a wife and mom who finds out her cheating husband has lost their savings.”
“"She's also being sexually harassed in her shitty job at the grocery store," Bans says.”
“Whitman is Annie, a young mom who will do whatever it takes to have custody of her daughter.”
“Well, Retta plays Ruby, a married mother who desperately needs money for an experimental drug for her daughter's kidney disease.”
“How so?”
“"These are women who are backed into a corner," she explains.”
“While no one is suggesting you rob a supermarket, Bans says these characters—who have never done anything illegal before—are doing it for good because that's what they need to tell themselves in order to do it.”
“Christina Hendricks said that we're giving a huge middle finger to the phrase, and I think it's really true.”


"I want them to have all the fun of an hour and want to realize and escape from reality."
"You don't have to be a good girl; you don't have to do anything but yourself."
Hendrix also plays Beth, a wife and mother who finds out her cheating husband has lost his savings
"Her bad job at the grocery store was also sexually harassed," says bance
"Whitman is Anne, a young mother who will raise her daughter at all costs."
"Well, Rita plays ruby, a married mother who is in urgent need of money to buy an experimental drug for her daughter's kidney disease."
"How could that be?"
"These women are forced into the corner," she explained
"Although no one suggests you rob a supermarket, banks says that the characters who have never done anything illegal before are doing good because they need to tell themselves about it."
"Christina Hendrix said we've given this a lot of support and I think it's true."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m still in contact with Sarah Paulson!” Medley offered.”
“Cohen revealed that they’d connected Medley with multiple celebrity admirers.”
““I literally thought, I’m already so low that why not join a reality TV show?” Still, she remembered being initially taken aback when two of the cast members started fighting during a dinner scene.”
““Honestly I had hit such a low point in my life, with a mug shot in Palm Beach,” Mortimer confessed.”
“Mortimer has had her own unique arc, joining the cast in 2017 following a trespassing arrest in Palm Beach.”
“It gave me back my independence after my divorce,” she continued, saying her Bravo gig has allowed her to provide “financial and emotional stability” for her daughter.”
“I do walk my dog in my pajamas, I do make out with people on the street.”“The good thing, as Dorinda pointed out, we do get to support our charities in a big way now.”
“...problem I really haven t changed so I m still behaving badly...”
“You realize that you have this platform and this ability to affect people and they really think they know you Also No more walking around in pajamas Asked how she s changed over the seasons Morgan quipped That s the...”
““I was so used to people recognizing my husband and not me, and then all of a sudden…” Medley recalled, noting her transformation from political wife to TV star.”


"I'm still in touch with Sarah Paulson! "Provide medley."
"Cohen revealed that they had associated Medley with a number of celebrity admirers."
"I really think, I'm already very low, why don't I take part in the reality show? "Still, she remembers that when two actors started fighting at a dinner party, she was shocked at first."
"To be honest, I photographed a mug in Palm Beach, which was the bottom of my life," Mortimer admitted
"Mortimer has his own unique arc. He joined the cast after being arrested for breaking into palm beach in 2017."
"It made me independent after the divorce," she continued, adding that her performance provided her daughter with "financial and emotional stability."
"I do walk the dog in my pajamas. I do make out on the street." "Fortunately, as Dorinda pointed out, we can really support our philanthropy now."
“… I really haven't changed the problem, so my behavior is still terrible... "
"You realize that you have the platform and the ability to influence people, and they really think they know you don't walk around in your pajamas anymore. When asked how she changes with the seasons, Morgan joked that this is..."
"I was so used to being recognized by my husband instead of me, and all of a sudden She noticed that she had gone from a political wife to a TV star



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’re so glad Underwood is back and better than ever!”
“...it and there has been much uncertainty as to how things will end up she wrote...”
“In the months following the accident, Underwood kept a low profile and was rarely seen in public.”
“Her full face was not in view in the photos she posted to social media, and she even penned a note to the members of her fan club on Jan. 1, warning them that her appearance might be altered the next time they saw her.”
“Here’s a bit more about her accident, which occurred while she was taking her dogs out for a walk.”
“‘I Might Look A Bit Different’In Underwood’s fan letter, she wrote:“And when I am ready to get in front of a camera, I want you all to understand why I might look a bit different.”
“I’m hoping that, by then, the differences are minimal, but, again, I just don’t know how it’s all going to end up.”In January, Underwood shared an X-ray image of her wrist that showed the extent of the injury—and it certainly looked painful.”
““Last check up on the old wrist this morning!”
“!” she wrote on her post.”
““Thanks, Dr. Wurth and my PT angel, Renee, a.k.a.”


"We're glad Underwood's back, better than ever!"
“…… And there's a lot of uncertainty about the outcome, she wrote
"In the months after the accident, Underwood kept a low profile and rarely appeared in public."
"She didn't see her full face in the photos she posted on social media, and she even wrote a note to members of the fan club on January 1, warning them that her face might change the next time they see her."
"Here's more about her accident, which happened when she took the dog out for a walk."
In Underwood's fan letter, she wrote: "when I'm ready to face the camera, I want you all to understand why I look a little different."
"I hope the difference will be minimal by then, but, again, I just don't know how it's going to end." In January, Underwood shared an X-ray of her wrist, showing the extent of the injury, which must have looked painful
"Check your old wrist for the last time this morning!"
"!" she wrote in the post. "
"Thank you, Dr. worth and my angel doctor, Renee, also known as me."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'””
“But there will be a redemptive moment.”
“After last week’s episode of This Is Us, we were expecting to finally see how Jack Pearson (Milo Ventimiglia) dies, the parting shot of the family patriarch driving away, drunk in his vehicle.”
““We’ve been teasing that in the press, but you’re all going to have to wait a little while longer,” said Ventimiglia tonight at the packed-house season finale screening of “Moonshadow” at the Directors Guild Theater on Sunset Blvd.”
“Various guild attendees arrived an hour in advance to grab a seat at the packed screening.”
“The episode was followed by a Q&A with This Is Us castmembers Ventimiglia, Mandy Moore, Justin Hartley, Chris Sullivan, Chrissy Metz, Susan Kelechi Watson and Ron Cephas Jones as well as recently promoted Season 2 showrunners Isaac Aptaker and Elizabeth Berger.”
“While Jack and Rebecca didn’t eternally breakup forever, we saw a different kind of split between the Pearsons, with Rebecca saying it was time for them to take a rest.”
“Jack stumbled drunk into her club performance and punched her ex-boyfriend and fellow band member Ben (Sam Trammell).”
“Rebecca returned home heartbroken, the singing career she’d been trying to reboot in shambles – not just because of Jack, but Ben also made a pass at her.”
“A fight broke out between Jack and Rebecca and she was none too happy about Jack’s alcoholism returning just as she was trying to pursue her lifelong dream.”


“'””
"But there will be a moment of redemption."
"After last week's this is us, we're looking forward to finally seeing how Jack Pearson (MILO Ventimiglia) died, a parting scene of a family leader driving away drunk."
"We've been joking in the media, but you all have to wait a little longer," ventimilia said at the last screening of the full moon season at the Directors Guild theater on Sunset Avenue tonight
"Participants from various guilds rushed to the crowded screening scene one hour ahead of time to grab seats."
"This episode is followed by a question and answer session with us caster members Ventimiglia, Mandy Moore, Justin Hartley, Chris Sullivan, Chris Metz, Susan kellrich Watson and Ron Cephas Jones, as well as the recently launched second season program runners Isaac aptak and Elizabeth Berg."
"Although Jack and Rebecca didn't break up forever, we saw that the Pearsons broke up in a different way. Rebecca said it's time for them to have a rest."
"When Jack is drunk, he enters her club by mistake and kicks her ex boyfriend and band member Ben (Sam Trammell)
"Rebecca comes home sad. She has been trying to start her singing career again in the chaos - not only because of Jack, but also because Ben despises her."
"There's a fight between Jack and Rebecca. She's not very happy that Jack's alcoholism is coming back, because she's trying to pursue her lifelong dream."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It might give you clues to what her wedding look will be like.”
“Ahead, check out her incredible beauty evolution.”
“Here, we go back through Baldwin’s history and track her transformation from the child of a celebrity to a rising model who you’re about to see a lot more of.”
“She clearly knows her stuff.”
“Not only is she a model who has worked for the likes of Elie Saab, Dolce & Gabbana and Phillip Plein, but Baldwin is also the host of the James Corden–created reality show Drop the Mic, as well as a bona fide Instagram influencer with more than 14 million followers.”
“In her time in the spotlight, the 21-year-old has built an established résumé, and she’s only going up from here.”
“However you learned of Baldwin’s name, one detail is clear: She’s more than someone else’s accessory.”
“Or perhaps it was as the recently engaged fiancée of Justin Bieber.”
“Perhaps it was as the best friend of model Kendall Jenner.”
“Perhaps it was as the youngest daughter of actor Stephen Baldwin.”


"It might give you some clues about what her wedding looks like."
"Ahead, look at her amazing evolution of beauty."
"Here, we look back at Baldwin's history and track her transformation from a celebrity child to a model that you'll see more emerging."
"She knows her own business very well."
"She is not only a model who has worked for Elie Saab, Dolce & Gabbana and Phillip plein, but also the host of James Corden's reality show drop the mic and a loyal instagram influencer with more than 14 million fans."
"During the time in the spotlight, 21-year-old has established a set resume, and she's just going up from here."
"No matter how you know Baldwin's name, one detail is clear: she's more than just an accessory."
"Or Justin Bieber's recently engaged fiancee."
"Maybe Kendall Jenner's best friend as a model."
"Maybe it's the youngest daughter of actor Stephen Baldwin."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“One person wrote, “all of these women are so strong for coming out with their stories, including you Cheryl.””
“Social media was emphatic that Cheryl commemorated the women in the US Gymnastics team.”
“AdvertisementUnfortunately for Cheryl, her abuser did not go to jail according to the Dance Mom’s star.”
“Nassar will face his day in court and will probably lose, although, a not-guilty verdict is possible.”
“Celebrity Insider reported recently that Simone Biles revealed she had been abused by the doctor as well.”
“The ex-doctor is currently looking at 25-40 years of prison for each count of abuse; he is now facing seven counts.”
“She declared in front of the court and jury that Larry deserves the rest of his life behind bars.”
“At the beginning of the day today, McKayla Maroney’s statement against Larry was read aloud in court.”
“...which were Olympic gold medalists and contestants...”
“Cheryl who wrote a book called Dancing Lessons claimed that it takes tremendous courage metoo A post shared by Cheryl Burke cherylburke on Jan 18 2018 at 3 04pm PST As you may know Larry Nassar was outed as a sexual predator by a plethora of women who many of...”


One wrote: "all these women are strong enough to tell their own stories, including you, Cheryl."
"Social media stresses that Cheryl commemorates the women of the U.S. gymnastics team."
Unfortunately for Cheryl, according to the dance "mother's star," her abusers did not go to jail
"Naxar will be tried in court and is likely to lose, but acquittal is possible."
"Celebrity insiders recently reported that Simone biles revealed that she had also been abused by doctors."
"The former doctor is currently sentenced to 25-40 years in prison for every abuse charge; he now faces seven charges."
"She announced in front of the court and the jury that Larry should spend the rest of his life in prison."
"At the beginning of the day, mckella Maloney's statement to Larry was read out loud in court."
“…… Olympic gold medalists and competitors.... "
"Cheryl Burke wrote a book called dance lessons, which she claimed took great courage. Cheryl Burke posted a post at 3:04 p.m. PST on January 18, 2018. You may know that Larry Nassar was denounced as a sex offender by a large group of women, many of them..."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Strawberry Dollarita is the perfect way to cool down on those hot August days and enjoy the final days of summer.””
“...at Applebee s...”
“It s crazy to think that our most popular drink could get any better but with the addition of strawberry our guests are going to love how good this Dollarita tastes says Patrick Kirk the vice president of beverage innovation...”
“The beverage is made with tequila, strawberry and margarita mix and is served in a cold 10-ounce mug.”
“For the entire month of August, the restaurant chain is offering strawberry margaritas (or as they call them “Dollaritas”) for only $1.”
“If you’re looking for a way to cool down this summer without breaking the bank, Applebee’s has got your back.”


"Strawberry dorareta is the best way to cool down and enjoy the last days of summer on hot August days."
“… In Applebee s... "
Patrick Kirk, vice president of beverage innovation, said: "it's crazy to think that our most popular drink will be better, but with strawberries, our guests will love the taste of doraretta."
The drink is a mixture of tequila, strawberries and Margarita in a 10 Ounce cold glass
Throughout August, the restaurant chain offered strawberry margaritas (or what they call "doraretta") for only $1
"If you want to find a way to cool down without going bankrupt this summer, Applebee's will support you."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Source: Ok Magazine...”
“That was the start of the bad times that turned everything into a blur in my memory,” she wrote in the book and went on to reveal how both her parents developed drinking problems, but her dad’s alcoholism turned her parent’s relationship into nothing but screaming matches.”
““After Candace died, my family started to deteriorate.”
“Amber goes into detail about her childhood, which started off with normal and happy family memories, but everything changed when her younger sister Candace, died at only two weeks old of SIDS (Sudden Infant Death Syndrome).”
“Early LifeAmber’s story on 16 & Pregnant jumps right into her pregnancy with Leah, but her book gives fans a better idea just who Amber was before becoming pregnant at a young age.”
“15.”
“So, go behind-the-scenes, and find 15 of the most shocking things about Amber, her life and filming that you never knew!”
“Then in 2014, Amber put out her first memoir “Never Too Late” and it became apparent that not everything was shared with the MTV cameras.”
“In those seven years, Amber has shared all of the very high highs and very low lows of her life, and has had one of the most tumultuous journeys out of all the young women on the series.”
“Back in June of 2009, MTV fans were introduced to Amber Portwood with her episode of 16 & Pregnant, and for the subsequent seven years, she has continued to share her story as one of the four women picked for the hugely popular spin-off series, Teen Mom.”


"Source: OK magazine..."
"It was the beginning of a bad time, and in my memory, everything became blurred," she wrote She went on to reveal how her parents developed a drinking problem, but her father's drinking turned the relationship into a screaming competition
"After Candice died, my family began to deteriorate."
"Amber details her childhood, which began with normal and happy family memories, but everything changed when her sister Candace died of sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) when she was two weeks old."
"The story of amber's early 16-year-old pregnancy jumps directly into her and Leah's pregnancy, but her book gives fans a better understanding of who amber was before she became pregnant when she was young."
“15.”
"So, go behind the scenes and find out 15 of the most shocking things about amber, her life and filming, you never know!"
"Then in 2014, amber published her first memoir, never too late, and it's clear that not everything can be shared with MTV cameras."
"In the past seven years, amber has gone through all the ups and downs of her life, the most turbulent in a series of young women."
"As early as June 2009, MTV fans got to know amber Portwood through the episode of" 16 & preparing ". For the next seven years, she has been sharing her story, becoming one of the four women selected for the popular spin off" teenage mom. "



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now that you know the hottest ways to style the cozy basic, shop our edit of the most stylish options on the market now.”
“Re-create her sultry look and wear the cropped hoodie with a leather mini skirt and lace-up heels.”
“This summer, stars are reaching for hoodies as their go-to garments.”
“Applying simple styling hacks, Beyoncé, 35, Hailey Baldwin, 20, and Nina Agdal, 25, are making the cozy basic feel completely fresh and season appropriate.”
“Here are the newest and coolest ways celebs are wearing their hoodies right now.”
“GO GLAMStyle Queen: Leave it to Beyoncé to elevate the humble hoodie into a fashion statementLeave it to Beyoncé to elevate the humble hoodie into a fashion statement.”
“The mother-of-three looked glam as she stopped by the FYF Festival this weekend in Los Angeles to watch her sister Solange perform.”
“Bey rocked a tan Joanna Ortiz hooded sweatshirt that featured dramatic ruffled sleeves.”
“By pairing the basic with a matching fluted skirt, the 20-time Grammy winner pulled off a coordinated streamlined look.”
“Stella McCartney platforms and a Gucci backpack completed the sleek and modern ensemble.”


"Now that you know the most popular comfortable basic style, come and buy the most fashionable style in our market."
"Reinvent her sexy look with a cropped Hoodie, leather miniskirt and lace up heels."
"This summer, stars are using hoodies as ready-made clothes."
"Using simple styling techniques, Beyonce, 35, Haley Baldwin, 20, and Nina Agdal, 25, make this comfortable basic look completely fresh and seasonable."
"Here's the latest and coolest way celebrities wear hoodies now."
"Go glamstyle Queen: let Beyonce promote her humble Hoodie to fashion manifesto. Let Beyonce promote her humble Hoodie to fashion manifesto."
"This weekend, the mother of three was very happy when she was in Los Angeles to attend the fyf Music Festival and watch her sister sorange perform."
"Bey is wearing a brown Joanna Ortiz hooded sweatshirt with dramatic frills on the sleeves."
The 20 time Grammy winner paired the basic with the same dress for a coordinated, streamlined look
"Stella McCartney platform and a Gucci backpack complete the ensemble of fashion and modernity."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And of course, Vanderpump gets involved in the drama — swinging a sledge hammer as she works on her new restaurant with Sandoval and Schwartz, threatening to fire Taylor, and even declaring at one point, “There’s a lot of skanks in this town.””
“...another man Usually with this group where there s smoke there s fire Schroeder says...”
“After a season of fractured relationships, the staff at SUR seem to have come together — with former enemies Jax Taylor and James Kennedy forging a new friendship and outcast Lala Kent even returning to Lisa Vanderpump‘s sexy unique restaurant after quitting without warning.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But new bonds may not last forever as a shocking allegation about Taylor appears to tear the SUR gang down the middle, leaving them scrambling to decide where their loyalties must lie.”
“Image zoom Jay Taylor | Credit: BravoThe claim shakes up Taylor’s relationship with girlfriend Brittany Cartwright, too, as she debates whether or not to stand by her man.”
“Their relationship on the line, the Vanderpump Rules: Jax and Brittany Take Kentucky stars have some major conflicts.”
““Go try to ruin another girl’s life,” Cartwright tells Taylor during a heated argument,He isn’t happy to hear that.”
““No one’s going to tell me how to act in my own home where I pay my own bills,” Taylor shoots back.”
“But Cartwright isn’t backing down.”


"Of course, van der Pugh is also involved in the play - she and Sandoval and Schwartz wield sledgehammers while working in the new restaurant, threatening to fire Taylor, and even once declared," there are a lot of pranks in this town. "
“… Another person is usually with this group, where there's smoke, where there's fire, Schroeder said
"After a season of emotional breakdown, the staff of sur University seem to have come together - former enemies Jacques Taylor and James Kennedy have established a new friendship, and the rejected Lala Kent even resigned without warning and returned to Lisa van der Pol's sexy and unique restaurant."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But the new bond may not last forever, because a shocking accusation about Taylor seems to tear the sur Mafia out of the middle, leaving them scrambling to decide where their loyalty must be."
"Image zooming Jay Taylor | credit: Bravo also shakes Taylor's relationship with his girlfriend Brittany Cartwright because she is debating whether to support her man."
"Just their relationship, van der Pol rule: Jax and Brittany have some big conflicts with Kentucky stars."
"Destroy the life of another girl," Cartwright told Taylor in a heated argument, which he was not happy to hear
"No one's going to tell me what to do in my own home," Tyler retorted
"But Cartwright didn't flinch."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And March 24th, things are going to change.””
“That is only the beginning.”
“...left 17 students and staff members dead...”
“Clooney and his wife, human-rights attorney Amal Clooney, announced a $500,000 donation Tuesday morning to help offset the costs of the march in Washington.”
““Amal and I are so inspired by the courage and eloquence of these young men and women,” George Clooney said in a statement.”
““Our family will be there on March 24 to stand side by side with this incredible generation of young people from all over the country, and in the name of our children Ella and Alexander, we’re donating 500,000 dollars to help pay for this groundbreaking event.”
“Our children’s lives depend on it.”Read: Tim Mullaney: After the Florida school shooting, let’s listen to the students and ban assault weaponsOprah Winfrey later matched the Clooneys’ donation.”
““George and Amal, I couldn’t agree with you more,” she said in a tweet.”
““These inspiring young people remind me of the Freedom Riders of the 60s who also said we’ve had ENOUGH and our voices will be heard.”Director Steven Spielberg and his wife, actress Kate Capshaw, also announced a $500,000 matching donation.”
““Kate and I applaud their efforts to take a stand for the benefit of this and future generations.”


"On March 24, things will change."
"It's just the beginning."
“… 17 students and staff died... "
Clooney and his wife, human rights lawyer Amar Clooney, announced a donation of $500000 Tuesday morning to help offset the cost of the march in Washington
"Amar and I are inspired by the courage and eloquence of these young men and women," George Clooney said in a statement
"Our family will stand side by side with this incredible generation of young people from all over the country on March 24. In the name of our children Ella and Alexander, we will donate 500000 dollars to help pay for this groundbreaking activity."
"Our children's lives depend on it." Read: Tim Mulani: after the Florida school shooting, let's listen to the students and ban offensive weapons. Winfrey later matched the couple's donation
"George and Amar, I agree with you very much," she tweeted
"These inspiring young people remind me of the freedom Knights of the '60s, and they say we've had enough and our voices will be heard." Director Steven Spielberg and his wife, actress Kate kapshaw, also announced a $500000 matching donation
"Kate and I applaud their efforts to take a stand for the benefit of present and future generations."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We love each other and will continue to support each other for the rest of our lives.”Image zoom Credit: Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images for NARAS”
“The two were last pictured together in January at the Grammy Awards, where he was twice-nominated.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Logic reportedly filed for divorce on Thursday, a month after announcing his separation from wife Jessica AndreaLogic has officially taken the first step to legally separate from his wife Jessica Andrea.”
“Nearly one month after the pair announced their split following two years of marriage, the rapper, 28, filed for divorce on Thursday, according to The Blast and TMZ.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for Logic did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Logic, best known for his song “1-800-273-8255,” wed social media star Andrea in October 2015 after two years of dating.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jeff Kravitz/FilmMagic“After two years of marriage, we have come to the loving conclusion that we are much better as friends.”
““No fighting, no cheating, no nothing.”


"We love each other and will continue to support each other for the rest of our lives." Image zooming source: Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images for NARAS
"The last time they took a picture together was at the Grammy Awards in January. He was nominated twice."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"According to reports, logic filed for divorce on Thursday, a month after announcing that he and his wife Jessica Andrea Lodge had officially taken the first step of legally separating from his wife Jessica Andrea."
According to blast and TMZ, the 28 year old rapper filed for divorce on Thursday, nearly a month after they announced their separation after two years of marriage
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of logic didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Logic is famous for his song 1-800-273-8255, and he married Andrea, a social media star, in October 2015 after two years in love."
After two years of marriage, we came to a loving conclusion: as friends, we are much better
"No fighting, no cheating, nothing."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“25 Summit Entertainment 21 of 25 Weinstein Company 22 of 25 New Line Cinema 23 of 25 Fox 2000 Pictures 24 of 25 Universal 25 of 25”
“25 Universal 11 of 25 Columbia Pictures 12 of 25 Warner Bros 13 of 25 New Line Cinema 14 of 25 Focus Features 15 of 25 Columbia Pictures 16 of 25 Summit Entertainment 17 of 25 Summit Entertainment 18 of 25 Summit Entertainment 19 of 25 Summit Entertainment 20 of...”
“Columbia Pictures 1 of 25 Metro Goldwyn Mayer 2 of 25 Paramount Pictures 3 of 25 New Line Cinema 4 of 25 Metro Goldwyn Mayer 5 of 25 6 of 25 New Line Cinema 7 of 25 Universal 8 of 25 Columbia Pictures 9 of 25 MTV Films 10 of...”
“23 Of The Most Jaw-Dropping MTV Movie Awards Stunts EverEvery Best Kiss Winner Ever At The MTV Movie Awards!”
“- The 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards airs in the UK on 8th May at 8pm – only on MTV!”
“A24In their heartfelt winning speech, Ashton Sanders, who plays Chrion, said: “This award is bigger than Jharrel and I, this repesents more than a kiss… This respresents the kids who feel like others, the misfits.”WE’RE NOT CRYING, YOU’RE CRYING.”
“The much-loved movie broke boundaries this year for being the first LGBT film and first film with an all-black cast to ever win the coveted Best Picture Academy Award.”
“A24The movie tells the story of Chiron as he grows up through three stages of life, each played by different actors, as he finds himself and his sexuality and identity against a less-than-accepting Miami backdrop.”
“The actors, who star in the Best Picture Oscar-winning Moonlight, received the award for their kiss as teens Chiron and Kevin in the Barry Jenkins-directed coming of age film.”
“Ashton Sanders and Jharrel Jerome just won the iconic Best Kiss award at the MTV Movie And TV Awards in LA!”


“25 Summit Entertainment 21 of 25 Weinstein Company 22 of 25 New Line Cinema 23 of 25 Fox 2000 Pictures 24 of 25 Universal 25 of 25”
“25 Universal 11 of 25 Columbia Pictures 12 of 25 Warner Bros 13 of 25 New Line Cinema 14 of 25 Focus Features 15 of 25 Columbia Pictures 16 of 25 Summit Entertainment 17 of 25 Summit Entertainment 18 of 25 Summit Entertainment 19 of 25 Summit Entertainment 20 of…”
“Columbia Pictures 1 of 25 Metro Goldwyn Mayer 2 of 25 Paramount Pictures 3 of 25 New Line Cinema 4 of 25 Metro Goldwyn Mayer 5 of 25 6 of 25 New Line Cinema 7 of 25 Universal 8 of 25 Columbia Pictures 9 of 25 MTV Films 10 of…”
"The 23 most stunning MTV Movie Awards stunts surprise every MTV Movie Award best kisser!"
"- the 2017 MTV film and Television Awards will be broadcast in the UK at 8pm on May 8 - MTV only!"
In their heartfelt acceptance speech, Ashton Sanders, who plays CRION, said: "this award is more important than Jarrell and me. It's not just a kiss It responds to children who feel like other people, people who don't adapt. We're not crying. You're crying. "
"This favorite movie broke this year's line to become the first gay movie, the first movie with all black actors, and won the coveted Oscar for best picture."
The film tells the story of three stages of his growth, each played by different actors. In an unpopular Miami background, he discovers himself, his sexual orientation and identity
The two actors, who starred in the Academy Award-winning best picture moonlight, won the prize for kissing in Barry Jenkins's adult film young Karen and Kevin
"Ashton sanders and Jarrell Jerome just won the iconic Best Kiss award at the MTV Movie and TV awards in Los Angeles!"



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When Felker was supposed to return home to Nelson in Oklahoma, he allegedly skipped his flight, telling Nelson via email, “I’m not coming home this week,” according to the source.”
“The source continued, saying Lambert and Felker got closer in the three-day tour they were on.”
“The country music singer, 41, tweeted about “karma” last week following the news that Lambert is dating married musician Evan Felker, and fans immediately speculated he was calling out the “Tin Man” singer.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It was a personal thing that s in a small circle of my people and that s why it was written the way it was and then people took it and make it into what they want to make it into which I don t want any part of that...”
“Shelton told Extra on Monday when asked directly about his tweet...”
““But at the same time, I can’t help but to think it’s funny how these fires get lit and it takes off and I don’t have time to care.”
“That’s why I’ve kind of moved on,” he added.”
“Shelton spoke to Entertainment Tonight about his tweet as well and said it wasn’t fully intended for his fans to understand.”
“Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/Getty“If it was meant for people to know exactly what it meant, it wouldn’t have been so cryptic,” he told the outlet during a Facebook Live interview with his fellow Voice coach Kelly Clarkson.”


"When filch was supposed to return to Nelson's home in Oklahoma, he was said to have missed the flight and told Nelson by email," I'm not going home this week, "the source said
"The source went on to say that Lambert and fairke got closer in the three-day trip."
The 41 year old country music singer tweeted "karma" last week after fans immediately speculated that Lambert was calling "Tin Man" singer after news that Lambert was dating married musician Evan Falk
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a personal thing, in my small circle, that's why it's written like this, and then people turn it into what they want to become, and I don't want to be any part of it..."
"Sheldon told extra on Monday when he was directly asked about his twitter
"But at the same time, I can't help thinking that I don't have time to care about how these fires are lit and how they take off. It's very interesting."
"That's why I want to move on," he added
"Sheldon also talked about his microblog on Entertainment Tonight, saying it's not entirely for his fans to understand."
"The credit for image zooming: John Shiller / Getty" if it's to let people know what it really means, it won't be so mysterious, "he told the media in a live interview with his fellow voice coach Kelly Clarkson on on Facebook



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...sidewalks the pictures will surely melt your heart...”
“The Million Dollar Listing New York real estate broker shared some super cute footage of his one year old daughter playing in the snow during her first blizzard and even if they can t melt the ice on those Manhattan...”
“Steve Gold's daughter Rose just had the cutest first New York City snowday Steve Gold’s adorable daughter, Rose, just experienced a very exciting milestone.”
“Southern Charm New Orleans' Reagan Charleston confirmed in an adorable Instagram post on February 1 that she's pregnant and expecting her second child with husband Reece Thomas.”
“2 Oh, baby!”
“Southern Charm New Orleans' Reagan Charleston confirms she's pregnant with baby no.”
“Ashley Darby reveals how becoming a mom has changed her Ashley Darby is opening up about one of her favorite experiences as a mom: snow days with her son, Dean.”
“Quite a lot, apparently, especially when it comes to parenting and dating.”
“...do Andy Cohen and Bethenny Frankel have in common...”
“The Million Dollar Listing Los Angeles cast member recently took to Instagram to capture the toddler s first ever haircut which he hilariously dubbed a freakin disaster Andy Cohen and Bethenny Frankel open up about their dating lives How much...”


“… The picture of sidewalk will melt your heart... "
"The million dollar New York real estate agent shared some super cute footage of his one-year-old daughter playing in the snow during the first blizzard, even if they couldn't melt the ice in Manhattan..."
"Steve gold's daughter Ross has just had the most lovely first snowy day in New York City. Steve gold's lovely daughter Ross has just experienced a very exciting milestone."
"Reagan Charleston of southern charm, New Orleans, posted a lovely post on instagram on February 1 confirming that she was pregnant and pregnant with her second child with her husband Reese Thomas."
"Oh, baby!"
"Reagan Charleston of southern charm, New Orleans, confirmed that she was pregnant with a child
"Ashley Darby reveals how being a mother has changed her. Ashley Darby tells about one of her favorite experiences as a mother: the snowy days with her son Dean."
"Obviously, a lot, especially in parenting and dating."
"Do Andy Cohen and Bethany Frankel have anything in common..."
"The million dollar Los Angeles actor recently filmed the toddler's first haircut on instagram. He jokingly called it a bizarre disaster. Andy Cohen and Bethany Frankel revealed how little their dating life was..."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Services were also held across Manchester to mark the anniversary of the attack, with Prince William and Prime Minister Theresa May among the dignitaries attending.”
“The worker bee is often used as an emblem for Manchester, representing the city’s industrial past and appearing in its crest.”
“There have been reports of explosions at Manchester Arena where Ariana Grande had performed this evening.”
“Greater Manchester Police have have confirmed there are fatalities and warned people to stay away from the area.”
“(Photo by Dave Thompson/Getty Images)A woman looks emotional as she looks at flowers left in St Ann Square on Tuesday, May 23, 2017 in Manchester,England.”
“At least 22 people were killed in a suicide bombing at a pop concert packed with children in the northern English city of Manchester, in the worst terror incident on British soil since the London bombings of 2005.”
“'I love you' were the last words she heardOlivia Campbell is missing after the Manchester Arena blast, according to her mother Charlotte CampbellManchester Arena incident.”
“Emergency services at Manchester Arena after reports of an explosion at the venue during an Ariana Grande gig.”
“Picture date: Tuesday May 23, 2017.”
“See PA story POLICE Explosion.”


"There have also been ceremonies around Manchester to mark the anniversary of the attacks, with dignitaries such as Prince William and Prime Minister Teresa May present."
The worker bee is often used as a symbol of Manchester, representing the past of Manchester industry and appearing on its Badge
"There are reports of explosions at the Manchester arena where Ariane Grande performed tonight."
"Greater Manchester Police have confirmed the death and warned people to stay away from the area."
(Photo by Dave Thompson/Getty Images) a woman looks at the flowers left on St Ann's Square in Manchester, UK, Tuesday, May 23, 2017
"A suicide bomb attack at a children's concert in the northern UK city of Manchester killed at least 22 people, the most serious terrorist incident in the UK since the London bombings in 2005."
"I love you" was the last word she heard, and according to her mother, Charlotte Campbell, Livia Campbell disappeared after the explosion at the Manchester arena. "
"Emergency services at the Manchester arena have been reported to have exploded during the Ariana Grande concert."
"Shooting date: Tuesday, May 23, 2017."
"Look at the story of the police explosion."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the image, she stands, holding a sign that reads, “So, I close my eyes to old ends and open my heart to new beginnings.””
““There have been a lot of assumptions recently so I figured it was time to clear the air,” Izabella shared on Instagram.”
“A few months later, she confirmed the theories.”
“By the time fans noticed that Izabella was posting fewer pictures of Jairo, they were already split.”
“Unfortunately, it wasn’t long before rumors of trouble in paradise began to stir about this couple.”
“Finally, they got married in 2016.”
“Together, they welcomed their first child Enrique, and another daughter Anatazia in 2014.”
“Izabella Tovar appeared on the third season of 16 and Pregnant, and found herself pregnant at the age of only 15 by her boyfriend Jairo.”
“It seems that much of the cast have found happiness in their relationships, but the same can not be said for one 16 and Pregnant star.”
“Jenelle and Chelsea both celebrated their weddings this season, and there are many long-standing marriages like Maci and Taylor and Catelynn and Tyler.”


In the picture, she stands with a sign in her hand, which says: "so, I close my eyes to see the ending of the past and open my heart to see the new beginning."
"There have been a lot of assumptions lately, so I think it's time to clarify," Izabella said on instagram
"A few months later, she confirmed these theories."
"When the fans noticed that there were fewer and fewer pictures of Jero posted by Izabella, they broke up."
"Unfortunately, it didn't take long for rumors of the couple making trouble in heaven to start
"Finally, they got married in 2016."
"In 2014, they had their first child, Enrique, and another daughter, anatazia."
Isabella toval, 16, plays the third season and is pregnant. When she was 15, she was pregnant by her boyfriend Jero
"It seems that many actors find happiness in love, but a 16-year-old pregnant star can't say that."
"Jennell and Chelsea have celebrated their wedding this season, and there are many long-term marriages like Messi, Taylor, Caitlin and Taylor



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“June 29.”
“WAGS Miami's second season premiere airs on E!”
“She said, 'I really wanted to pick a place that no one I knew had been before … so it would be an experience not just for me and Phil, but for everyone,' adding, 'and it’s only a two-hour flight from Miami.'”
“...son enjoyed the falling confetti after the Falcons big win Roberts explained to the publication how she came up with the perfect location for their exotic destination wedding...”
“Veteran Wheeler seen here in December 2015 after a Falcons game in Atlanta has played for four NFL teams over nine seasons MVPs The proud papa posed with his son after the Falcons NFC championship win earlier this year over the Green Bay Packers Fun filled year The mom and...”
“The football veteran proposed with a diamond ring worth in excess of $100,000.”
“...reality show last fall after a big evening at Villa Casa Casuarina, formerly known as the Versace Mansion.”
“...co-star Darnell Nicole at an event in Fort Lauderdale in MarchProud parents: The duo have a young son named Phillip Jr., as seen here in this beach shotThe duo, who have a young son named Phillip Jr., got engaged on-air on the E!”
“WAGS: Ashley (R) posed with her E!”
“'I wanted to be able to dance the night away,' she said of the latter.”


"June 29."
"Swing Miami Season 2 premiere in E!"
"She said," I really want to choose a place that no one I know has been to So it's an experience not only for Phil and me, but also for everyone, "she said." it's only a two-hour flight from Miami. "
“…… After the falcons' victory over Roberts explained to the publication how she found the perfect place for their exotic destination wedding, her son enjoyed the falling confetti... "
"In December 2015, veteran Wheeler played for the falcons in Atlanta. He played for four NFL teams in nine seasons of MVP. Earlier this year, after the falcons' NFC championship victory over the Green Bay Packers, the proud father and his son took a picture of his mother and... "
"The veteran football player proposed with a diamond ring worth more than $100000."
“…… Last fall's reality show had a big night at Casa casarina villa (formerly known as Versace building)
“… Co starring Danielle Nicole at an event in Fort Lauderdale in malbrude parents: two people have a little son named Philip small, see these two people on this beach, who have a little son named Philip small, engaged in the air on e! "
"Swing: Ashley (right) and her e!"
"I want to dance at night," she said of the latter



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her biological father, Patrick Lovato, whom Demi had a strained relationship with, died in June 2013 after years of alcohol and substance abuse.”
“And I’m just like my dad,’ ” Lovato told concertgoers.”
“...aired Tuesday the Grammy nominated singer 25 reflected back on her struggles and revealed her darkest days first came about as young as 7 years old...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The very first time that I was suicidal was when I was 7, and I had this fascination with death,” Lovato said.”
““I have experienced things that I’ve not talked about and that I don’t know if I ever will talk about.”
“But at 7, I knew that if I were to take my own life that the pain would end.”Diagnosed with bipolar disorder at age 18 and bullied at age 12, Lovato turned to drugs and alcohol to cope with the demons in her life.”
““My addiction with drugs and alcohol was very severe to where I had several scares, and I knew that at the rate I was using and drinking, I wasn’t going to live a long life.”
“I used very fast, very hard,” she said.”
“Image zoom Demi Lovato | Credit: Dr. PhilBut by sharing her trials and tribulations, Lovato hopes to inspire her fans and followers to seek help.”


"Her biological father, Patrick Lovato, had a strained relationship with Demi and died in June 2013 after years of alcohol and drug abuse."
"I'm just like my dad," Lovato told the concert audience
“… The Grammy nominated singer 25 on Tuesday recalled her struggle and revealed that her darkest days first appeared around the age of seven. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I first committed suicide when I was seven years old, and I was fascinated by death," Lovato said
"I've been through things I haven't talked about, and I don't know if I'm going to talk about them."
"But when I was seven, I knew that if I killed myself, the pain would end." Diagnosed with bipolar disorder at 18 and bullied at 12, Lovato turned to drugs and alcohol to deal with the demons of his life
"I'm very addicted to drugs and alcohol, and I've had several fears, and I know that at the rate that I use drugs and drink alcohol, I won't live long."
"I use it fast and hard," she said
"Image zooming Demi Lovato | image source: by sharing her experiences and tribulations, Dr. philbut hopes to inspire her fans and followers to seek help."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Image via Dennis Van Tine/Future Image/WENN.]”
“This way you won’t lose any of the progress you’ve made at the gym.”Kimmy recommends that you indulge WITHOUT booze, and to do so infrequently.”
“On Thursday, the KUWTK star published a blog post on her website where she reveals her cheat plan strategy.”
“Related: Kim & Khlo├â┬⌐ Kardashian Share Parenting Tips!”
“Although Kanye West‘s wife normally eats really clean, she understands the importance of satisfying your cravings!”
“According to the social media queen:“I’ve been really strict with my diet, recently… When I grocery shop, I buy lean protein, carbs, fruits and veggies, but every once in a while, I like to treat myself and have a cheat meal.”
“It can be so hard (and boring) to eat really clean all of the time.”
“A cheat meal allows me to enjoy food without feeling like I’m overindulging.”
“My trainer, Mel, instructs that you should schedule a cheat meal about once every 10 days.”
“However the day after you treat yourself you MUST get back on track When you do them too often your body s hormones are thrown off Your testosterone which is a muscle making and fat loss hormone can change if you re eating too many calories which can make you...”


"[image source: Dennis van tine / future image / wenn.]"
"So you don't lose any progress you've made at the gym." Kimmy advises you not to drink too much and not to do it often
"On Thursday, the kuwtk star posted a blog post on her website, revealing her cheating strategy."
Related report: Kim and khlo⌐⌐ Kardashian share parenting skills
"Although Kanye West's wife usually eats very clean, she understands the importance of satisfying your appetite!"
According to the queen of social media: "I'm very strict with my diet. Recently When I shop at the grocery store, I buy lean protein, carbohydrates, fruits and vegetables, but every once in a while, I like to reward myself with a deceptive meal. "
"It's really hard (and boring) to eat clean all the time."
"A deceptive meal allows me to enjoy the delicious food without feeling too indulgent."
"My coach Mel told me that you should arrange cheating meals every 10 days."
"However, on the second day of your treatment, you have to get back on track. When you do this often, your body's hormones will be lost from your testosterone, which is a kind of myogenic hormone. If you eat too many calories, the fat reducing hormone will change, which will make you..."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I know I’m making the right choice by going to treatment, and I’m going to come out the other side the right Emma, the true Emma that I’ve always been.””
““I just want to send a message to my fans saying that it’s OK to admit that you need help, and it doesn’t make you weak,” Emma finished her statement.”
“And I knew that I needed to stop it.”Emma went on to say that she’s speaking out because she wants to help others who are struggling.”
“It was just a slippery slope that I did not want to go down.”
““It wasn’t healthy, and it was making me feel even worse — anxious and depressed.”
“...immature and I was doing things I should not be doing because it was illegal and I m not 21 Emma continued...”
“I m going to get help and make better choices Emma didn t go into what kind of treatment she would be seeking but did reveal she was running with a really fast crowd I was being naive and very...”
“...of Emma Kenney I m going to work through it Emma said...”
“The 18 year old actress who currently stars in the Roseanne reboot as Harris Conner Healy shared in a statement with In Touch that she s going to be seeking treatment for my battles PHOTOS Check out the latest pics...”
“Emma Kenney is putting her health first.”


"I know it's the right choice for me to go to treatment, and I'll come out from the other side - the right Emma, the real Emma I've always been."
"I just want to send a message to my fans that it's OK to admit that you need help, and that doesn't make you weak," Emma concluded
"I know I need to stop it." Emma went on, saying that she said it because she wanted to help those who were struggling
"It's just a landslide I don't want to go down."
"It's not healthy, it makes me feel worse - anxious and depressed."
“… Immature, I did what I shouldn't have done, because it's illegal, I'm not 21 years old, Emma continued
"I'll get help and make a better choice. Emma didn't seek any treatment, but she did reveal that she ran with a group of very fast people. I was naive, very..."
“…… About Emma Kenny, I want to solve it. Emma said
"Harris Connor Healy said in a statement that she would seek treatment for my combat photos and see the latest photos..."
"Emma Kenny put health first."



**Something goes wrong**
“According to the official synopsis on YouTube:”
“Simpson trial in its premiere season, the eight-episode Law & Order series’ first season will focus on the Menendez brothers murder case.”
“While FX chronicled the O.J.”
“The trailer promises “the true story will finally be told.”Law & Order: True Crime will document famous real-life criminal cases, like FX is doing on American Crime Story.”
“It’s why they did it,” the defense attorney concludes, asking whether the Menendez brothers were killers or victims.”
“What these boys did is not the issue.”
““When you terrorize people, they react precisely as you would expect them to.”
““These boys were just little children being molded,” says defense attorney Leslie Abramson, played by The Sopranos and Nurse Jackie’s Edie Falco stars in the first trailer for Law & Order True Crime: The Menendez Murders.”


"According to the official summary on YouTube:
The Simpson case is in the premiere season, and the first season of the eight episode law and order series will focus on the murder of the menedes brothers
"When FX records O.J
The trailer promises that "the true story will be told." Law and order: real crime will record famous criminal cases in real life, just as FX did in American crime story
"That's why they did it," the defense lawyer concluded, asking whether the menedes brothers were killers or victims
"What these kids do is not the problem."
"When you intimidate people, their reaction is exactly what you expect."
"These boys are just shaped children," said defense lawyer Leslie Abramson, who starred in Law & Order's real crime: the murder of menedes, played by soprano and nurse Jackie's Edie Falco Crime:The Menendez The first trailer of murder



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...blown feud...”
“...as chlamydia of the year and noted that it sucks Hopefully Justin Bieber will fire back with some kind of a mean burn of his own at which point all of these cute boys can finally jump into a full...”
“...that he couldn t recognize it adding I prefer not to get any venereal diseases so whenever Justin Bieber gets near me or near my ears it s just ear infections they re terrible They later referred to this phenomenon...”
“That became evident as the game progressed with the brothers failing to recognize Justin Bieber s remix of the song Despacito When they discovered that Bieber was involved with the track one of the Hansons admitted that he was glad...”
“The Hanson boys weren’t confident in their abilities, though, noting that they don’t listen to a lot of “modern” music.”
“As reported by Page Six, the Hansons appeared on an Australian radio station recently and played a self-explanatory game called “Whose Song Is It Anyway?” with the program’s hosts.”
“...be an adorable teenage moppet...”
“Last year they felt the need to declare that nobody has ever made a good cover of MMMBop and now they ve fired a classic Hanson burn in the direction of a slightly more relevant artist who also used to...”
“...because those boys can be vicious...”
“They ve kind of earned the right to be a bit snobbish since they did put out a massively popular song a very long time ago but everybody should make a point to avoid getting on Hanson s bad side...”


“… The feud broke out... "
“… As Chlamydia of the year, and points out that it's bad, hope Justin Bieber will fight back some kind of severe burn himself, at this point, all these lovely boys can finally jump into a complete... "
“… He didn't know that, adding that I didn't like to get any STD, so whenever Justin Bieber approached me or approached my ear, it was just an ear infection, they were terrible, and they later mentioned this phenomenon... "
"As the game went on, when the brothers found out that Bieber was involved in the song, they didn't recognize Justin Bieber's remixed song despatito. The Hansons admit that he is very happy... "
"However, the Hansens are not confident in their abilities. They notice that they don't listen to much" modern "music."
According to a report on page 6, the Hansens recently appeared on an Australian radio station and played a self-evident game called "whose song is it? "With the host."
“… Be a lovely young cat... "
"Last year, they felt it necessary to announce that no one had ever done a good cover for mmmbop, and now they have launched a classic Hansen burn in the direction of a slightly more relevant artist who has ever..."
“… Because those boys could be evil... "
"Since they released a very popular song a long time ago, they have won the right to be a bit snobbish, but everyone should be careful not to stand on the bad side of Hansen..."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was like ‘People seem to think we got all this s--t right.’ ””
““I think what we were also guilty of — we obviously cultivated something and it was rewarding for a while.”
“We got, like, on the Twitter feed, ‘Love is dead’ and ‘relationship goals,'” she recalled of reading people’s reaction.”
““Chris and I did talk about [it].”
“During her chat with Dax, she admitted that their #relationshipgoals beloved fan marriage didn’t help with the split.”
“In August 2017 the couple and parents to son Jack announced they were splitting after 8 years of marriage.”
““I do think it is important how other people respect a relationship … I’m not saying it’s a good reason, but it is a small benefit of having that label of being married.”Her quotes come following her shocking split from husband Chris Pratt.”
“...girlfriend she continued...”
“For me I m just not quite sure where it fits especially when it feels so easy to get married and then the untangling when the state gets involved There is the importance of how other people then treat you as a married man than as a man with a...”
“Is it so other people respect your relationship more?”


"It's like 'people seem to think we're doing the right thing.'"
"I think we've also committed a crime - we've obviously cultivated something, and it's worth the time."
"We saw on twitter, 'love to death' and 'relationship goals,'" she recalls, reading people's reactions
"Chris and I did talk about it."
"In a chat with Darth, she admitted that their relationship and their beloved fan marriage didn't help break up."
"In August 2017, the couple and the parents of their son Jack announced that they would break up after eight years of marriage."
"I really think it's important how other people respect a relationship I'm not saying that's a good reason, but with the label of marriage, it's a small benefit. " Her words were quoted after her shocking breakup with her husband, Chris Pratt
“… She went on to say
"For me, I'm just not sure if it's suitable, especially when it feels so easy to get married, and then when the state intervenes, the solution is how other people treat you as a married man instead of a man with I'll treat you like a man. "
"Do other people respect your relationship more?"



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"But Kylie keeps going back and forth on whether she will announce.”
“In the midst of the tidal wave of Kardashian pregnancies that came earlier this year, Khloé kept hers a secret for as long as possible in order to make sure that her younger sister, Kylie Jenner, could have her special moment as a new mom.”
“Wow, when would your big sister ever?”
“2018 got off to a strong start for the Kardashian dynasty, with Kim Kardashian West welcoming her third child, Chicago, back in January.”
“Just one month later, Kylie gave birth to daughter Stormi, having kept her pregnancy (mostly) a secret and deciding not to announce that she was expecting her first child with boyfriend, Travis Scott.”
“Completing the trifecta with a very un-Kardashian-like move, it wasn’t until she was over half way through her own pregnancy that Khloé Kardashian unveiled her baby bump to the world.”
“Revealing the real reason that she waited so long to announce that she and boyfriend Tristan Thompson were to have their first child together, Khloé explained on Keeping Up With The Kardashians that she was only thinking of sister and BFF, Kylie.”
“"I am really anxious to announce my pregnancy, but Kylie‘s three months ahead of me and I want to give her her own time to shine and let her do her thing," Khloé said.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"But Kelly has been debating over and over whether she will announce it."
"In the wave of Kardashian's pregnancy earlier this year, to ensure that her sister Kylie Jenner had her special moment as a new mother, heloe kept herself as secret as long as possible."
"Wow, when will your sister come?"
"In 2018, the Kardashian Dynasty ushered in a strong start. Kim Kardashian West welcomed her third child, Chicago, in January this year."
"Just a month later, Kelly gave birth to her daughter, Tommy, who kept her pregnancy (mostly) secret and decided not to announce that she and her boyfriend Travis Scott were going to have their first child."
"To complete the three children in a very different way from Kardashian, Kardashian didn't show her little lump to the world until she was half pregnant."
"She waited so long to announce the real reason why she and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson are going to have their first child. When she talked to the kardashians, heloe explained that she only thought about her sister and her boyfriend Kelly."
"I really want to announce that I'm pregnant, but Kelly is three months ahead of me, and I want to give her time to shine and do her thing," said heroy
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter and never miss a story.”
“But he wasn’t sure.”
“In details from the book published by the Daily Mail one of Packer s co workers points out just how weird it was for the businessman to team up with a global superstar I always thought the last thing in the world he wanted was publicity Packer and his staffers...”
“...meanwhile say they tried to convince Carey she didn t need to be camera ready at every moment...”
““I remember telling her, ‘No one can photograph you here, you don’t need to worry about the paparazzi,’” says one staffer quoted in the Mail.”
““But she simply responded with words to the effect of, ‘This is me.’”Packer’s first wife, Jodhi Meares, also weighs in, calling the relationship “unusual.” She continues, “But then I thought these are two people who have had some extraordinary experiences and that is how they connect.”
“That is how it made sense.”
“She is Mariah Carey.”
“I was like, ‘wow.’ She is extraordinarily creative, she is an incredible singer, I grew up with her [music], we are both the same age.”
“She might be the biggest star I have ever met.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletters and never miss a story."
"But he's not sure."
"In the details of the book published by the daily mail, a colleague of Parker pointed out how strange it was for the businessman to work with a global superstar. I always thought that the last thing he wanted was to publicize Parker and his employees..."
“… And they're trying to convince Kelly that she doesn't need to be ready to take pictures all the time... "
"I remember telling her, 'no one here can photograph you, you don't have to worry about paparazzi,'" a staff member said in an email
Parker's first wife, jodhi Meares, also said the relationship was "unusual.". "But then I thought these two people had some unusual experiences, and that's how they got connected," she added
"That's what it means."
"She's Maria Kelly."
"I said," wow. " She's very creative, she's an incredible singer, I grew up with her (Music), we're all peers. "
"She's probably the biggest star I've ever seen."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So, she’s got some decision making to do.””
““I told Roxanne we can go anywhere in the world she wants to go and do anything she wants to do,” he said.”
“Next up: thinking about the honeymoon.”
“We had to find ourselves – [then] everything was cool.”The wedding – in which Lavin donned a suit and Siordia wore a cocktail dress – had been planned for a few weeks.”
““But when I got [through] my wreck … it opened my eyes, and we had to work on our relationship more and make It more of a priority.”
“If you go in a coma it really messes with your social life, so don’t do it,” he said, joking.”
““My coma … really messed up things.”
“He now says he’s 100 percent recovered.”
“Fancy weddings aren’t our thing.”The couple had been talking about marriage as long as 6 years ago, but life got in the way after Lavin’s accident left him comatose for 9 days.”
“We thought about doing it at the drive-thru but we couldn’t go through with it, so I said I was down for City Hall.”


"So, she has some decisions to make."
"I told Roxanne that we could go anywhere in the world she wanted to go and do whatever she wanted to do," he said
"Next step: think about honeymoon."
"We have to find ourselves - everything was cool." The wedding - Lavin in a suit and syldia in a cocktail dress - has been planned for weeks
"But when I get through It's an eye opener for me. We have to work harder on our relationship and put it in a more important position. "
"If you're in a coma, it really disrupts your social life, so don't do it," he joked
"My coma It really messed up. "
"He now says he's 100 percent recovered."
"Fancy weddings are not our business." The couple had been talking about marriage six years ago, but life became an obstacle nine days after Raven's accident left him in a coma
"We wanted to do it where we drove by, but we couldn't, so I said I was going to the city hall."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#RIPPrince pic.twitter.com/7As1OFgven — Robert Trujillo (@RobertTrujillo) April 21, 2016Saddened by Prince's death.”
“He made the world a funkier place.”
“I've seen him so many times but never ever enough.”
“Sometimes it Snows in April This is a picture of a poster that I got at one of his shows.”
“'Sometimes it Snows in April.'"”
“I will always love him….”
“He gave me my name, he believed in me, and he has inspired an entire generation.”
“What a blessing it is to be one of the chosen ones who had the chance to work so closely with him.”
“"The world has lost a truly incredible spirit and musical genius.”
“"I was so shocked and heart broken to hear about the loss of my mentor, Prince," Carmen Electra said in a statement.”


"# ripplins pic.twitter.com/7As1OFgven -Robert Trujillo (@ Robert Trujillo) mourns the death of the prince on April 21, 2016
"He makes the world more interesting."
"I've seen him many times, but I've never seen him."
"Sometimes it snows in April. This is a picture of a poster I saw at one of his exhibitions."
"Sometimes it snows in April."
"I will always love him..."
"He gave me my name, he believed me, he inspired a whole generation."
"It's a blessing to be one of the chosen people and to have the opportunity to work so closely with him."
"The world has lost a truly incredible spiritual and musical genius."
"I was shocked and saddened to hear of the loss of my mentor prince," Carmen Electra said in a statement



**Something goes wrong**
“Ratings [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“1 Classical Crossover Album) were discontinued.”
“The Billboard Music Awards show had been held annually since 1990 and the event was formerly held in December[1] until it went dormant in 2006.”
“The awards returned in 2011 and are now held annually in May.”
“2 Awards process edit Unlike other awards such as the Grammy Award which determine nominations as a result of the highest votes received by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences the Billboard Music Awards finalists are based on album and digital songs sales streaming radio airplay touring and...”
“...social engagement...”
“These measurements are tracked year-round by Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen Music and Next Big Sound.”
“The 2018 awards are based on the reporting period of April 8, 2017 through March 31, 2018.”
“[3] Awards are given for the top album, artist and single in a number of different music genres.”
“Awards [ edit ][8] This field shows winners of "Artist of the Year" (awarded from 1995 to 2006), and "Top Artist" (awarded since 2011).”


"Rating [Edit] see also [Edit]"
"1 Classic Crossover Album) has been stopped."
"The Billboard Music Awards ceremony has been held once a year since 1990. The event was previously held in December [1] until it went to sleep in 2006."
"The 2011 awards are now held every May."
"The process editor of the two awards is different from other awards, such as the Grammy Awards. It decides that the result of nomination is the highest number of votes won by the National Academy of recording arts and Sciences. The final of Billboard Music Award is based on album and digital song sales, streaming radio shows, touring and..."
“… Social participation... "
"Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen music and next big sound, track this data throughout the year."
"The awards for 2018 are based on the reporting period from April 8, 2017 to March 31, 2018."
[3] Top albums, artists and singles from different genres will be awarded
Awards [editor] [8] this column shows the winners of "artist of the year" (1995-2006) and "top artist" (2011)



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News on Wednesday.”
““I fell in love, got married quickly and am very sad that two people in love are not together,” Tom, 50, told E!”
“...to Tom D Agostino...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Taped from her house in Sag Harbor, New York, the former countess talked candidly about the demise of her marriage.”
““I didn’t see all these red flags,” she said about watching D’Agostino’s “sneaky” actions for the first time as a RHONY viewer.”
“It s different in that perspective on the show all things piled up Rumors of D Agostino s infidelity which were often brought up by her fellow New York City Housewives this past season was a major part of their split which came after they had a couple of bouts...”
“...and breakups during their romance...”
“Image zoom Credit: Bravo“It was the weekend before the reunion [aired], basically,” she said, when asked if there was one thing that led to their separation.”
““Tom went out and he called up an old girlfriend and they met up with a group of people.”


"The news on Wednesday."
"I fell in love and got married soon. It's very sad that two people in love are not together," Tom, 50, told E
“… To Tom dagostino... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The former Countess made a recording at her home in port saga, New York, about the end of her marriage
"I didn't see all these danger signs," she said, noting that as a rhony audience, she saw dagostino's "sneaky" action for the first time
"From this point of view, it's different. All things have accumulated rumors of D Agostino's infidelity, which is often put forward by her colleague, the New York City housewife, in the past season. It's a major part of their breakup. This is after they have had several contests..."
“… Break up in their romance... "
Asked if there was one thing that led to their separation, she said: "it was basically a weekend before the reunion."
"Tom went out. He called an old girlfriend. They met a group of people."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spent some of my happiest moments with this guy.” At least it looks like all is well between Kendall and Scott now!”
“A month prior to the post, Sofia shared a throwback photo of herself hugging her horse, paired with the caption, “Rip to my beautiful dragon.”
“...that there may have been a subtle diss within the message...”
“Kendall s verified account commented on the post awww scott and his kids The shade continued into February when the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star shared an image of her new horse with the caption my new baby dragon This seemed innocuous enough but fans were quick to notice...”
“It all started when a fan account for Kourtney Kardashian‘s ex shared a photo of him in a car with his 19-year-old girlfriend and his three children.”
“It was a bit surprising to see that these two crossed off a major bucket list item together since the supermodel totally dissed Scott’s relationship with Sofia Richie in January.”
“Neat!”
“Kendall captioned the images, “did it!” to confirm that she and the father of her niece Penelope and nephews, Mason and Reign, did in fact jump out of an airplane together.”
“She shared two photos to Instagram that showed the pair standing next to parachutes while strapped into skydiving gear.”
“The 22-year-old revealed on Instagram that she and Scott, 34, went skydiving together!”


"I had the happiest time with this guy." For now, at least, it seems that everything is fine between Kendall and Scott! "
"A month before posting, Sophia shared a retrospective photo of herself hugging a horse with the title" tearing at my beautiful dragon. "
“… There may be a subtle diss in the message... "
"Kendall's verified account comments after awww Scott and his child shadow continued until February when Kardashian star shared her new horse with the title of my new baby dragon, which seemed harmless, but fans soon noticed..."
"It all started with a fan account of Courtney Kardashian's ex girlfriend sharing photos of him in the car with his 19-year-old girlfriend and three children."
"It's a bit of a surprise to see these two people cross out an important list together, because the supermodel totally denied Scott's relationship with Sophie ARIC in January."
"Great!"
Kendall wrote in the title of the picture: "it worked! "To confirm that she did jump off the plane with her niece Penelope and the fathers of her nephews Mason and Rafe."
"She shared two photos with instagram showing the two standing next to the parachute when they were strapped to the parachute device."
"The 22-year-old revealed on instagram that she was parachuting with Scott, 34!"



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the Whitney trailer below:”
“At heart, Whitney is an intimate family story that reveals a new side to a woman that even her most die-hard fans never knew."”
“They entrusted me with the ‘keys to the vault’ while giving me complete freedom to follow the story wherever it went.”
“"I was lucky enough to have the support of Pat Houston and the Whitney Houston estate in this quest.”
“Director Kevin Macdonald said in a statement.”
““She learned them all.”"I approached Whitney’s life like a mystery story; why did someone with so much raw talent and beauty self-destruct so publicly and painfully?"”
““You have three places to sing from: heart, mind, guts,” her mother, Grammy-winning soul singer Emily “Cissy” Houston, says.”
“The documentary will also serve as a reminder that even though she’s gone, we will *always* love Whitney.”
“It will showcase clips of never-before-seen footage, demo recordings, rare performances, audio archives, and interviews with her closest friends and family, allowing fans to get to know the star like they never have before.”
“Whitney will give us an in-depth, “unflinching” look at Houston’s life — her troubled past, rise to stardom, numerous struggles, and complicated relationship with fame.”


"Watch the following Whitney Trailer:
"In essence, Whitney is a close family story that reveals a new side to a woman that even her most stubborn fans never knew."
"They entrusted me with the key to the vault and gave me complete freedom to follow the story."
"I'm very lucky to have the support of Pat Houston and Whitney Houston estate."
"Director Kevin McDonald said in a statement
"She learned it all." "I regard Whitney's life as a mysterious story; why does a man with so much talent and beauty destroy himself so openly and painfully?"
"You have three places to sing: heart, heart and courage," said Emily Houston, her mother and Grammy award-winning soul singer
"This documentary will also remind us that even if she leaves, we will always love Whitney."
"It will show footage never seen before, demo recordings, rare performances, audio files, and interviews with her closest friends and family, so that fans can get to know the star in an unprecedented way."
"Whitney will give us an in-depth, determined life in Houston - her troubled past, rising to stardom, countless struggles, and complex relationships with fame."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition to the sing-alongs, the group crashed fellow country star RaeLynn‘s holiday party nearby.”
“Coming this Christmas to a Nashville neighborhood near you Lauren wrote along with the same picture.”
““The #CountryCarolers.”
“#1stannual Hayley, who is expecting her first child with Tyler, captioned a photo of the famous friends.”
““We’re cruising around Nashville, if your house looks enticing we just might stop by.”“Wishing you the merriest of Christmases from the #CountryCarolers !”
““We’re going to neighbors’ houses and singing Christmas carols!” Rhett said in his brief clips.”
“Rhett, 27, and Hubbard, 30, lead the group in belting out lyrics from “Deck the Halls” and “White Christmas” as seen in their Instagram Stories.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...carolers and going door to door to sing Christmas songs along with their wives Lauren Akins and Hayley Hubbard as well as friends Russell and Kailey Dickerson...”
“The two country crooners surprised their Nashville neighbors on Monday evening by dressing up as carolers and going door to door to sing Christmas songs The two country crooners surprised their Nashville neighbors on Monday evening by dressing up as...”


"In addition to singing, the band also crashed the holiday party of country star leilin nearby."
"Coming to the neighborhood of Nashville this Christmas, Lauren wrote with the same photo."
"Ode to the country"
"Tanner Haley, who is pregnant with her first child with Taylor, wrote under the title of a photo of a famous friend."
"We're touring Nashville, and if your house looks attractive, we might drop by." "Merry Christmas from the country Caroler!"
"We're going to the neighborhood to sing Christmas carols!"! "Rhett said in a short clip."
Red, 27, and Hubbard, 30, led the band to sing the lyrics of "Decor hall" and "white Christmas" on instagram
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… Carolers and their wives, Lauren Akins and Haley Hubbard, as well as friends Russell and Kelly Dixon, go door-to-door singing
"On Monday night, the two country singers dressed up as carolers and went door to door singing Christmas songs, which surprised Nashville's neighbors. On Monday night, the two country singers dressed up as... "



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jack Black Intense Therapy Lip Balm SPF 25 with Shea Butter & Vitamin E, $7, SephoraFor more beauty items we love, check out our top beauty product launches to try in 2018 and the highlighter that's sold once every minute.”
“MAC Matte Lipstick in "Russian Red," $18, NordstromAmazon MAC Matte Lipstick in "Russian Red," $18, NordstromHer secret?”
“If you purchase something through our links, we may earn a commission.”
“Pricing and availability are accurate as of publish time.”
“Learn more about Shop TODAY .”
“Soft, kissable lips are a must all year-round, but different seasons can present their own set of problems.”
“In the winter, frigid temps and dry air can take its toll.”
“And in the summer, sky-high heat and the sun’s harmful rays can cause major dehydration.”
“How can you pull off the hottest lipstick shade of the season with a chapped pucker?”
“Zoe Saldana has been known to rock a red lip.”


"Jack Black strong physiotherapy lipstick SPF 25 contains shea butter and vitamin E at a price of $7," she said. "We want to know more about our favorite beauty products. Please check our top beauty products in 2018 and the fluorescent pens sold once a minute."
"Russian Red" MAC dummy lipstick, $18, NordstromHer secret?
"If you buy things through our link, we can earn a commission."
"Pricing and availability were accurate as of the time of release."
"Learn more about stores today."
"Soft, kissable lips are a must all year round, but different seasons have their own problems."
"In winter, cold temperatures and dry air can cause damage."
In summer, heat and the sun's harmful light can cause severe dehydration
"How can you pick up the hottest lipstick in this season with a chapped wrinkle?"
"Zoe Saldana has always been known for her rock lips."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Tracy and Tyler will not be attending the nuptials, they are planning on traveling to England as part of “Good Morning Britain’s” royal wedding coverage.”
“The arrangements are being made,” she told the news outlet.”
““I’ve heard that he’s going to be over there and I’m sure that he will be giving her away.”
“Tracy also addresses rumors that Markle’s father will walk his daughter down the aisle.”
“...her become part of the royal family...”
“Tracy said I don t think we are getting invitations but that is fine we are so proud of her Tyler added he last communicated with the former Suits actress three years ago and it was an honor to see...”
“The mother-son pair said the royal-to-be used to babysit Tyler and his brother Thomas but they harbor no hard feelings over being left off the guest list.”
“The Oregon native appeared on “Good Morning Britain” with his mother, Tracy, who is divorced from Thomas Markle Jr.”
“Tyler Dooley, the son of Markle’s half-brother, told “Good Morning Britain” he hadn’t gotten an invitation — though the invitations were mailed out last week.”
“...pic.twitter.com/LrMb8WCszhMeghan Markle’s nephew has not yet received an invite to her highly anticipated wedding to Prince Harry.”


Although Tracy and Taylor will not attend the wedding, they plan to travel to the UK as part of the "good morning Britain" Royal Wedding coverage
"The arrangements are in progress," she told the news media
"I hear he's going there. I'm sure he'll give her away."
"Tracy also talked about rumors that markel's father would take his daughter down the aisle."
“… She became a member of the royal family... "
"Tracy said I don't think we'll be invited, but that's good and we're proud of her. Tyler added that he last talked to a former suit actress three years ago, and it's a great honor to see..."
"The mother and son said that the royal family had been used to taking care of Taylor and his brother Thomas, but they were not sad to be excluded from the guest list."
The Oregon native appeared on "good morning Britain" with his mother Tracy, who divorced Thomas markel Jr
Tyler Dooley, Mark's half brother's son, told good morning Britain that he had not received an invitation - though it was sent last week
“... pic.twitter.com/LrMb8WCszhMeghan Marcel's nephew has not been invited to her much anticipated wedding to Prince Harry



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“David Mueller on Wednesday told the Associated Press he sent Swift a golden Sacagawea dollar coin in the mail last week.”
“He also gave the AP a letter showing the money was sent Nov. 28.”
“In a written response to questions from TIME, which was published Wednesday as part of TIME’s 2017 Person of the Year coverage, Swift said on Nov. 28 that she had not yet received a payment from Mueller.”
““To this day he has not paid me that dollar, and I think that act of defiance is symbolic in itself,” said Swift, who appeared on TIME’s cover as one of the faces of “The Silence Breakers,” people who have spoken out about sexual harassment or assault.”
“A representative for Swift did not immediately comment Thursday on whether the coin has yet reached Swift.”
“In August, a federal jury in Denver determined Mueller had groped Swift at a backstage meet-and-greet in 2013.”
“Swift had taken Mueller to court to countersue him after he first sued her, alleging that she had falsely accused him of groping her.”
“Swift testified that the Colorado DJ reached under her skirt and grabbed her rear end while they posed for a photo together.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
Please enter a valid email address
"David Mueller told the associated press on Wednesday that he sent a Sacagawea gold coin to swift in an email last week."
"He also sent a letter to the associated press indicating that the money was sent on November 28."
"Swift said in a November 28 written response to a time question that she had not received payment from Mueller. The article, published on Wednesday, is part of time's 2017 person of the year report. "
Swift appeared on the cover of time magazine as a "silent Destroyer" and said: "to this day, he has not paid me that dollar. I think this kind of resistance is symbolic in itself."
"A representative of swift didn't immediately comment on whether the coin had arrived in swift on Thursday."
"In August, a federal jury in Denver found that Muller had touched swift at a backstage meeting in 2013."
"After Mueller sued her for the first time, swift took him to court for counterclaim, accusing Mueller of framing him for touching her."
"Swift testified that the Colorado DJ reached under her skirt and grabbed her ass while they took a picture together."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bang Showbiz...”
“It is the driving power for everything we do.”
“The 32 year old musician has admitted that whilst she struggled for a long while when it came to speaking publicly about her struggles with mental health she admits she felt better once she had someone to confide in and says keeping her battle to herself only made her problems...”
“...worse...”
“She said: "I have struggled for a long time, both being public and not public about my mental health issues or my mental illness.”
“But I truly believe that secrets keep you sick Gaga spoke as she honoured her mother Cynthia Germanotta with the Global Changemakers Award at Children Mending Hearts Empathy Rocks fundraiser over the weekend and said that whilst she realises it s safer for her to speak out now that she...”
“...s a star she hopes her work with the charity will help other people come forward too...”
“She added: “I realise that it's actually safer to say how I feel.”
“What Children Mending Hearts is doing today rocks because it's safer for others who feel like me.”The ‘Million Reasons’ singer also highlighted the importance of having “real honest conversations” about mental health, and urged everyone to put more “kindness” into the world.”
“She said: "We bring people together to have real, honest conversations and to be kind.”
“We need more kindness in the world."”
“The 32 year old musician has admitted that whilst she struggled for a long while when it came to speaking publicly about her struggles with mental health she admits she felt better once she had someone to confide in and...”
“...says keeping her battle to herself only made her problems worse...”
“But I truly believe that secrets keep you sick Gaga spoke as she honoured her mother Cynthia Germanotta with the Global Changemakers Award at Children Mending Hearts Empathy Rocks fundraiser over the weekend and said that whilst she realises it...”
“...s safer for her to speak out now that she s a star she hopes her work with the charity will help other people come forward too...”
“What Children Mending Hearts is doing today rocks because it s safer for others who feel like me The Million Reasons singer also highlighted the importance of having real honest conversations about mental health and urged everyone to put more...”
“...kindness into the world...”


"The magnificent performing arts circle..."
"That's the driving force behind everything we do."
"The 32 year old musician admitted that although she struggled for a long time, when she talked about her struggle with mental health in public, she admitted that she would feel better once someone told her, and said that leaving her fight to herself would only make her have problems..."
“… Worse... "
"I struggled for a long time, publicly or not, with my mental health problems or mental illness," she said
"But I really believe the secret makes you sick, Gaga said, because she was honored with her mother Cynthia Germanotta global change award at the children's heart repair compassion rock fundraising event at the weekend, and she said that although she realized it was safer, she now said that she
“…… She is a star. She hopes that her work in charity can help others stand up as well... "
She added: "I realized that it's safer to say how you feel."
"Today, the way children mend their hearts touches people's hearts because it's safer for others who feel like me." The "million reasons" singer also stressed the importance of "truly honest dialogue" on mental health issues and urged everyone to invest more "goodwill" in the world
"We bring people together and have a real, honest conversation and show friendliness," she said
"We need more kindness in the world."
"The 32 year old musician admits that although she has been struggling for a long time, when it comes to her struggle with mental health, she admits that once someone tells her, she will feel better, and...."
“… Saying that letting her fight alone will only make her problems worse... "
"But I really believe that secrets make you sick," said Gaga, who was honored to work with her mother Cynthia Germanotta at the children's heart repair compassion rock fundraising weekend, although she was aware of that... "
“…… Now that she is a star, she hopes that her work in charity can help others stand up as well. "
"Today, what the children are doing touches my heart because it's safer for others who feel like me. The singer also stressed the importance of having a really honest conversation about mental health and urged everyone to put in more... "
“… Be kind to the world... "



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So whether you're in need of a little off-duty inspiration or something a little fancier, you'll see below why Sofia Richie is one to watch below.”
“And oh yeah, let's not forget Sofia Richie's style includes an amazing collection of sunglasses she wears on repeat.”
“When it comes to fancier occasions, the model has an ability to pull off cool-girl looks that are edgy without ever feeling like too much.”
“When it comes to casual off-duty dressing, Richie favors athleisure, picking and choosing the trendiest sportswear pieces ranging from Adidas to Vetements.”
“While the teenage years are often a time to make mistakes, Richie has hit her stride in daring ensembles that we can't help but notice.”
“Sofia Richie may be a youthful 19 years of age, but the model and celebrity style icon is already proving she's got a signature look all her own.”


"So whether you need a bit of inspiration after work or something more fashionable, you can see why Sophia Ritchie is a noteworthy person below."
"Oh, yes, don't forget Sophia Ritchie's style, including the amazing array of sunglasses she wears on the copier."
"When it comes to more advanced occasions, models have the ability to make cool girl looks, avant-garde and not excessive."
"When it comes to casual off-duty wear, rich prefers sports and leisure, choosing the most popular sportswear from Adidas to vetements."
"Although it's often a time to make mistakes as a teenager, we can't help noticing that rich is making big strides in his bold performances."
"Sofia Richie may be a 19-year-old, but the model and celebrity icon has proved that she has her own iconic look."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s just heartbreaking.””
“It’s everything to him.”
““Baseball is his life.”
““I love JJ so much and you never want to see anybody that you love suffering,” she continued.”
““I was just in survival mode and I — ,” Kaylin later explained, before breaking down into tears.”
“While the night started off fine, eventually Kaylin became overwhelmed and locked herself in the bathroom before making an unannounced exit.”
“But instead of letting the negative news get in the way of her life, Kaylin — a former Miss Georgia winner — decided to “put the pageant smile on” and attend a party at her friend Kierra’s house.”
“The Associated Press reported that the baseball player was suspended after testing positive for Testosterone that did not originate in his body.”
“During the episode, viewers learn that her husband — Los Angeles Dodgers pitcher JJ Jurrjens — had been suspended for 80 days.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"So it's heartbreaking."
"That's all he has."
"Baseball is his life."
"I love JJ so much that you never want to see the people you love suffer," she continued
"I'm just in a state of survival, I -", Kailin explained later, and then began to cry
"Although everything went well at the beginning of the evening, in the end, Kailin was at a loss, locked herself in the bathroom and left suddenly."
"But rather than let negative news get in the way of her life, Karin - a former Miss Georgia champion - decided to" put a beauty smile "and attend a party at her friend Kira's house."
"The Associated Press reported that the baseball player was suspended after testing positive for testosterone, which is not from his body."
"In this episode, the audience learns that her husband, Los Angeles Dodgers pitcher JJ jurrjens, has been suspended for 80 days."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There is a wide canyon between mere allegation and truth, and we are confident that any sober calculation of the facts will prove no legal wrongdoing occurred.”
“I despise your hypocrisy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Rose McGowan is a friend and while I support her kind of movement, I do not support any woman (or man) shaming or taunting the movements of other women who are trying to create change,” she tweeted.”
““Telling us to all wear Marchesa?”
“This is beneath you, Rose.”She continued: “You don’t have to support and stand with us, but we stand and support you.”
“You may take below the belt shots at us but we will not take them at you in return Writing that the black dresses represents the darkness sexual assualt victims feel Tamblyn concluded We stand together in this fight shoulder to shoulder weapon to weapon woman to woman and man...”
“...body to burned body...”
“And our arms are open.”
“And our hearts two fold.”


"There is a huge gap between pure accusations and facts, and we believe that any calm calculation of facts will not prove any legal error."
"I despise your hypocrisy."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Rose McGovern is my friend, and while I support her movement, I don't support any movement in which women (or men) humiliate or ridicule other women trying to create change," she tweeted
"Tell us all to wear machesha?"
"That's mean, rose." She went on, "you don't have to support us, we support you."
"You can shoot us in the dark, but we won't shoot you in the dark, because we wrote down that the black dress represents darkness to ease the feelings of the victims, and tambrin concluded that we stand together, shoulder to shoulder in this battle, weapons against women and men..."
“… Bodies to burned bodies... "
"We open our arms."
"Our hearts are double."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Cardi B Shares Advice for Khloe Kardashian Amid Tristan Thompson Cheating ScandalNicki Minaj Parties With Shania Twain and Timothee Chalamet at Coachella -- See the PicsNicki Minaj Cries, Confirms Cardi B Drama: 'I Had Never Seen Her Show Me Genuine Love'Related Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Cardi B didn’t let her pregnancy slow her down one bit on Sunday as she took to the stage at Coachella.”
“The 25-year-old rapper stepped out in a strapless white jumpsuit that showed off her growing baby bump, with cutouts down the legs.”
“Rocking pigtails and lots of bling, the "Bodak Yellow" artist danced, twerked and even pelvic thrusted onstage to the delight of concertgoers.”
“The performance also featured cameos from Chance the Rapper, G-Easy, and Kehlani, who are also featured on Cardi's new album, Invasion of Privacy.”
“At one point during her provocative, twerk-filled performance, Cardi joked, "That’s how I got pregnant."”
“It's been a big week for the mom to be, whose album debuted at no.”
“1 on the Billboard 200 charts, making her the fifth female rapper ever to achieve this success.”
“Later in the evening, Cardi’s fiancé, Offset, performed with his group, Migos, and while he didn’t bring Cardi on stage as expected, fans noticed that when the trio performed their song, “Motorsport,” they rapped Cardi’s verse but left out Nicki Minaj’s lyric entirely.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Cardi B shares his advice to Carol Kardashian at Tristan Thompson's party with Shania Twain and Timothy chalamit in cochella - watching pisnick minaget's cry confirms Cardi B's Drama: "I've never seen her show me true love" related gallery “
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Katie B didn't slow down because he was pregnant when he came on stage in cochella on Sunday."
The 25-year-old rapper came out wearing a strapless white Jumpsuit that showed the small lumps she was growing up with cuts in her legs
"Bodak yellow" artists wave their braids and wear a lot of jewelry. They dance, pronounce words and even insert their pelvis on the stage, making the concert audience happy
"The show also includes guest stars from rappers chance, g-easy and kehlani, who also appear on Cardi's new album invasion of privacy."
Once, in her provocative, twirk filled performance, Cardi joked, "that's how I got pregnant."
"It's an important week for the mother to be, and his album made its debut on her first album."
"Being number one on billboard 200 makes her the fifth female rapper ever to achieve this success."
"Later, Katie's fiance, offset, performed with his band migos. Although he didn't bring Katie to the stage as expected, fans noticed that when the three performed their song" racing car ", they beat Katie's verse, but completely omitted Niki Minagi's lyrics."



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'They are there but right now they are busy doing other things,' she said as the girls giggled.”
“Love reading: Jordyn was told that she had no immediate prospects for loveBut Jordyn was not so lucky and the shaman told her there were no immediate prospects for love.”
“Kylie told the cameras that she wanted Jordyn to 'know that I will always be there to support her.'”
“Relationship ceremony: Kylie explained that the ceremony was 'like a marriage for friends''I want people to know we are more than that,' said Kylie.”
“'No but you guys can't get married, I mean you are best friends,' Kris told her.”
“Kylie asked.”
“'Are you against us being together?'”
“Best friend: Jordyn exchanged vows with her best friend KylieGood question: Kris Jenner asked if Kylie was gay as she talked about the ceremonyKylie explained that the ceremony was 'like a marriage for friends'.”
“Are you gay' Kris asked.”
“'So are you coming out?”


"They're there, but they're busy doing something else right now," she said, giggling
"Love reading: Jordan was told she didn't have immediate love prospects, but Jordan wasn't so lucky. Shaman told her there was no immediate love prospects."
"Kelly told the camera that she wanted Jordan to 'know that I'll always support her.'
"Love rituals: Kelly explains that weddings are like friends' marriages, and I want people to know that we're more than that," Kelly says
"No, but you can't get married, I mean you're best friends," Chris told her
"Kelly asked
"Do you object to our being together?"
"Good friend: Jordan exchanged vows with his good friend Kelly. Good question: Chris Jenner asked Kelly if she was gay when talking about the wedding. She explained that the wedding was like a" friend's marriage. "
"Are you gay?" Asked Chris
"Are you coming out?"



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the end, thankfully all the lipoma was removed successfully, and it is benign.”Bailey says she’s now back at her home, which she calls “Lake Bailey,” and recovering well.”
““It was also larger than expected.”
““Surgery went well, however it went much longer than expected because the tumor was embedded very deeply in my back and partially under a muscle,” she explains.”
“Thankfully, the tumor was not cancerous.”
“Thankfully I’m okay.”Bailey set up surgery to remove the lipoma, and doctors were able to remove it, but with some difficulty.”
“Had a little health scare.”
“On Saturday, Bailey shared a photo from the doctor’s office and told her followers that she had an “early morning doctor appointment today.”
“I was scared because as soon as I heard the word tumor, I immediately thought cancer,” she says.”
““I Googled it immediately, and was blown away by the photos of the worst cases in particular.”
“Bailey’s doctor told her the growth was lipoma, a fatty tumor that grows in the body’s immune system, and she started to panic.”


"In the end, thank goodness, all the lipomas were successfully removed and were benign." Bailey said she is now back at home, which she calls "Bailey Lake" and is recovering well
"It's bigger than expected."
"The operation went well, but it took much longer than expected because the tumor was deeply embedded in my back, partly under the muscles," she explained
Thank goodness, the tumor didn't become cancerous
"Thank goodness, I'm fine." Bailey arranged the operation to remove the lipoma. The doctors were able to remove it, but it was difficult
"A little bit of a health problem."
On Saturday, Bailey shared a picture of the doctor's office and told her followers that she "has a doctor's appointment this morning."
"I was scared because when I heard the word" tumor, "I immediately thought of cancer," she said
"I immediately googled, especially the photos of the worst cases
Bailey's doctor told her it was a lipoma, a lipoma that grows in the body's immune system, and she began to panic



**Something goes wrong**
“It's like all of the stars were in alignment," she said.”
“This opportunity came to me right after the separation.”
“And I think that I emerged from it by literally staying home and learning to be happy with myself, that I came out a stronger person.”
“And I had to process through that pain.”
“"So there was a long period of sadness and a lot of tears and a lot of pain.”
“It just made it real to me," she said.”
“"After the reunion when we officially announced the separation, it was difficult for me because even though we had been separated for a little over a month, it had become public, and now everybody knew about it.”
“It took Shannon some time and a lot of soul searching to get to this positive place.”
“So things are very good."”
“I'm so grateful and blessed for the things that are going on in my life and for the people that I have in my life right now.”


"It's like all the stars line up," she said
"After the separation, I had this opportunity."
"I think I learned to be happy with myself by staying at home. I'm a stronger person."
"I had to endure that pain."
"So there was a long period of sadness, a lot of tears and a lot of pain."
"It's true to me," she said
"After we officially announced the reunion of separation, it was very difficult for me, because although we have been separated for more than a month, it has been made public, and now we all know it."
"It took Shannon some time and a lot of reflection to come to this positive place."
"So it's good."
"I am very grateful and blessed for what happened in my life and for the people I have in my life now."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“VH1Suddenly, the goal post had shifted.”
“It’s the greatest upset in “Drag Race” herstory, but producers’ tricks are starting to wear thin on a dedicated fanbase who have been jerked around one too many times.”
“On Thursday night’s season finale of “RuPaul’s Drag Race All Stars” Season 3, the clear frontrunner — one Miss Shangela “Hallelu” Laquifa Wadley — was shut out from even competing in the final lip sync.”
“Perhaps the most chilling part of the whole kerfuffle is that the decision was made by her fellow queens.”
“(The episode’s title: “A Jury of Their Queers”).”
“Even more shocking was the final vote breakdown, posted to Twitter after the episode (using a weighted voting system that could give the Oscars a run for its money) which Ru-vealed that only one queen voted for Shangela.”
“(Thorgy Thor, you are redeemed.)”
“Instead of an epic three-season long redemption arc for Shangela, whose growth and tenacity is as fitting a metaphor for “Drag Race” as any, we got a lethargic lip-sync that ended with the crowning of the season’s third best queen.”
“Heading into Thursday’s finale, Shangela’s biggest competition, BenDeLaCreme, had already eliminated herself in the season’s first wig-snatching twist.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Obviously, the post has moved."
"It's one of the most disturbing episodes in the history of seesaw, but the producer's tricks are starting to diminish among a loyal fan who has been pushed around too many times."
"At the end of the third season of Rupert's cross dressing all star on Thursday night, the obvious front runner, Miss Shangri La" harrylu "raquefa Wadley, was even blocked from the final oral contest."
"Perhaps the most chilling part of the whole mess is that the decision was made by her fellow queens."
"(the title of this episode is:" their gay jury ")
"What's more shocking is the final voting result, which was posted on twitter after the episode (using a weighted voting system that allows Oscars to run for their own money), which revealed that only one queen voted for Shangri La."
(Torre toll, you are redeemed.)
"The growth and tenacity of Shangri La, like any epic three season arc of redemption in the past, can be compared with" drag run ". However, we had a sleepy lip synchronization and finally won the third best queen of the season."
"In Thursday's final, Shangri La's biggest rival, bendela Creme, has eliminated himself in the first wig snatch of the season."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the meantime, watch a short video featuring some of the highlights coming in November below:”
“...and specials being removed from Netflix next month...”
“22nd Streaming November 23rd Streaming November 25th My Little Pony Friendship is Magic Best Gift Ever Streaming November 27th Bumping Mics with Jeff Ross Dave Attell NETFLIX ORIGINAL Streaming November 29th Pocoyo Season 4 Streaming November 30th Check back in a little while for a full list of movies shows...”
“8th The Sea of Trees Streaming November 9th Streaming November 12th Green Room Streaming November 13th Streaming November 15th Streaming November 16th Streaming November 18th The Pixar Story Streaming November 19th The Last Kingdom Season 3 NETFLIX ORIGINAL Streaming November 20th Streaming November 21st The Tribe NETFLIX FILM Streaming November...”
“Evil Streaming November 4th Disney s Pirates of the Caribbean At World s End Patriot Act with Hasan Minhaj Streaming Every Sunday begins October 28 NETFLIX ORIGINA Streaming November 5th Homecoming Season 1 John Leguizamo s Latin History for Morons NETFLIX ORIGINAL Streaming November 7th Into the Forest Streaming November...”
“Hood vs.”
“The English PatientThe Judgement — NETFLIX ORIGINALThe Untold Tales of Armistead MaupinThe Water Horse: Legend of the DeepTranscendenceVayaStreaming November 2ndStreaming November 3rdHoodwinked Too!”
“1National Lampoon’s Animal HouseNext Avengers: Heroes of TomorrowPlanet HulkScary Movie 2Scary Movie 3Sex and the City: The MovieSixteen CandlesStink!”
“Cloverfield Deuce Bigalow European Gigolo Doctor Strange Fair Game Director s Cut Follow This Part 3 NETFLIX ORIGINAL From Dusk Till Dawn Good Will Hunting Jet Li s Fearless Julie Julia Katt Williams The Pimp Chronicles Pt...”
“You can see the full list of additions to the Netflix streaming service for the month of November below Streaming November 1st Angela s Christmas NETFLIX ORIGINAL Bram Stoker s Dracula Bring It On In It to Win It Cape Fear Children of Men Close Encounters of the Third Kind...”


At the same time, please watch a short video, including the following highlights of November:
“… We're going to remove specials from Netflix next month... "
"Stream 22 November 23 stream November 25 my pony friendship is the most amazing gift stream ever. On November 27, the microphone collided with Jeff Roth, Dave Artel Netflix original stream November 29, pocoyo season 4 stream November 30, come back to see a complete list of movie shows..."
"The 8th sea of trees November 9 flow November 12 green house flow November 13 flow November 15 flow November 16 flow Pixar story flow November 19 last Kingdom Season 3 Netflix original flow November 20 flow November 21 tribal Netflix movie flow November..."
"Evil streaming media November 4 Disney's Pirates of the Caribbean at the end of the world Patriot Act and Hassan minhajj streaming media every Sunday October 28 Netflix original streaming media November 5 Homecoming Festival season 1 John Leguizamo's Latin history fool Netflix original streaming media November 7 into the forest streaming media November 7..."
"Hood and"
"The trial of the British patient - Netflix's original unknown story of Amister Mauping: Shuima: The Legend of deep Transcendence: November 2 flow, November 3 was also hoodwinked!"
"1 National caricature animal house, the next Avenger: tomorrow's hero Planet Hulk Cary Movie 2 Cary Movie 3 Sikes and city: movie the candlelight of teenagers!"
"Cloverfield deuce Bigalow European gigolo Doctor Strange fair game director s cut follow this part 3 Netflix original from dawn good will hunting
"You can see all the new content of Netflix streaming services in November, as follows: streaming media on November 1, Angela's Christmas, the original work of Netflix Bram Stoker's Dracula, brought it into it and won the third kind of intimate contact of Cape Fear children of men..."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The 40-year-old singer's tour will be her first in six years, and is her sixth tour.”
“Mother-of-two Shakira said the vocal problems started in November when she started suffering a "strange hoarseness".”
“A post shared by Shakira (@shakira) on Dec 27, 2017 at 6:16am PSTShe also expressed her thanks for the "prayers and messages of affection and encouragement" from her fans in recent weeks following the injury, and said she is "counting the days till showtime".”
“I really can't wait for June!"”
“"I am very proud of this show; I feel it's my best yet, since it has a repertoire filled with heartfelt songs and exciting moments of music and dance.”
“AdvertisementShe added: "Thankfully, I am so relieved and happy to share with you that I will be getting back on the road in June 2018 with my El Dorado World Tour in Europe, and the US, with Latin America dates to be announced soon.”
“Image: Shakira with her family at the Christmas Day New York Knicks game"I feel for all of you who planned ahead to come to these shows and who have been so patient as I took the time needed to figure out the best course of action with my doctors."”
“Shakira said: "Though I very much hoped my vocal cords would recover in time to pick the tour back up in January, and after exploring many options to that effect, I have accepted that this is an injury that simply needs more time and care to heal.”
“She shared a message on Instagram where she explained she'd hoped the first delay would be long enough for her to return to good health.”
“The Colombian singer moved her El Dorado world tour from November to January, but has now told fans she needs more time to recover and will have to wait until June to start the shows.”


"The 40 year old singer's tour will be her first and sixth in six years."
Shakira, a mother of two, said she began to have "strange hoarseness" in November
"Shakira (@ Shakira) shared a blog post at 6:16 a.m. on December 27, 2017, thanking fans for their" messages of prayer, love and encouragement "in recent weeks after the injury, and saying that she was" counting to show time. "
"I can't wait for June!"
"I'm very proud of this performance. I think it's my best performance so far, because its repertoire is full of sincere songs and exciting music and dance moments."
She added: "thank you, I'm very pleased and happy to share with you that I will return to the Eldorado world tour in Europe and the United States in June 2018, and the date for Latin America will be announced soon."
"Information picture: Shakira and his family said during the Christmas game against the New York Knicks," I sympathize with all of you who planned to come to these shows in advance. They are very patient because I spent time with my doctors to find out the best course of action. "
"Although I very much hope that my vocal cords will recover in time to restart the tour in January, after exploring many of these options, I have accepted that it is an injury that needs more time and care to heal," Shakira said
"She shared a message on instagram, explaining that she wanted to postpone the first time long enough to get her back to health."
"The Colombian singer changed her El Dorado world tour from November to January, but now she tells her fans that she needs more time to recover and that she has to wait until June to start performing."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And what film is this?”
“Taylor and Dakota Johnson in NYC on October 12, 2016 Getty Images12 November 2016:Taylor is papped going to watch a film with her mother and two of the Haim sisters Este and Alana in Los Angeles.”
“...what it s like if we write this song together...”
“This was the first time we had a conversation where I came in and I was like Hey this could be really weird and we could hate this so could we just because we re in quarantine and there s nothing else going on could we just try to see...”
“"It was a step that we would never have taken because why would we have ever written a song together?”
“And I just was like, 'Hello,'" Taylor said.”
“She later revealed, "I just heard Joe singing the entire, fully formed chorus of 'Betty' from another room.”
“And Joe, Joe plays piano beautifully, and he's always just playing and making things up and kind of creating things."”
“He's not a real person... William Bowery is Joe, as we know.”
“Joe plays piano beautifully [...] #exile was crazy because Joe had written the entire piano part.” pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG — louise  (@tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020"There's been a lot of discussion about William Bowery and his identity.”


"What kind of movie is this?"
"On October 12, 2016, Taylor and Johnson of Dakota filmed Getty Images in New York. November 12, 2016: Taylor is going to see a movie in Los Angeles with her mother and Haim's two sisters Esther and Alana."
“… What if we write this song together... "
"This is the first time we have a conversation, I come in, I think hey, this may be really strange, we can hate this, so we can just because we are in isolation, nothing else happens, we can try to have a look..."
"It's a step we'll never take, because why do we write a song together?"
"I just said, 'Hello,'" Tyler said
She later revealed, "I just heard Joe singing the whole" Betty "chorus in another room."
"Joe, Joe plays the piano very well. He's always playing, editing and creating."
"He's not a real person... We know that William Barry is Joe
"Joe plays the piano very well ]#Exile is crazy because Joe wrote the whole piano part pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG -Louise (@ tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020 "there is a lot of discussion about William Barry and his identity."



**Something goes wrong**
““I got a sweet, kind man.”Relive their adorable story in the video above.”
““I got a good one,” she told Entertainment Tonight in April 2016.”
“The pair then kept fans on their toes during their three-year-long engagement before they stunned even their closest friends by throwing a surprise wedding at their Los Angeles home on August 5, 2015.”
““Justin Theroux had an amazing birthday Friday, receiving an extraordinary gift when his girlfriend, Jennifer Aniston, accepted his proposal of marriage,” his rep told Us at the time.”
“The Leftovers actor popped the question to Aniston on his 41st birthday on August 10, 2012.”
““He is funny, kind and easy to be with.”Fast-forward two years and Theroux was ready to make it official.”
““My first [thought] was that this was completely easy,” she explained to Pop Sugar of Theroux.”
“Although they met in 2007 on the set of Tropic Thunder (which Theroux cowrote with Aniston’s close friend Ben Stiller), it wasn’t until Aniston and Theroux worked alongside each other in 2010 on Wanderlust that she found her Prince Charming.”
“The Just Go With It actress dated her Break-Up costar Vince Vaughn in 2006 before moving on to bad boy John Mayer, who she dated for a year prior to splitting in March 2009.”
“While Theroux was still dating Bivens, Aniston was mending a broken heart and getting back in the dating game.”


"I have a lovely, kind man." Relive their lovely story in the video above
"I got a good answer," she said in an interview with entertainment tonight in April 2016
"The two then kept fans on guard during their three-year engagement until August 5, 2015, when they held a surprise wedding at their home in Los Angeles, which shocked even their closest friends."
His agent told us at the time: "Justin Cyrus had a great birthday on Friday and received an extraordinary gift when his girlfriend, Jennifer Aniston, accepted his proposal."
On August 10, 2012, Aniston's 41st birthday, the actress proposed to him
"He's funny, kind and easy to get along with." Two years later, serrux was ready to make a formal announcement
"My first thought was that it was simple," she explained to pop suger of seru
"Although they met in 2007's" tropical thunder "(Theroux and Aniston's close friend Ben Stiller), it was not until 2010 that Aniston and Theroux fought side by side in" vagabond Mania "that she found her prince charming."
The "go with the flow" actress dated her breakup partner Vince Vaughn in 2006 and then dated the bad boy John Mayer for a year until March 2009
"While seru was still dating campers, Aniston was repairing a broken heart and starting dating again."



**Something goes wrong**
“Otherwise, it’s definitely Justin — albeit we only get to spend a few seconds with him.”
“He’s wearing a red broach and a white tuxedo, as well as an uncharacteristic mustache.”
“Yes!”
“When Finn and Rose are in the Canto Bright casino, one of the gambling aliens can be seen in the background holding the recognizable pup.”
“In early December, Gary tweeted out his special The Last Jedi appearance.”
“Fisher and her pet were an item, with Gary garnering his own immense popularity that he ended up with his own Twitter account.”
“Gary the dogGary regained public prominence last year after his owner, Carrie Fisher, passed away.”
“Update: Alas, according to SlashFIlm, Hardy exchanged some lines of dialog with Finn, but those scenes were definitely cut — guess we’ll have to wait for the Blu-ray.”
“And now, onto the lucky folks we can actually find in The Last Jedi.”
“But Comicbook suggests that Hardy and Barlow are still present during the scene in which Finn and Rose go undercover in order to break into Snoke’s ship.”


"Otherwise, it must be Justin - even though we can only be with him for a few seconds."
"He's wearing a red brooch, a white tuxedo and an unusual beard."
"Yes
"When Finn and rose are at the Cantor light casino, a gambling alien can be seen in the background holding an identifiable puppy."
"At the beginning of December last year, Gary tweeted a special statement from his last appearance with the Jedi."
"Fisher and her pet are a project, and Gary has gained a lot of popularity. He ended his twitter account."
Gary the dog returned to the spotlight last year after the death of its owner, Carrie Fisher
"Update: Well, according to slashfilm, hardy and Finn exchanged a few lines of dialogue, but those scenes must have been deleted - we'll have to wait for Blu ray."
"Now, look at the lucky ones we can find in the last Jedi."
"But comicbook shows that Hardy and barrow are still there in the scene where Finn and rose are undercover to break into snooker's boat."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He's also slated to open for The Carters on the North American leg of their On The Run II Tour this summer.”
“Since then, Khaled has been blessed to work with the Brooklyn-bred MC on three additional occasions.”
“Khaled actually met the New Orleans legend in his hometown and continued to build their relationship whenever Wayne was in Miami.”
“If you frequent the LIV nightclub on a Sunday, there's a good chance you'll see Weezy sipping in VIP.”
“...a staple in the 305 music scene...”
“Lil Wayne Number of Appearances 12 Songs We Takin Over I m the One I m On One Take It to the Head Welcome to My Hood I m So Hood No New Friends Tourist Brown Paper Bag Bitches Bottles How Many Times Holla at Me Lil Wayne has become...”
“Ross appeared on 2007's "We Takin' Over" smash to four different tracks on the inspirational figure's Grateful album a decade later.”
“Rozay is a shoo-in to lay down a verse when Khaled is piecing together his next hit record.”
“The fellow Miami natives spend plenty of time together outside of music, as their houses are only a jet ski ride away.”
“On Everything Pull a Caper Holla at Me The ongoing bromance between DJ Khaled and Rick Ross is real...”


"He also plans to start the second round of the North American tour for cartel this summer."
"Since then, Khalid has had the privilege of working three times at the MC he trained in Brooklyn."
"Khalid actually met the legends of New Orleans in his hometown, and whenever Wayne was in Miami, he would continue to build their relationship."
"If you go to liv nightclub a lot on Sundays, you're likely to see Witz sipping in the VIP room."
“… 305 music's main song... "
"Lil Wayne shows 12 songs we took over I'm the only one I took it to the end welcome to my hood I'm such a hood no new friends travel brown paper bag bitch bottle how many times holla in me Lil Wayne has become..."
Ten years later, rose appeared on the 2007 "we take over" album "gratitude," with four different songs
"When Khalid is cobbling together his next hit, Rossi is a good choice."
Miami natives spend a lot of time together outside of music because their house is only a motorboat ride away
"In all things, yelling at me, the quarrel between DJ Khalid and richcross is real..."



**Something goes wrong**
“...and Lionsgate TV recently suspended The Royals showrunner Mark Schwahn over sexual harassment allegations by cast and crew members of both his previous show, One Tree Hill, and The Royals.”
“...and Jessica Queller...”
“...the accusations...”
““After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros Television Group has terminated Andrew Kreisberg’s employment, effective immediately,” the company said in a statement.”
““We remain committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our productions.”WBTVKreisberg has been one of the top lieutenants of Greg Berlanti, architect of the CW DC universe, whose company Berlanti Prods.”
“...produces all series.”
“Kreisberg had been hands-on involved in The Flash and Supergirl, serving as co-showrunner on both.”
“Following his exit Berlanti co creator exec producer of the two series will step in for him assuming additional responsibilities on both The Flash where he will work closely with executive producer co showrunner Todd Helbing and Supergirl where he will work closely with executive producers co showrunners Robert Rovner...”
“Related Story Matt Lauer Fired By NBC News Over Allegation Of 'Inappropriate Sexual Behavior'“Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded its investigation into the allegations against Andrew Kreisberg,” Berlanti Prods.’ Berlanti and Sarah Schechter said in a statement.”
“Meanwhile, E!”


“…… Lion Gate recently suspended mark Schwann, the host of RTV, because of sexual harassment charges against him from his previous show a tree mountain and RTV actors and crew members. "
“… And Jessica Quiller... "
“… "Charge..."
"After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros. Television Group has terminated the employment of Andrew cressberg with immediate effect," Warner Bros. said in a statement
"We are still committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our production." Wbtv Kreisberg has been one of the lieutenants of Greg berlantis, the architect of CW DC Universe and the company berlantis prods
“… Production of all series. "
"Kresberg personally participated in the shooting of flash and super girl and served as a co projectionist for the two films."
"After he quits, the executive producer, the co creator of the two series, will take on more responsibilities. He will work closely with executive producer co stars Todd Herbin and super girl, and he will work closely with executive producer co star Robert rofner..."
"In connection with this, Matt Raul was fired by NBC news for alleged" sexual misconduct. " "Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded an investigation into Andrew Kreisberg's charges," berlanti said in a statement
"At the same time, e!"



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[1]See also [ edit ]Joy Mangano, HSN inventor...”
“[13][14]Personal life [ edit ]Lori is married to Dan Greiner.”
“She is an investor on the reality TV show Shark Tank and its spin-off Beyond the Tank.”
“She has been known as the "Queen of QVC" since 2000, with the premiere of her show Clever & Unique Creations.”
“[2] Greiner is the president and founder of For Your Ease Only, Inc.[1][3]Early life [ edit ]Greiner grew up in Near North Side, Chicago.”
“She majored in communications at Loyola University Chicago and worked for The Chicago Tribune while in college.”
“She was briefly a playwright and a jewelry designer and seller.”
“[4]Career [ edit ]In 1996, Greiner created and patented a plastic earring organizer.”
“J.C. Penney picked up the product before the holiday season, allowing her to pay off her $300,000 loan in eighteen months.”
“[5][6] Greiner has patented consumer products in other categories such as cosmetic organization, jewelry storage, travel, electronics, and household items.”


"[1] see also [Edit] joy Mangano, HSN inventor..."
"[13] [14] personal life [editor] Lori married Dan Greiner."
"She's an investor in the reality show shark tank and its derivative beyond the tank."
Since 2000, she has been known as "Queen of QVC" and her show "smart and unique creation" premiered
"[2] Greiner is the president and founder of for your ease only, Inc. [1] [3] early [Edit] Greiner grew up on the north side near Chicago. "
"She majored in communication at Loyola University in Chicago and worked for the Chicago Tribune during her college years."
"She had a brief career as a playwright, jewelry designer and salesman."
"[4] occupation [editor] in 1996, Greiner invented and patented a plastic earring box."
"J.C. Penney bought the product before the holiday and paid off her $300000 loan in 18 months."
[5] [6] Greiner has patents on consumer goods in other areas, such as cosmetics, jewelry storage, tourism, electronics and household products



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And karma for you is gon’ be who you end up with.”Last week, Cardi surrendered to police and was arrested then charged with one count of assault and two counts of reckless endangerment.”
“… But that’s not my M.O., I’m not that type of bitch.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Cardi B is opening up about her marriage to Offset — and how she handles the infidelity rumors that have plagued their public relationship.”
““Every single day there’s rumors about me and my dude.”
“And it almost drives me crazy, because I start to believe them.”
“I don’t have no proof.”
“I don’t have receipts.”
“But I just got to know my man,” the rapper, who turns 26 on Thursday, said in her new W Magazine cover story.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Your retribution is your end." Last week, Kadi surrendered to police and was arrested and charged with one assault and two reckless endangerments
“… But that's not my M.O., I'm not that kind of bitch. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Katie B has made her marriage public to offset - and how she handles rumors of infidelity that have plagued their public relations."
"Every day there are rumors about me and my friends."
"It almost drove me crazy because I started to believe them."
"I have no proof."
"I don't have a receipt."
"But I just met my man," the rapper, who turns 26 on Thursday, said in a new W magazine cover story
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...this time...”
“We appreciate the support of those who have seen that our product and promotion were not intended to cause offense but as a global brand we have a responsibility to be aware of and attuned to all racial and cultural sensitivities and we have not lived up to this responsibility...”
““But we clearly haven’t come far enough … We agree with all the criticism that this has generated – we have got this wrong and we agree that, even if unintentional, passive or casual racism needs to be eradicated wherever it exists.”
“The company issued another apology on Tuesday, admitting they “got this wrong and are deeply sorry.”“Our standards are high and we feel that we have made real progress over the years in playing our part in promoting diversity and inclusion,” they wrote.”
“H&M quickly responded by apologizing, pulling the photo and removing the product from sale.”
“I’m deeply offended and will not be working with H&M anymore.” Backlash over the photo spread this week on social media, with various celebrities – including Questlove – blasting the U.K. ad.”
“...this photo...”
“I hope that this situation will serve as the wake up call that H M and other companies need to get on track and become racially and culturally aware as well as more diverse at every level The Weeknd tweeted on Monday Woke up this morning shocked and embarrassed by...”
““I can’t allow for my name and brand to be associated with a company that could let this happen.”
“...he added...”


“… This time... "
"We appreciate the support of those who see our products and promotions with no intention of offending, but as a global brand, we have a responsibility to be aware of and adapt to all ethnic and cultural sensitivities, and we have not fulfilled that responsibility..."
"But obviously we are not enough We agree with all the criticisms that arise - we are wrong, we agree that even unintentional, passive or casual racism needs to be eradicated anywhere. "
The company apologized again on Tuesday, admitting that they "made a mistake, I'm sorry." "Our standards are high and we feel that we have made real progress in promoting diversity and inclusiveness over the years," they wrote
"H & M quickly responded, apologized, removed the photos and removed the product from the sale."
"I've been deeply offended and won't cooperate with H & M anymore." This week's photos have generated strong repercussions on social media, with celebrities including Questlove making a splash in British advertising.
“… This picture... "
"I hope this situation will ring an alarm bell for HM and other companies to get on the right track, understand race and culture, and be more diversified at all levels. Weeknd twitter released on Monday woke up this morning in shock and embarrassment..."
"I can't associate my name and brand with a company that might make this happen."
“… He added



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(The pair spent 15 days on the road together after the show wrapped, but they were long-distance the rest of the time.)”
“Out with the old, in with the TRUE.”
“It s a bit strange to feel the need to post about this but I don t think I can honestly resume my normal programming without giving you an explanation and maybe that s the wrong word but I just wanted to thank y all for the love and respect...”
“...you ve shown me over the past few days she began...”
““I spent 5 years away from Bachelor Nation as I lived abroad and traveled for work.”
“I came back to Winter Games because I’ve seen this franchise work miracles before,” she continued.”
““Through The Bachelor and my journey around the world, I have made deep connections, true meaningful intimate relationships with many walks of life.”
“I know it’s imperative to find someone who chooses us and acknowledges our many layers, who can be open and vulnerable, and most importantly, who is ready.”
“To meet someone and be met.”
“To be chosen and to choose.”


(after the show, they spent 15 days on the road together, but the rest of the time was a long journey.)
"Trade the old for the new, trade the real for the new."
"It's a bit strange, I think it's necessary to publish this article, but I don't think I can honestly restore my normal programming without giving you an explanation. Maybe this is a wrong word, but I just want to thank you for your love and respect..."
“…… You've shown it to me in the past few days, and she started to... "
"I left the bachelor country for five years because I worked and traveled abroad."
"I came back to the Winter Olympics because I've seen this team work miracles before," she continued
"By being single and traveling around the world, I have built deep connections with all walks of life, truly meaningful intimacy."
"I know it's very necessary to find a person who chooses us and recognizes us. He can be open and vulnerable, and most importantly, he is ready."
"Meet someone and be met."
"To be chosen and to be chosen."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...celebrity entertainment news and lifestyle videos subscribe to Us Weekly s YouTube Page...”
“That would disrupt core military missions around the world and needlessly endanger our troops Jenner concluded her blog post America s 15 000 trans service members and 134 000 veterans are much braver than you Mr Trump my allegiance is with them and our country not you For the latest...”
“Does President Trump intend to just pull 15,000 people out of every critical position to which they are currently assigned?”
““Furthermore, this half-baked idea puts all of our service members in harm’s way.”
““I believe every American should be outraged by the disrespect shown to those people wearing our country’s uniform,” she wrote.”
““What happened to your promise to fight for them?”The Secrets of My Life author later released a full statement on her website.”
“...announced on Twitter that transgender individuals will no longer be able to serve in the U S military in any capacity There are 15 000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us Jenner tweeted on July 26”
“She later told CNN that she did not regret casting her vote for Trump saying I don t support him in everything that he does but we needed to shake the system up The Olympic gold medalist formerly known as Bruce reversed course in July after the real estate mogul...”
“...series, I Am Cait.”
“Jenner publicly supported Trump, 71, throughout the 2016 presidential election season, much to the dismay of her fellow transgender advocates on her short-lived E!”


“… Celebrity entertainment news and lifestyle videos subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly... "
"That would disrupt core military missions around the world and unnecessarily endanger our military." Jenner concluded in her blog post that the 15000 cross service and 134000 veterans in the United States are much braver than you, Mr. trump. I'm loyal to them, not to our country, not to you recently... "
"Does president trump intend to pull 15000 people out of every key position currently assigned to them?"
"Moreover, this half baked idea puts all our service personnel at risk."
"I believe every American should be angry at the disrespect for those who wear our uniform," she wrote
"What happened to your promise to fight for them? The author of "the secret of my life" later published a complete statement on her website
“…… Announcing on twitter that transgender people will no longer serve in the U.S. military in any capacity, there are 15000 patriotic transgender Americans in the U.S. military fighting for all of us, Jenner tweeted on July 26
"She later told CNN that she didn't regret voting for trump, saying that I didn't support everything he did, but we need to change the system. Bruce, the former Olympic gold medalist, changed his direction in July, and the former real estate tycoon..."
“…… I'm Kate
"Jenna publicly supported trump, 71, throughout the 2016 presidential election season, which made her transgender supporters' companions give her a brief e!"



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Signs: Jenny hinted at her marriage from Thailand in a Wednesday Instagram post in which she referred to Robert as her 'Husbert'”
“On Friday she posted a photo of several bugs on a stick, prepared to be eaten, and she wrote: 'double dared @robertearlbuckley & now we can’t kiss for a week'.”
“Posting to Instagram from the Thai island Koh Samui, the couple surprised their fans by announcing this Saturday that they had recently gotten married.”
“Robert, 37, uploaded a snapshot of himself and his wife with frosting-smeared faces, captioning: 'Post-cake fight with (Borat voice) MY WIIIIIFE.'”
“Scroll down for video Cake smeared iZombie star Robert Buckley and Feast actress Jenny Wade are now man and wife as they announced on Instagram from Thailand this Saturday Jenny also 37 included the same photo in a three entry Instagram album she posted from their cake fueled Southeast Asian...”
“...holiday...”
“The album also featured a video in which she held up a piece of cake with: 'BUCKLEY' frosted on it, then shoved the food into her new husband's mouth.”
“'Wow,' said Robert, chewing as he lounged on a sofa.”
“'Wow!'”
“His wife could be heard giggling from behind the camera as she filmed him.”


"Signs: in an instagram post on Wednesday, Jennie hinted at her marriage to a Thai, calling Robert her" husband. "
"Last Friday, she posted a picture of some insects on a stick ready to be eaten. She wrote: 'double dared@robertearlbuckley& Now we can't kiss for a week. "
The couple, posted on instagram from Thailand's sumay Island, surprised their fans by announcing on Saturday that they were recently married
Robert, 37, posted a picture of him and his wife, whose face was frosted and said, "my wiilife after the cake war."
"Scroll down video cake smearing izombie star Robert Barkley and feast actress Jennie Wade are now a couple as they announced on instagram from Thailand this Saturday. Jennie 37 also includes the same photos that she released on instagram's album three from their cake..."
“… Vacation... "
"There's also a video in the album where she holds up a piece of cake with Buckley icing on it and then puts food into her new husband's mouth."
"Wow," Robert said, chewing and lolling on the sofa
"Wow!"
"When his wife filmed him, she could be heard giggling behind the camera."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Justin Bieber says sorry for cancelling his Purpose world tour and hints it was due to exhaustionMORE : Justin Bieber banned from performing in China due to previous ‘bad behaviours’”
“It’s been hectic and that ‘rock star’ life doesn’t mix anymore with the life he wants to live.’Having constantly performed at over 150 shows since March 2016, we’d say it’s probably time to give Biebs a break.”
“(Picture: GAMR / BACKGRID)The #blessed paparazzi who was run over by Justin Bieber this week has shared a video update on his recovery, and he’s surprisingly chill about the whole thing.”
“Living basically every fan girl’s dream, Maurice Lamont was ploughed down by the singer’s giant truck on Wednesday, with Biebs behind the wheel driving very slowly at the time.”
“Estranged husband ‘killed hospital worker and her daughter’ before dying in car crashThe photographer took to Instagram on Thursday to share his progress with the world, and while he’s been resting up since getting knocked to the ground, he’s calmly insisted that ‘accidents happen’.”
“Justin was quick to hop out and check in with the photographer after knocking him down.”
“(Picture: GAMR/Backgrid)Lamont was standing in the wrong place at the wrong time (y’know, like in front of a moving car), when Justin attempted to leave his Hillsong religious meeting in LA.”
“A day later and the unlucky paparazzi filmed himself being wheeled around on a hospital bed, explaining: ‘Hours before my birthday hits, I get ran over by Justin Bieber.”
“Isn’t that something?’AdvertisementAdvertisementResponding calmly with zero mention of lawsuits, Lamont said: ‘He’s a good kid though.”
“I think the truck is a little big for him.”


"More: Justin Bieber apologizes for cancelling his world tour, suggesting that it's due to exhaustion more: Justin Bieber is banned from performing in China due to his previous' bad behavior '"
"I'm very busy now. The life of rock star is no longer mixed with the life he wants. He has been performing in more than 150 shows since March 2016, and we think it might be time to give Bibbs a break. "
"(photo source: gamr / backgrid) the lucky paparazzi who were knocked down by Justin Bieber this week shared the latest video of his recovery, and he was surprisingly indifferent to the whole thing."
"Basically realized every fan girl's dream, Maurice Lamont was knocked down by the singer's truck on Wednesday, and Bibbs was driving very slowly at that time."
"The estranged husband" killed the hospital staff and her daughter "before he died in a car accident. The photographer shared his progress with the world on instagram last Thursday. While he was resting after being knocked down, he calmly insisted that "accidents always happen."
"After Justin knocked down the photographer, he quickly jumped out and checked in with him."
(picture: gamr / backgrid) Lamont is standing in the wrong place at the wrong time (you know, like in front of a moving car), and Justin is trying to leave his hillsson Congregation in Los Angeles. "
"One day later, the unfortunate paparazzi photographed themselves being pushed to the hospital bed and explained," I was knocked down by Justin Bieber a few hours before my birthday. "
"Isn't that something? Lamont responded calmly, without mentioning the lawsuit, saying, "but he's a good boy."
"I think the truck is a little big for him."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You’ve got to start taking your share of the blame,” Dr. Ish chimes in, and adds, “otherwise you have no hope of repairing this relationship with Kendra.””
““Patti, stop being a martyr,” Dr. V tells her.”
“Upon examining the defensive responses from the mother daughter duo Dr V believes Patti s outlook needs to change and calls her out on it...”
“I got home I had to cook dinner I had to get you ready for bed do your homework FROM PEN Andy Cohen s Top 5 Most Revealing Plead the Fifth Answers Reflecting on her childhood Kendra tells her mother I believe I am blamed today for all of that...”
““I was working full-time.”
““That’s a little dramatic,” Patti tells the reality star.”
““I feel like I’m blamed for being alive,” Kendra responds.”
““How could I be a narcissist when my world revolved around you and Collin?” she asks her daughter.”
““I come from a narcissistic family.”Asked to further explain how her mother is narcissistic, Kendra says that Patti “lacks empathy with me.”But Patti believes Kendra’s claim is furthest from the truth.”
““I believe I am a narcissist,” Kendra says after grabbing a brick from the stack with the word “narcissist” on it.”


"You have to start taking on your responsibilities," Dr. ish interjected, "or you have no hope of mending your relationship with Kendra."
"Patty, stop being a martyr," Dr. V told her
"After studying the defense response of mother and daughter, Dr. V thinks Patty's view needs to be changed, and calls on her to change..."
"When I get home, I'm going to cook, I'm going to get you ready to go to bed, do your homework, and reflect on her childhood from pen Andy Cohen's top five most enlightening supplications the fifth answer Kendra told her mother, I believe I'm being blamed for all this today..."
"I was working full time."
"It's a bit dramatic," Patty told the reality star
"I feel accused of living," Kendra replied
How can I be a narcissist when my world revolves around you and Colin? "She asked her daughter."
"I come from a narcissistic family." Asked to further explain how her mother was narcissistic, Kendra said Patty "lacked compassion for me." But Patty believes Kendra's statement is far from the truth
"I believe I'm a narcissist," Kendra said, grabbing a brick from a pile of bricks that said "narcissist."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It became too much for me.”Image zoom Credit: Paul Hebert/ABC via GettyThough the relationship was real both on and off camera, Stanton said that after the show, “all he wanted to do is party and not call me.””
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The situation began on Thursday morning after Hayes reportedly responded to a since-deleted tweet from Stanton, 27, about how one of her exes, whom she chose not to name, had emailed her about a payment issue with her Disneyland Annual Pass, according to E!”
“News.”
“I got a new debit card last month and got an email from an ex this morning forwarding me an email that his Disneyland Annual Pass payment was declined to update my card info I sure know how to pick em she wrote in the since deleted message according to...”
“...the outlet...”
“Claiming he wanted to clarify the situation, Hayes replied with screenshots of their private e-mail correspondence.”
““Lol is this how it happened or was I was trying to help you poor thing?”
“Let’s evaluate below everyone  (Read the whole thing),” he wrote alongside images of their exchange.”


"It's too much for me." Photo zooming credit: the Paul Herbert / ABC via Getty though relationship is real inside and outside the camera, and Stanton said after the show, "what he wants to do is have a party, not call me."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to e! "
"News."
"I bought a new debit card last month. This morning, I received an email from my ex girlfriend. He forwarded an email to me, saying that his annual ticket payment for Disneyland was refused and updating my card information. I certainly know how to select them. She wrote in the deleted email, according to..."
“… Exit... "
Hayes claimed he wanted to clarify the situation and replied to a screenshot of their private email correspondence
"Ha ha, how did this happen, or do I want to help you, poor guy?"
"Let's evaluate it under everyone," he wrote next to the pictures they exchanged



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hugh Jackman was obviously taken aback by the whole ordeal (as many of us likely would be), but it generally sounds like his suit was not ruined by the lube.”
“...actually getting onto his suit...”
“However as she laid out in her remarks the lube became a bit of a problem when they were on camera and she had to lean over and tell him that there was a risk of some of the lube...”
“The NBC star was presenting an award to Hugh Jackman for his work on Logan.”
“According to the story, Chrissy Metz needed to lube up her latex dress when she attended the MTV Movie Awards last year.”


"Hugh Jackman was obviously taken aback by the ordeal (many of us may be), but it sounds like his suit wasn't ruined by the oil."
“… In fact, put on his clothes... "
"However, when she said in her speech that lubricant became a problem when they were on camera, she had to lean over and tell him that there was some risk of lubricant..."
"The NBC star presented Hugh Jackman with an award for his work in Logan."
"It's reported that Chris Metz needed to oil her latex skirt when she attended the MTV Film Awards last year."



**Something goes wrong**
““Each time that I’ve come close [to giving up], God has restored my faith.””
“Some days I’ve found that to be almost right,” Johnson wrote.”
“...reform...”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star, 37, met with the 71-year-old commander in chief on Wednesday to discuss a possible pardon for Alice Johnson, a 62-year-old great-grandmother serving a life sentence for a first-time, nonviolent drug offense.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The news made the cover of the New York Post, which referred to the meeting as “Trump meets Rump” and “The other big a– summit,” a reference to Trump’s postponed meeting with North Korean leader Kim Jong Un.”
“The cover also referred to Kardashian West as “Kim Thong Un.”“Disgusting headline, @nypost,” wrote Charmed alum Alyssa Milano.”
““@KimKardashian was meeting with President Trump about a critical issue and you lead with her ass?”
“This is unacceptable sexism.”
“No woman deserves this,” she added.”


"Every time I was about to give up, God restored my faith."
"Sometimes I find it almost right," Johnson wrote
“… Reform... "
"Keeping up with the kardashians star, 37, met with the 71 year old commander-in-chief on Wednesday to discuss the possibility of pardoning Alice Johnson, a 62 year old great grandmother sentenced to life in prison for her first non violent drug crime."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The news appeared on the cover of the New York Post, which called the meeting" trump meeting "and" another major summit ", referring to trump's postponement of a meeting with North Korean leader Kim Jong Un."
The cover also referred to Kardashian West as "kinton.". "Disgusting title, @ nypost," wrote Eliza Milan of glamour alum
"@ Kim kardashan meets president trump on a key issue, and you lead the way with her ass?"
"This is unacceptable sex discrimination."
"No woman is worth it," she added



**Something goes wrong**
“#ShebySheree#joggersXo,ShereéGo behind the scenes at the #RHOA reunion:”
“I don’t hold grudges, so moving forward is always an option, but I need to know what I’m moving forward from!”
“BravoTV.com: What's the latest on your She by Shereé line?”
“Shereé Whitfield: She by Shereé is expanding into a lifestyle line, and I'm so excited!”
“It will consist of contemporary, everyday, fashionable, fun, and comfortable athletic clothing for today's active and sporty woman.”
“Pieces that can take you from the gym to the streets to lunch with the girls.”
“#joggersBravoTV.com: What went through your mind when Kenya said she was pregnant?”
“Um, nothing.”
“I’ve learned to not believe everything I hear.”
“If it is true, I’m happy for her.”


"Sherry goes behind the scenes at the ROA party
"I don't hold a grudge, so it's always a choice to move forward, but I need to know what direction I'm going to move forward!"
"Bravo: what's the latest news about your she by Shere é line?"
"Shirley Whitfield: Shirley Whitfield's work is expanding into a lifestyle series. I'm so excited!"
"It will include modern, everyday, fashionable, fun, comfortable sportswear for today's active and athletic women."
"Something that can take you from the gym to the street for lunch with girls."
“# joggersBravoTV.com What was on your mind when Kenya said she was pregnant? "
"Well, nothing."
"I learned not to believe what I heard."
"If it's true, I'm happy for her."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The opportunity to share this film, that we poured our hearts and soul into, with you.”Read Coogler’s emotional letter below.”
““Thank you for giving our team of filmmakers the greatest gift,” he concluded.”
““Black Panther” stars Chadwick Boseman, Michael B. Jordan, Lupita Nyong’o, Danai Gurira, Andy Serkis, Forest Whitaker, Angela Bassett, Letitia Wright, Martin Freeman and Daniel Kaluuya.”
“The film holds a score of 96 percent fresh on Rotten Tomatoes and has since received an A+ CinemaScore.”
“Also Read: 'Black Panther' Tops 'Star Wars: The Last Jedi' With $242 Million 4-Day OpeningAdditionally, “Black Panther” is all people have been talking about for weeks.”
“2” the week after.”
“At that pace, “Black Panther” could pass the domestic run for “Thor: Ragnarok” as early as this coming Sunday and pass the domestic run for “Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“A $100 million second weekend is a possible feat for this film, as this weekend’s releases, “Game Night” and “Annihilation,” aren’t expected to open to more than $25 million.”
“Down the road, “Black Panther” could soon leave several major releases in the dust.”
“Box Office The Only Question Is When With its record obliterating 242 million President s Day opening weekend and 426 million global launch Black Panther is all but guaranteed to surpass 1 billion at the worldwide box office...”


"I have the opportunity to share with you this film that we have devoted all our efforts to." Please read kugeller's moving letter below
"Thank you for the best gift to our film team," he concluded
"The Panther" stars Chadwick Bosman, Michael B. Jordan, Lupita Nyon, Danai gurilla, Andy selkis, Forest Whitaker, Angela Bassett, Letitia Wright, Martin Freeman and Daniel carua
"The film got 96% freshness on rotten tomatoes and a + rating since then."
"You can also read: 'Panther' top 'Star Wars: the last Jedi' opened for $242 million in four days. In addition," Panther "was all talked about for a few weeks."
One week after "2"
At this rate, Panther could pass the domestic trials for Thor: Ragnarok and guardian of the galaxy as early as Sunday
"A second weekend of $100 million is a possible feat for the film, as the opening price of game night and annihilation, which will be released this weekend, is not expected to exceed $25 million."
"Next, the Panther may soon leave several major releases in the dust."
"The only question at the box office is, with its record $242 million presidential day premiere weekend and $426 million global circulation, when will the Black Panther ensure a global box office breakthrough of $1 billion..."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Shutterstock/Splash 5 of 51 Diana at the Remembrance Sunday Service in 1991; Kate in a Diane von Furstenberg coat at the same service in 2016.”
“2012”
“Getty Images 11 of 51 Princess Diana in a navy long sleeve gown with a lace back to the 1985 premiere of Santa Claus The Movie Kate Middleton wearing a teal Jenny Packham dress with lace and button back detailing to a gala dinner at the Royal Albert Hall in...”
“Getty Images 10 of 51 Lady Di in a gray coatwith black detailing during a visit to Barnardo's Charity in 1984; Kate Middleton in a similar blazer while arriving to Coach Core Essex in 2018.”
“Getty Images 9 of 51 Princess Diana attending a dinner at the British Embassy in 1985 wearing the "Lover's Knot tiara"; Kate Middleton wearing the same tiara for a state dinner in 2018.”
“Getty Images 8 of 51 Princess Diana leaving St. Mary's Hospital with newborn Prince Harry in 1984 wearing a red collared dress and coat; Duchess Kate leaving the same hospital in 2018 with newborn son Prince Louis wearing a red dress with a white lace collar.”
“Getty Images 7 of 51 Princess Diana photographed in a polka dot dress with a white collar in 1985; Kate Middleton posing for Prince Charles' 70th birthday portraits in a Prada polka dot dress in November 2018.”
“Getty Images 6 of 51 Diana in a polka dot dress and matching wide brim hat at the The Royal Ascot in 1988; Kate in a similar polka dress at the Wimbledon Tennis Championships in 2018.”
“Getty Images 4 of 51 Diana during a visit to Bedfordshire in 1983; Kate at RAF Akrotiri in 2018.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Shutterstock / splash 5 of 51 Diana at the memorial Sunday ceremony in 1991; Kate wore Diane von Furstenberg's jacket at the same ceremony in 2016."
“2012”
"Getty Images 11 51 Princess Diana returns to the 1985 Premiere of Santa Claus in a navy blue long sleeve dress with lace. Kate Middleton returns to At the celebration banquet at the Royal Albert Hall
"Getty Images 10 shows Ms. Di, 51, wearing a gray coat and black details when she visited barnado's charity in 1984, and Kate Middleton wearing a similar coat when she arrived at Essex's core coach in 2018."
"Getty Images 9 in 1985, 51 Princess Diana wore" Valentine's Day headdress "to the British Embassy dinner; in 2018, Kate Middleton wore the same headdress to the state dinner."
"Getty Images 8:51 Princess Diana left St. Mary's Hospital in 1984 with her newborn Prince Harry in a red collar dress and coat; Duchess Kate left the same hospital in 2018 with her newborn son Prince Louis in a red dress with a white lace collar."
"In 1985, 51 Princess Diana posed with white-collar workers in Polka Dot skirts; in November 2018, Kate Middleton posed for Prince Charles' 70th birthday in a Prada polka dot skirt."
"Getty Images 6:51 Diana wore a polka dot skirt and matching wide brimmed hat at the 1988 Royal Ascot Championships; Kate wore a similar polka dot skirt at the 2018 Wimbledon Championships."
"Getty Images 4:51 Diana visited Bedfordshire in 1983; Kate was in RAF Akrotiri in 2018."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: ‘Bad Moms’ Is Getting An Unscripted Series and, Yeah, It’s Going to Be Good...”
“The Chilling Adventures of Sabrina will hit Netflix sometime in 2019.”
“It’s a totally different show.”Nevertheless, Hart is looking forward to seeing Kiernan Shipka portray the beloved Sabrina Spellman…and so are we.”
“She added, “It’s an Archie comic, so the rights reverted from my company, Hartbreak Films, back to them.”
“...reboot...”
“I think it s going to be more like Buffy the Vampire Slayer than the Sabrina that most people know The 41 year old went on to reveal that she won t be involved in the remake like at all considering her entertainment company was completely removed from the Netflix...”
“She said, “I think what they’re doing is smart, doing the darker version.”
“News, Hart explained that fans of the original show may be surprised (in a good way) when they watch The Chilling Adventures of Sabrina.”
“During a recent interview with E!”
“And now the OG Sabrina Spellman, Melissa Joan Hart, is sharing her take on the “totally different” revival.”


"Related report: 'bad mom' is getting a screenless series, yes, it will be good..."
"Sabrina's creepy adventure will attack Netflix sometime in 2019."
"It's a completely different show." Nevertheless, Hart is looking forward to seeing Kirnan shipka play the beloved Sabrina Spelman So do we. "
She added: "it's an Archie cartoon, so the copyright is restored from my company, hartblake pictures, to them."
“… Restart
"I think it's going to be more like Buffy, the vampire killer, than Sabrina, because most people know that the 41 year old continues to reveal that considering that her entertainment company has been completely removed from Netflix, she won't be involved in remaking at all..."
"I think what they do is smart, they do a dark version," she said
Hart explained that fans of the original may be surprised to see Sabrina's gruesome adventure story
"In a recent interview!"
Now, ogsabrina Spelman and Melissa johnhart are sharing her views on a "totally different" Renaissance



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also sang Chained to the Rhythm and Swish, Swish from her forthcoming album called Witness.”
“AdvertisementDuring her whole set, Katy Perry also performed hits such as I Kissed a Girl, Roar, and her brand new track called Bon Appetit.”
““Rest in peace, Manchester,” she concluded.”
“She also explained the fact that social media is not able to do such things and she said that this is the part of every one of us that will never be taken away.”
“...side she asks them to do so for creating just a little connection...”
“This next one goes out to Manchester and to all the people that know what it means to love music and be a community because of it She addressed to the public saying that if they have not yet kindly touched the person from their right side or their left...”
“We will still dance, we will still sing, we will still make music.”
““And you know what?”
““I think that you guys are extremely beautiful and I think that we’re all extremely brave and we’re all in this together, aren’t we?” she said.”
“A suicide bomber killed 22 people, including children at the city’s stadium right after an Ariana Grande concert.”


"She also sang the rhythm of the chain and the whoosh, whoosh from her upcoming album called witness."
Katie Perry also performed some popular songs throughout the show, such as "I kissed a girl," "roar," and her new repertoire "good appetite."
"Rest in peace, Manchester," she concluded
"She also explained the fact that social media can't do these things, saying it's a part that each of us will never be taken away."
“… She asked them to do it just to make a little connection... "
"The next time is to go to Manchester and all the people who know what love music is because it becomes a community, she told the public if they haven't reached the person friendly from their right or left..."
"We can dance, we can sing, we can compose."
"Do you know?"
"I think you're very beautiful, I think we're all very brave, we're all together, aren't we? "She said
After Ariana grand's concert, a suicide bomber killed 22 people, including children, in the city's stadium



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Smart Disciplined and Interesting Child Starting From Birth...”
“I want to bring up my children in a happy stable secure world Being a Modern Old Fashioned Mom One of Kate s go to parenting guides is apparently The Modern Mother s Handbook How To Raise A Happy Healthy...”
“Sounds like Kate is taking charge of her little ones’ futures early on!”
“In today’s fast-changing world, many of us worry about how to prepare our kids for success.”
“A more orthodox choice would have been William’s first school, Wetherby Prep — a much more “posh” school.”
“Kate and William have reportedly enrolled little George in a normal middle-class school in suburban London.”
“And the dauntless mum is proving that she isn’t shy about defying centuries of royal tradition, all for the sake of her kids.”
“Airways while her father Michael was a flight dispatcher...”
“Never in royal history have the children in direct line to the throne been raised in such a modern way Kate is clearly drawing lessons from her own middle class upbringing her mum Carol was an air hostess with British...”
“But Kate insists the kids should be allowed to be normal children.”


"Smart, disciplined, fun kids start at birth..."
"I want to raise my children in a happy, stable and safe world and be a modern old-fashioned mother. One of Kate's parenting guides is obviously a modern mother's manual on how to cultivate a happy and healthy child..."
"It sounds like Kate has been in charge of the children's future for a long time!"
"In today's rapidly changing world, many of us worry about how to prepare our children for success."
A more orthodox choice is William's first school, Wetherby prep, a more "fashionable" one
"It is reported that Kate and William have sent George Jr. to an ordinary middle-class school in the suburbs of London."
"This brave mother is proving that for the sake of her children, she defies centuries of royal tradition."
"When her father Michael was a flight dispatcher..."
"In the history of the royal family, the children of the immediate family members of the throne have never been raised in such a modern way. Kate is obviously learning from her middle-class education. Her mother Carol used to be a stewardess of British Airways..."
"But Kate insists that children should be made normal."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: People Are Newly Convinced Meghan Markle Is Using a British Accent...”
“After Jack bestowed Princess Eugenie with a stunning pink diamond sapphire engagement ring (so extra) it was announced that their marriage will take place at St. George’s Chapel in Windsor (the same place Harry and Meghan tied the knot).”
“Yes, another Royal Wedding is happening—soon!”
“On Friday, October 12th, Princess Eugenie, 28, and her fiancé, Jack Brooksbank, 31, will become the next new royal newlyweds.”
“On the polished heels of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding, another regal celebration is a welcomed jubilee.”
“Here’s what we know about Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank’s planned nuptials.”
“Princess Eugenie, the youngest daughter of Prince Andrew and Sarah, Duchess of York is ninth in line for the coveted throne—just behind her elder sister, Princess Beatrice.”
“As reported by BBC News, Eugenie is a real working royal as a director at a gallery in Hauser and Wirth in London.”
“Jack is a brand manager for Casamigos Tequila (co-founded by George Clooney who might be making his second royal wedding appearance of the year).”
“Royal watchers will recall that the couple officially announced their engagement via the Royal Family’s Twitter account this past January.”


"Related report: it's recently believed that Megan markel uses a British accent..."
"After Jack gave Princess Eugenie a beautiful pink diamond sapphire engagement ring (so extra), it was announced that their wedding would take place at St. George's Church in Windsor (Harry and Megan married in the same place)."
"Yes, another royal wedding is coming!"
Princess Eugenie, 28, and fiance Jack Brooksbank, 31, will be the next royal couple on Friday, October 12
Following the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan marcel, another big celebration is a popular anniversary
"Here's what we know about Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank's planned wedding."
"Princess Eugenie is the youngest daughter of Prince Andrew and Sarah. The Duchess of York ranks ninth in the coveted throne after her sister Princess Beatrice."
According to the BBC, Eugenie is a real Royal, directing at a gallery in Hauser and worth in London
"Jack, the brand manager of casamigos tequila (co founded by George Clooney), is likely to attend the royal wedding for the second time this year."
"Royal observers will remember that the couple officially announced their engagement in January through their royal twitter account."



**Something goes wrong**
“Nothing rivals being a mother except being a grandmother, it's one of the great joys of life."”
“I am very well practiced!”
“The A-list couple took a night off from parenting their newborn twins Ella and Alexander to enjoy a night out with friends in Italy on Tuesday, July 11.”
“The couple, who welcomed their son and daughter in June, looked tan and happy as they stepped out for dinner at il Gatto Nero, one of their favorite restaurants in Northern Italy.”
“The Oscar winner and lawyer were joined by pal Ben Weiss for the outing.”
“"Everyone was so excited to see him and Amal for dinner," one onlooker told People magazine.”
“"They got many hugs and a lot of love.”
“Amal looked gorgeous and didn't look the slightest bit tired.”
“She kept smiling and looked so happy."”
“CLICK FOR FULL GALLERYVER GALERÍA George and Amal recently welcomed their twins Alexander and Ella Photo: © 2017 Mega/The Grosby Group MilanoThe human rights attorney looked characteristically chic for the outing wearing a one-shoulder floral frock.”


"There's nothing like being a mother but being a grandmother. It's one of the greatest pleasures of life."
"I practice very well!"
"On Tuesday, July 11, in Italy, the first-rate couple took a night off from raising their newborn twins, Ella and Alexander, and spent the night with their friends."
The couple, who welcomed their son and daughter in June, were dark and happy at dinner in IL gatto Nero, one of Italy's favorite restaurants in northern Italy
"This Oscar winner and lawyer is on a trip with pal Ben Weiss."
"Everyone is excited to see him and Amar having dinner together," a bystander told people magazine
"They got a lot of hugs and a lot of love."
"Amar looks beautiful and not tired at all."
"She's smiling all the time and she looks happy."
"Click to see the complete galleryver, Galer Í a, George and Amal recently ushered in their twins Alexander and Ella. Photo:? 2017 Mega / the grosby group Milano human rights lawyer looks very chic when traveling in a one shoulder floral dress."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Dwayne ‘The Rock’ Johnson’s Daughter Simone Honored as First ‘Golden Globe Ambassador’Unsurprisingly, the Jumanji star couldn’t be more thrilled at his impending fatherhood.”
“Jasmine will turn 2 later this week.”
“He is already dad to 16-year-old Simone, his daughter with ex-wife Dany Garcia.”
“The baby girl will be Johnson’s third daughter.”
““And once again, big daddy is completely surrounded by beautiful estrogen and loving, powerful female mana.”
““[Girlfriend Lauren Hashian] and I are boundlessly grateful for this blessing as this spring we’ll welcome our second baby.”“Plus, Jazzy is excited to boss around and protect her lil’ sis,” he continues.”
““Our Jasmine Lia would like to make a big announcement – IT’S A GIRL,” Johnson wrote.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 45-year-old star announced the happy news on Instagram by posting a photo of his daughter, Jasmine.”
“Jumanji star Dwayne Johnson announced that his girlfriend, Lauren Hashian, is pregnant with another baby girlBaby Girl on the Way for Dwayne 'The Rock' Johnson and Girlfriend Lauren HashianDwayne Johnson is going to be a dad again — and it’s another girl!”


"Related reports: Simone, the daughter of Dwayne Johnson, has been awarded the title of ambassador of the first Golden Globe Award. It's no surprise that the superstar is very excited about him becoming a father."
"Molly will turn two later this week."
"He's the father of 16-year-old Simone, and his daughter is with his ex-wife, Dany Garcia."
"The baby girl will be Johnson's third daughter."
"Once again, big dad is completely surrounded by beautiful estrogen and powerful female mana full of love."
"(girlfriend Lauren hashian) I and I are very grateful for this blessing, because we will have our second child this spring." "Besides, Jackie is happy to be able to guide around and protect her little sister," he continued
"Our mollia wants to make a big announcement - this is a girl," Johnson wrote
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 45 year old star announced the good news by posting a picture of her daughter Molly on instagram."
"Jumanji star Dwayne Johnson announced that his girlfriend Lauren hashian was pregnant with another little girl on the way to prepare for Dwayne 'the rock' Johnson. Lauren hashian Dwayne Johnson is going to be a father again - this is another girl!"



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She knows how it works and I think she's going to deal with it pretty well."”
“#jsfamilyvacation @suppppmorganwhy is everyone on #JerseyShore is mad at @SammiSweetheart for not coming back?”
“Though she didn't tweet much about the show herself, her the tweets she liked were very, very telling.”
“While the show was airing on the East Coast, Giancola tweeted out a message of support to just one of her former costars: Deena Nicole Cortese.”
“"I love my @DeenaNicoleMTV ♥️," she wrote.”
“She then went on a liking spree, sending love to a ton of tweets with shady references to both the show and its cast.”
“Below are just a sampling of the messages she thought were worth some attention Good 4 you they went back to the show cause in the last few years none of them did anything worthwhile best thing u ever did...”
“...was to move on heard the show was stupid and their all moving in slow motion now lol good luck pic twitter com LwgL8gjNgS SWAGDAD80 SammiSweetheart girllll why were they so shady tonight...”
“Damn they miss you.”
“Lol!”


"She knows what's going on and I think she'll handle it well."
“# jsfamilyvacation@supppmorgan Why is everyone in Jersey Shore angry that @ Sammi sweetheart doesn't come back? "
"Although she didn't disclose much information about the program on her micro blog, her favorite micro blog is very, very persuasive."
"When the show was broadcast on the east coast, giankola tweeted a supportive message to only one of her former partners, Deena Nicole Cortese."
"I like my @ Deena Nicole MTV ♥️ "She wrote
"Then, she started a love carnival. She tweeted a lot of love posts, including allusions to the play and the actors."
"Here's a sample of what she thinks is worth noticing. Well, they're back on the show because they haven't done anything that's worth doing the best for you in the past few years..."
“… It's to continue. I heard that this program is stupid. They're all in slow motion now. Ha ha, good luck. Picture twitter website lwgl8gjngs swagdad80 Sammi sweetheart girl. Why are they so dark tonight... "
"Damn it, they miss you."
"Ha ha!"



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear the actor recount the scary event on Ellen in the video below.”
“RELATED: George Clooney 'Debuts' His Twins With the Help of Manny Matt DamonDamon faced another family emergency in April, when his daughter was stung by a jellyfish while he and his family were vacationing with Chris Hemsworth in Australia.”
“See you soon."”
“Thank you for this wonderful honor and I hope you have a lovely evening.”
“I'm really sorry not to be with you tonight.”
“Unfortunately, I had to go back to Boston for a family emergency.”
“"I found out about this award six months ago and I was just so incredibly honored to receive it and I was really looking forward to tonight.”
“"Hello and thank you to everyone at BAFTA," he said in a message after being celebrated by Julianne Moore, Paul Greengrass, George Clooney and more.”
“RELATED: Matt Damon and Wife Luciana Barroso Look So in Love at Venice Film Festival -- See the Pics!”
“So our thoughts are with you, Matt, and much love from your friends here in LA," she said, before a pre-recorded message from Damon appeared on screen.”


"Listen to the actors in the following video about the terrible things that happened to Allen."
"Related report: George Clooney made his" debut "with the help of Manny Matt Damon. His twins faced another family emergency in April when he and his family were on holiday in Australia with Chris Hemsworth when his daughter was stung by a jellyfish."
"See you later."
"Thank you for your hospitality and have a nice evening."
"I'm really sorry I can't be with you tonight."
"Unfortunately, I had to go back to Boston to deal with a family emergency."
"I found this award six months ago, and I'm very honored to receive it. I'm really looking forward to tonight."
"Hello everyone, thank you to all of BAFTA," he said in a letter after celebrations such as Julian Moore, Paul Greengrass and George Clooney
Related report: Matt Damon and his wife Luciana Barroso look so in love at the Venice Film Festival - look at the pictures
"So our thoughts are with you, Matt, and the love of your friends in Los Angeles," she said before Damon's prerecorded message appeared on the screen



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Happy Birthday Rob from Dreamy and Chy," Chyna wrote in her Instagram post on Friday, along with a photo of her, Rob, and Dream.”
“In September, she dropped her case and she and Rob reached a custody agreement over their daughter.”
“Chyna accused him of domestic violence and obtained a restraining order against him.”
“He accused her of fraud.”
“In July, Rob released nude photos of Chyna and a video of her kissing another man he said had sent him.”
“After their separation followed a lot of drama.”
“Blac Chyna accepted Instagram stories late on Friday to give her ex Rob Kardashian a happy 31The two, who share the one-year-old daughter Dream Kardashian shared a one-year on-and-off relationship in early 2017.”


"Happy Birthday to rob from dreamy and CHY," Chyna wrote in her instagram post on Friday, along with photos of her, rob and dream
"In September, she dropped the case, and she and rob reached a custody agreement for her daughter."
"Chener accused him of domestic violence and obtained a restraining order against him."
"He accused her of fraud."
"In July, rob released a nude photo of Zina and a video in which she kisses another man he said he sent him."
"A lot of drama has happened since they separated."
"Blac Chyna accepted instagram stories later on Friday to give her ex boyfriend rob Kardashian a happy holiday. They shared the dream of their one-year-old daughter, and Kardashian intermittently shared her one-year relationship in early 2017."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to the celebrity makeup artist, “it’s a simple way to get an impactful look.””
“He uses the same product on the cheeks and lips to achieve the most natural look possible.”
“More natural looks have been appearing on the Red Carpet and are more achievable than ever with Beau Nelson’s makeup hacks.”
“He most recently did makeup for the runway models who walked the Juicy Couture fall/winter 2018 show during Fashion Week, so he clearly knows how to quickly glam up the models.”
“He works with stars like Ashley Graham and Nicole Richie as well as other runway models.”
“We can definitely trust Beau Nelson when coming up with this time-saving beauty hack because he has seen it all.”
“This hack saves time and money and creates a natural yet beautiful look, like the makeup he did for Amber Valletta, which he posted on Instagram.”
“For example, use a creme blush so you have something for blush and something for lips.”
“News that he uses products that multitask.”
“Beau Nelson tells E!”


"According to the celebrity makeup artist, it's a simple way to get an influential look."
"He uses the same product on his cheeks and lips to achieve the most natural effect possible."
"There's a more natural look on the red carpet, more fulfilling than Bo Nelson's look."
"He recently put on make-up for the runway models who took part in the juicy women's show in autumn and winter 2018 during fashion week, so he obviously knows how to quickly add luster to the models."
"He works with stars like Ashley Graham, Nicole Ritchie and other runway models."
"We can trust beau Nelson because he's very knowledgeable."
"This hack saves time and money and creates a natural and beautiful look, just like the makeup he made for Amber Valletta, who posted this photo on instagram."
"For example, use cream and blush, so you have something that is blush and lips."
"The message that he uses multitasking products."
"Beau Nelson told e!"



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The dancing competition returns with an all-new season on Sept. 18 on ABC.”
“I danced as a little kid but this is nothing like what I’m going to expect, I’m sure.”Burke is a two-time “DWTS” champion who has worked with former NFL players before — one of her wins was with NFL legend Emmitt Smith.”
““I’m hoping to put up some big numbers with this lovely lady right here,” he said, referring to Burke, who announced her return to “DWTS” Monday.”
“Owens added that he talked to his friend Chad Johnson, formerly known as Chad Ochocinco, about how difficult the process would be.”
“Johnson competed with Burke on the show’s 10th season.”
““He said it’s going to be a lot of work but I expect nothing different,” Owens said.”
““This is going to be a challenge for me, definitely.”
“[It’s] definitely not in my wheelhouse.”
““If I can handle Bill Parcells then I can handle Cheryl,” Owens said, referring to his former Dallas Cowboys coach.”
“The full celebrity cast of “Dancing With the Stars” will be announced on “Good Morning America” on Wednesday.”


"The dance competition will launch a new season on ABC on September 18."
"I've been dancing since I was a kid, but I'm sure it's totally different from what I expected." Burke, a two time DWTS champion, has worked with former NFL players before - one of her victories was with NFL legend Emmett Smith
"I want to be with this lovely lady," he said, referring to Burke, who announced her return to DWTS on Monday
Owens also said he talked to his friend Chad Johnson about how difficult the process was
"Johnson competes with Burke in the tenth season of the show."
"He said it would be a big job, but I hope it's no different," Owens said
"It's definitely a challenge for me."
"(it) must not be in my cab."
"If I can deal with Bill Parsons, then I can deal with Cheryl," Owens said, referring to his former Dallas Cowboys coach
The full cast of "dancing with stars" will be announced on Wednesday's "Good Morning America."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The announcement of her Vogue Taiwan cover comes three weeks after Kim and husband Kanye West announced the birth of their third child, daughter Chicago via surrogate.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Calls Paris Hilton ‘the OG’ as the Heiress Becomes Her Clone For Yeezy CampaignIn November, Kardashian West launched her fragrance empire with three different perfumes: Crystal Gardenia, Crystal Gardenia Citrus and Crystal Gardenia Oud.”
“Kim Kardashian West has landed her sixth Vogue cover!”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, 37, graced the front page of Vogue Taiwan‘s February Beauty issue in which she models six glamorous looks for the inside pages.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian showed off her latest fashion publication picture on Instagram and Twitter, writing, “New @voguetaiwan beauty cover shoot talking all about @kkwbeauty.”This marks Kim’s second Vogue cover as a blonde, following her June 2015 spread for Vogue Brasil which was inspired by Marilyn Monroe.”
“(Kardashian West debuted her icy platinum hair back in September during New York Fashion Week.)”
““I’m so honored to be on the cover of Vogue Taiwan.”
“The shoot was beyond glamorous, with my voluminous hair styled by Andrew Fitzsimons and makeup by Mario.”
“Dennis Leupold was the photographer and it was so much fun to see his vision come to life,” Kardashian West said on her website and app, where she shared behind-the-scenes photos from the shoot.”


"The cover of her Taiwan version of fashion was released three weeks after Jin Yaner and her husband Kanye West announced that they had their third child, their daughter Chicago, through surrogacy."
"Related video: Kim Kardashian calls Paris Hilton" og. ". Last November, Kardashian West launched her perfume Empire and launched three different fragrances: Crystal gardenia, crystal gardenia, citrus and crystal Gardenia Uhde.
"Kim Kardashian West is on her sixth fashion cover!"
The 37 year old reality TV star, Kardashian, made the front page of Vogue's Taiwan Beauty issue in February, creating six glamorous looks for the inside page of the magazine
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Kardashian showed her latest fashion magazine pictures on instagram and twitter, and she wrote:“ New@Vogue The cover photos of Taiwan beauties are all about @ kwbeauty. " This marks Kim's debut as a blonde on the cover of vogue Brasil in June 2015, inspired by Marilyn Monroe
"(Kardashian West made her debut at New York Fashion Week in September with her cold platinum hair.)
"I'm honored to be on the cover of fashion Taiwan."
"It's amazing. I have Andrew Fitzsimons' thick hair and Mario's make-up."
"Dennis lepold is a photographer, and it's really fun to see her vision come to life, where she shared the behind the scenes photos," Kardashian West said on her website and app



**Something goes wrong**
“...released in US cinemas on 30 June and UK and Australian cinemas in July...”
“Hopefully it will change over time but everybody keeps saying oh it s so different now oh it s so different now and it isn t The Beguiled stars Kidman as the headmistress of a women s seminary during the American Civil War who takes in a wounded enemy solider...”
“The actor, who is currently promoting four separate projects at the Cannes film festival, said that it was important for women to support female directors at a time when there are so few working in film and television.”
““I think it’s necessary to say that every 18 months I’ll make a movie with a female director, she told the New Zealand Herald on Tuesday.”
“Because that s the only way statistics will change when other women start to go Oh I m actually going to choose only a woman now So every 18 months there has to be a female director in the equation Kidman later expanded on her comments in a press conference...”
“...for new film the Beguiled which premiered at Cannes on Wednesday...”
““Only 4.2 percent of women directed the main motion pictures of 2016, that’s a statistic from the Women in Film group,” she said.”
““There were 4000 episodic television series last year and only 183 women directed them.”
“That says it all.”
“So I think that’s an important thing to say and keep saying.”


“…… It will be shown in American cinemas on June 30, and in British and Australian cinemas in July... "
"I hope it will change over time, but everyone is saying, oh, it's so different now. Oh, it's so different now. During the American Civil War, as the headmistress of a women's Seminary, Kidman, the star cheated, didn't take in a wounded enemy soldier..."
"The actor is currently promoting four independent projects at the Cannes Film Festival. He said that when there are too few people working in the film and television industry, it is important for women to support female directors."
"I think it's necessary to say that every 18 months I make a film with a female director," she told the New Zealand Herald on Tuesday
"Because only in this way, when other women start to leave, the statistics will change. In fact, I only choose one woman now, so every 18 months a female director has to appear in the equation. Kidman later expanded her comments at a press conference..."
“…… The new film "the cheated" premiered in Cannes on Wednesday
"Only 4.2% of women directed major films in 2016, according to the statistics of women in the film industry," she said
"There were 4000 melodrama series last year, with only 183 women directing them."
"That explains everything."
"So I think it's a very important thing to say and keep saying."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the side...”
“At one point Ellen even gets a hold of the loudspeaker and announces to the store I need a dandruff shampoo for Oprah if someone could tell me where the dandruff shampoo for Oprah is while Oprah giggles off to...”
“We certainly want one of those peaches.”
“Whoever wants a peach, Oprah's touched them!"”
“DeGeneres has Winfrey pose for a honeydew melon boob pic, pick out produce, and stand by as she shouts to the other shoppers, "Oprah's touched all the peaches, everybody!”
“From there Ellen's circus only continues and Oprah's just along for the ride.”
“DeGeneres kicks off the trip by whipping out two Louis Vuitton luggage bags with the pragmatic statement to Oprah, "You know you have to bring your own bags, because of recycling."”


“… Side
"One time, Allen even grabbed the loudspeaker and announced to the store that if someone could tell me where Oprah's dandruff shampoo was, and Oprah would go giggling..."
"Of course we want that peach."
"Oprah has touched anyone who wants a peach!"
With a Winfrey pose, a picture of the melon's chest, and a selection of farm produce, DeGeneres stood aside and yelled to the other customers, "Oprah touched all the peaches, everyone!"
"After that, Allen's circus will only continue and Oprah will let it go."
"At the beginning of his trip, DeGeneres took out two louis vuitton bags with a pragmatic statement to Oprah," you know you have to carry your own luggage because it's recycled. "



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When you come from privilege, they just see you as, ‘Oh, she got it all handed to her.'"”
“(Besides, there’s a lot more to people than just what they look like.)”
“Joel, 32, the daughter of supermodel Christie Brinkley and crooner Billy Joel, defended herself on the social media site after her mother posted a photo of her other daughter Sailor Lee Brinkley-Cook.”
“The photo is of Sailor posing on a rock for Sports Illustrated’s Swimsuit issue.”
“Brinkley captioned the photo stating: “My mermaid Sailor Brinkley Cook rocking it in Sports Illustrated Swimsuit.” She added a “proud mama” hashtag.”
“An Instagram user posted a rude comment comparing Sailor’s looks to Alexa Ray Joel’s.”
“The comment has since been deleted but Joel was able to hit back at the social media user.”
“CHRISTIE BRINKLEY, 63, STUNS IN NEW PHOTO SHOOT“Beauty is in the eye of the beholder, Mr. Big Shot.”
“You may think I’m hideous, but I like the way I look,” Joel commented.”
““And that’s really all the matters.”


"When you come from a privileged class, they think you're 'Oh, she left everything to her.'
"(besides, for people, it's not just their looks, there's more.")
"Joel, 32, the daughter of supermodel Christie Brinkley and singer Billy Joel, defended herself on social media sites because her mother posted pictures of another daughter, Lee Brinkley cook, the sailor."
"This is a picture of a sailor posing on a rock in the swimsuit edition of sports illustrated."
Brinkley wrote in the title of the photo: "my Mermaid sailor Brinkley cook shakes it in a sports illustrated swimsuit." She also added the label "proud mom."
"An instagram user made a rude comment comparing the sailor's face with that of Aleksa ray Joel."
"The comment was later removed, but Joel was able to hit back at the social media user."
Christie Brinkley, 63, was stunned in a new photo: "beauty in the eyes of the beholder, Mr. big shot."
"You may think I'm ugly, but I like the way I look," Joel commented
"That's the most important thing."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple will split a large majority of everything else, including the earnings from the sale of their former family residence.”
“Tyler will keep her companies — BTDO Media and Hot Machine — and the 2013 Tesla S, while Tietjens will keep the 2012 Lexus 450h, according to the documents.”
“...of 31 250 per month as spousal support payable in full on the fifth day of each month the documents state...”
“Commencing January 5 2017 and continuing each month thereafter until the death of either party petitioner s remarriage January 5 2021 for 48 months and 48 payments with the last payment made on December 5 2010 or further order of Court whichever occurs first Tyler shall pay Tietjens the amount...”
“In addition, Tyler will pay Tietjens $31,250 for 48 months, which totals $1.5 million over the next four years.”
““In order to equalize the foregoing division of the parties’ community property, [Tyler] shall pay [Tietjens] $500,000 in cash,” the documents state.”
“Now that the couple’s divorce has been finalized, Tyler will pay her ex-husband $2 million in spousal support.”
“In April 2016, he filed for divorce from his wife of 20 years and seven months citing irreconcilable differences.”
“Tietjens wed Tyler, 46, on May 21, 1994 and separated Jan. 10, 2015, according to previous documents obtained by PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"The couple will divide up most of their other property, including the proceeds from the sale of their former home."
"Taylor will keep her company - btdo media and heat engine - and 2013 Tesla s, while tit Jens will keep 2012 Lexus 450h, according to the document."
“…… 31250 a month as spousal support, paid in full on the 5th of each month, as stated in the document.... "
"From January 5, 2017, and every month thereafter until the death of either party, the petitioner remarried on January 5, 2021 for a period of 48 months, with the last payment on December 5, 2010 or further order of the court, whichever comes first, and Taylor shall pay the amount to titjan..."
"In addition, Taylor will pay titjens $31250 for 48 months, totaling $1.5 million over the next four years."
"In order to balance the above distribution of mutual property between the two sides, [Taylor] should pay [titjan] 500000 dollars in cash," the document said
"Now that the couple's divorce has been finalized, Taylor will pay her ex husband $2 million in alimony."
"In April 2016, he filed for divorce with his wife, who had been married for 20 years and 7 months, on the grounds of irreconcilable differences."
"According to documents previously obtained by people, tit Jens married Taylor, 46, on May 21, 1994 and separated on January 10, 2015."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are having a baby!”
“"My greatest dream realized!”
“In October, a source told ET that the couple was expecting a baby boy.”
“"He's such a nice, nice, nice person."”
“I've just never had that," she continued.”
“"He's so f**king cute and supportive and sweet.”
“"He said, 'I want to have kids with you, [and] if you get pregnant, you could make maternity jeans for [your clothing line] Good American."”
“"He wants to have kids now," Khloe explained.”
“The news, of course, came as no surprise to KUWTK fans, who saw a June episode where Khloe revealed that her Tristan -- who she'd been romantically linked to since 2016, was looking to start a family with her.”
“This is something she has wanted for a long time and, finally, the timing is right."”


"We're going to have a baby!"
"My biggest dream has come true!"
"In October, a source told et that the couple were pregnant with a baby boy."
"He's a good man, a good man, a good man."
"I've never been like this," she continued
"He's cute, he's supportive, he's cute."
"He said," I want to have a baby with you. "If you're pregnant, you can make maternity jeans for good Americans."
"He wants children now," Chloe explained
"Of course, this news is no surprise to kutek fans, who saw Khloe reveal her Tristan in a June episode - she has been in romantic contact with her since 2016 and is planning to start a family with her."
"That's what she's wanted for a long time, and finally, the timing is right."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““I have a woman coming through, having me talk about her heart,” Henry said.”
““And this is very clear in the way that this comes through, she’s very insistent to acknowledge, no matter how I died I need them to know the heart, I need them to know the heart.”
“And there’s a feeling of having a susceptibility to a heart arrhythmia and also having a susceptibility just to a heart issue.”“But I can distinctly tell there are other aspects to this passing,” he continued.”
““People talking about this or discussing this heart thing, but it’s something else.”
“It’s like, or I die of something else or people think I die of something else.”
“And there’s just an emphasis on basically saying like, people don’t know the full picture of how.”
“.”
“.to what extent this really affected me.”When asked if there have been any “recent discussions” about someone with a “heart condition,” Brown revealed, “Yeah, my ex-wife.”As Radar exclusively reported, Brown also received chilling messages from beyond the grave regarding his late daughter.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"I had a woman come over and let me talk about her heart," Henry said
"This is very clear, she insisted that no matter how I die, I need them to know my heart, I need them to know my heart."
"There's a sensitivity to arrhythmias and heart problems." "But I can see clearly that there are other aspects of the situation," he continued
"People talk about it or talk about it, but it's another thing."
"It's like, either I die of something else, or people think I die of something else."
"Another point is that basically people don't know how to do the whole picture."
“.”
Asked if there was any "recent discussion" about a person with "heart disease," Brown revealed, "yes, my ex-wife." According to radar's exclusive report, Brown also received chilling messages from outside the grave about his late daughter



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...her group carried a large stuffed animal perhaps for one of Kris granchildren...”
“She later added a large black cap that had a furry texture; Kris wore large framed aviators as well as layers of necklaces.”
“And on Thursday, Kris Jenner took some time for herself while in the city of Cusco, where she was spotted shopping at a local market.”
“The 61-year-old tried on a furry hat as well as cradled a baby goat during her excursion, later joined by Kylie's friends.”
“So, do you need a momager?”
“Kris jenner cradled a kid while in the city of Cusco Peru this week Hat trick The star also tried on new headgear during a tour of the local market The Kardashian matriarch and daughter Kylie met with children suffering from the facial birth defect while in Peru in association...”
“...with the Smile Train organization...”
“She created a special limited edition color for a Kylie Cosmetics lip kit - titled Smile - with proceeds going directly to the charity.”
“Kylie has donated $500,000 to the charity.”
“The organization provides free surgery for kids born in developing countries with cleft palate.”


“… Her group brought a big plush toy, perhaps for one of Chris Gran's children... "
"Then she added a big, hairy black hat; Chris wore a pilot with a big frame and a couple of necklaces."
On Thursday, Chris Jenner spent some time in Cusco when she was found shopping at a local market
Kelly, 61, wore a fluffy hat and carried a little goat on her hike, and her friends later joined her
"So, do you need a mother?"
"Chris Jenna is playing hat tricks with a child in Cusco, Peru, this week. The star also tried on a new hat while touring the local market. Kardashian's matriarch and daughter Kelly met when they were dating children with congenital facial defects in Peru..."
“… Train organization with smile... "
"She designed a special limited edition color for Kylie Cosmetics Lipstick suit, entitled" smile, and the proceeds were directly donated to charity. "
"Kelly has donated half a million dollars to charity."
"The organization provides free surgery for children born with cleft palate in developing countries."



**Something goes wrong**
“Pink roses have made multiple appearances on the Revenge Body star’s Instagram account since she confirmed her pregnancy – like a gorgeous set of blush and white blooms she shared a snap of in late February.”
“In January, Kardashian shared a photo of two eye masks labeled “Mommy” and “Daddy” with a pink heart filter.”
“...them to wonder if the TV reality star has dropped hints of the sex in some of her posts...”
“RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Says Her Pregnancy Has Been Healthy and Strong Amid Criticism Over Japan Trip The star has kept mum about whether she s carrying a boy or a girl although eagle eyed fans have kept track of every social media post that she shares causing many of...”
“She wrote, “ 有難い ” in the caption, which means “thankful” in Japanese.”
“...a leopard print coat...”
“However the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star was not making it that easy on her fans who thought her fashion was confirming the sex of her child as earlier in the day she shared a photo of herself wearing a baby blue dress along with matching colored shoes and...”
““Bamboo Forest with my ,” Kardashian wrote in the caption.”
“In a second photo, she posed with older sister Kourtney, who wore a blue long-sleeved crop top and a blue mini skirt along with knee black boots.”
““ Kyoto Khlo ,” she wrote in the caption, causing fans to wonder if she was carrying a girl.”


"Since her pregnancy was confirmed, pink roses have appeared on avenging stars' Instagram accounts many times - just like a gorgeous set of blush and white flowers she shared at the end of February."
In January, Kardashian shared a photo of two goggles labeled "Mom" and "Dad" with a pink heart filter on them
“…… They want to know if the reality TV star hinted at sexual behavior in some of her posts... "
"Related video khlo é Kardashian said that her pregnancy has been a healthy and powerful criticism. The star of the trip in Japan has been silent about whether she carries a boy or a girl, although Hawkeye fans have been tracking her every social media post, causing her to share so many..."
"Thank you," she wrote in the title, which means "thank you" in Japanese
“… Leopard Coat... "
"However, the appearance of the Kardashian star didn't make her fans feel relaxed. They thought her fashion was to confirm the gender of her children. Earlier that day, she shared a picture of herself wearing a baby blue skirt and matching colorful shoes, as well as..."
"Bamboo grove is with my children," Kardashian wrote in the title
In the second photo, she was photographed with her sister Courtney, wearing a blue long sleeve jacket, a blue miniskirt and Black Knee Boots
"Kyoto khlo," she wrote in the title, causing fans to wonder if she is pregnant with a girl



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although the Baldwins are looking forward to their cake and wine, Hilaria opened up about the importance of the upcoming ceremony.”
“The couple has four children: Leonardo, 9 months, Rafael, 2, Carmen, 3, and 21-year-old Ireland (Alec’s daughter from his marriage to Kim Basinger).”
“...plans with wife Hilaria...”
“The 59-year-old actor and the yoga instructor, 33, will ring in their fifth wedding anniversary this month, and (thanks to Alec) the cat’s out of the bag on how they plan to celebrate.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I see what I have and I’m very lucky,” he told E!”
“News on Tuesday at the New York premiere of Blind.”
““We’re getting remarried on Friday.”Hilaria chimed in: “Now there’s gonna be people at our doorstep!”Naturally, Alec worked to cover up his snafu.”
““I’m sorry.”
“I shouldn’t have said that … Did I say remarried?”


"While the Baldwins are looking forward to their cake and wine, Hilaria is open about the importance of the upcoming wedding."
"The couple have four children: 9-month-old Leonardo, 2-year-old Rafael, 3-year-old Carmen and 21-year-old Ireland (daughter of Alec's marriage to Kim Basinger)
“… And his wife Hillary's plan... "
The 59 year old actor and 33 year old yoga instructor will be married on their fifth wedding anniversary this month, and (thanks to Alec), the secret of how they plan to celebrate the wedding has come to light
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I saw what I had and I was very lucky," he told e! "
"News on Tuesday at the New York Premiere of the blind."
"We're going to remarry on Friday." "There will be people at the door now," chimed Hilaria! "Of course, Alec tries to cover up his mistakes."
"I'm sorry."
"I shouldn't have said that I mean remarried? "



**Something goes wrong**
“True gave me the peace and strength I needed — Khloé (@khloekardashian) November 5, 2018Despite the cheating scandal, the two are still together.”
“I know now, looking back that I was in shock because I couldn’t believe that this would ever happen to me but I’m still very proud of myself for how I handled everything.”
“E!”
“...released a short clip of the moment on Thursday, ahead of an episode airing this Sunday.”
““Is everyone writing you?” her sister, Kourtney Kardashian, asked Khloe while standing next to her hospital bed.”
““Too many people, but writing about both things [the cheating and her giving birth],” Khloe responded quietly.”
““And I’m like, ‘Shut up.’ I don’t have the energy for that right now.”
“Like, everyone, leave me alone.”“I feel like everyone just wants you to feel that you’re supported,” Kourtney said, as Kim looked on.”
““I appreciate that, I do,” Khloe answered.”
““It’s also, everyone has their own shit that I know nothing about and mine is thrown on the public of everything.”E!”


"It really gave me the calm and strength I needed - khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) on November 5, 2018, despite the cheating scandal, they were still together."
"Now I know, and in retrospect I was shocked because I couldn't believe it was going to happen to me, but I'm still proud of the way I handled everything."
“E！”
“…… A short clip was released on Thursday before the episode aired on Sunday
"Did everyone write to you? Her sister Courtney Kardashian stood by the bed and asked Chloe
"Too many people, but write about these two things (cheating and her childbirth)," Khloe replied calmly
"I said," shut up. " I don't have the energy to do it now. "
"Like, everybody, leave me alone." "I think everyone just wants you to feel supported," kurtney said, looking at Kim
"I appreciate it, really," Crowe replied
"Also, everyone has their own shit, and I don't know anything about my shit. I throw my shit to the public."! "



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They also cited their right to read government statements from the president's Twitter account.”
“The f--k. Up," and "You are a national embarrassment.”
“Teigen says the straw that broke the camel's back was her tweet at the president that said no one likes him.”
“On Sunday, Mr. Trump tweeted, "It's very sad that Republicans, even some that were carried over the line on my back, do very little to protect their President," and Teigen responded, "Lolllllll no one likes you."”
“Lolllllll no one likes you — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) July 23, 2017On Tuesday, Teigen tweeted that she had been blocked "after 9 years of hating Donald J Trump."”
“After 9 years of hating Donald J Trump telling him lol no one likes you was the straw pic twitter com MhZ6bXT1Dp christine teigen chrissyteigen July 25 2017 In February Teigen who campaigned for Hillary Clinton bragged to USA Today that she d been trolling Mr Trump for five to...”
“...seven years...”
“"I've been doing this forever, and I take pride in that," she said.”
“That includes tweets from Teigen to Mr. Trump like "You are 71 f**king years old.”
“Grow.”


"They also cited their right to read government statements from the president's Twitter account."
"F -- K. up" and "you're a national embarrassment."
"Tegan said that the straw that crushed camel's back was that she tweeted to the president that no one liked him."
"On Sunday, trump tweeted," it's very sad that the Republicans, even some of them with my bottom line behind them, have done very little to protect their president, "tegan responded," no one likes you. "
"Loll no one likes you - Christina Taigen (@ christyteigen) tweeted on Tuesday, July 23, 2017 that she was banned" after nine years of hating Donald J. trump. "
"After nine years of hating Donald J. trump, tell him lol no one likes you. You're a twitter site, mhz6bxt1dp chrissyteigen chrissytegen. On February 25, 2017, tigan, who ran for Hillary Clinton, bragged to USA today that she had bullied trump for five years..."
“… Seven years... "
"I've been doing this all the time and I'm proud of it," she said
This includes tegan's tweets to trump, such as "you're 71."
"Grow up."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find out when RHOA returns for Season 10.”
“So how will this crew of Southern Belles get along with NeNe back in the building?”
“Though, many fans have continued using her dramatic GIFS, memes, and one-liners in her absence.”
“She provided the utmost entertainment through her many witty quotes, comebacks, and side-eye before letting fans know that she sadly wouldn't return for season 8.”
“From the beginning of the series she was a favorite, as she never hesitated to say exactly what was on her mind.”
“With her blonde hair and dramatic personality she turned heads whenever she entered a room.”
“Fans first met the outspoken NeNe in the very first season of RHOA.”
“...she said.”
“Let the shade begin, hunni!"”
“I'm back and ready for Season 10.”


"See when RhoA will be back in season 10."
"So, how will these Southern beauties get along with Nain in the building?"
"Nevertheless, many fans continue to use her dramatic gifts, memes and a sentence from her absence."
"Before letting fans know that she's sorry she won't be back in the eighth season, she provided maximum entertainment with a lot of witty quotes, comebacks and sidelights."
"From the beginning, she was very popular, because she never hesitated to say what she thought."
"She has blonde hair, blue eyes and a bright personality. She turns her head as soon as she enters the room."
"The first time the fans saw the outspoken Nene was in Roya's first season
“…… She said
"Let the shadows begin, hooney!"
"I'm back for season 10."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was then sentenced to three years in state prison in 2015 for violating his probation and was released early in 2016.”
““The suspect fled store on foot … Officers found the knife and cash in [O’Neal’s] possession.”O’Neal was previously arrested in 2008 for a DUI and drug possession, and again in 2011 for heroin possession.”
““The suspect entered the store with a knife and approached the clerk and demanded money from the register,” the LAPD told Us about the incident.”
“He pleaded not guilty to second-degree robbery, assault with a deadly weapon, possession of a smoking device, possession of an injection/ingestion device and two counts of possessing a controlled substance at the LAX Airport courthouse.”
“Us Weekly previously confirmed that O’Neal pleaded not guilty on May 11 to robbing the convenience store in Santa Monica.”
“O’Neal also allegedly tried to attack another victim with a broken glass bottle.”
“The police report revealed that one of the five people allegedly assaulted by O’Neal sustained “significant and serious stab wounds and cuts to his face, neck and upper body,” while another had a serious stab wound to the left of his body.”
“O’Neal remains in the custody of the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department.”
“They filed one count of attempted murder, two counts of assault with a deadly weapon, one count of criminal threats, one count of brandishing a knife and one count of battery.”
“According to a press release from the LAPD, detectives from the Pacific Area presented their findings to the District Attorney’s Office on Friday, June 8.”


"He was subsequently sentenced to three years' imprisonment in 2015 for violating the probation provisions and was released in early 2016."
"The suspect fled the store on foot The police found the knife and the cash in his possession O'Neill was arrested in 2008 for drunk driving and possession of drugs, and in 2011 for possession of heroin
"The suspect entered the store with a knife, approached the clerk and asked for money from the cash register," LAPD told us about the incident
"He pleaded not guilty to second degree robbery, assault with a lethal weapon, possession of a smoking device, possession of an injection / ingestion device and two counts of possession of a controlled substance at the Los Angeles Airport court."
"US weekly previously confirmed that O'Neill did not plead guilty to the robbery of Santa Monica convenience store on May 11."
"O'Neill is also alleged to have tried to attack another victim with a broken glass bottle."
"The police report showed that one of the five people who were said to have been attacked by O'Neill had" severe stab wounds and cuts on the face, neck and upper body "and the other had severe stab wounds on the left side of his body."
"O'Neill is still in Los Angeles County Sheriff's custody."
They put forward one attempted murder, two attacks with lethal weapons, one threat, one knife wielding and one assault
"According to a LAPD press release, Pacific detectives presented their findings to the district attorney's office on Friday, June 8."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I might actually need to barf because it's conjuring uncomfortably pure emotions.”
“This is insanely adorable.”
“Excuse me, but he hired BACKUP DANCERS his daughter Kensli's birthday.”
“ANYWAYS, it feels only natural that Twitter freaked out when Chance the Rapper posted a video of his daughter's birthday party.”
“Sorry, not sorry for laying down some truth about all of us creeps out here.”
“What thirsty woman/gay man/non-binary person attracted to men ISN'T into that?!”
“But also, cute dads with babies?!”
“For starters, it gives moms a break from being the emotionally toiling Super Parent they're so often required to be.”
“Who doesn't love seeing a dad dote on his children in a wholesome and creative way?!”
“The internet is a sucker for a cute dad story.”


"I may really need to vomit because it's a disturbing pure emotion."
"It's so cute."
"Sorry, he hired a backup dancer on his daughter kensley's birthday."
"Anyway, when the rapper accidentally released a video of his daughter's birthday party, twitter felt very natural."
"I'm sorry, I'm not sorry, I said some truth about all of us."
"Which thirsty woman / gay / bisexual is not interested in men?"
"And a lovely dad with kids?"
"First of all, it gives mothers a chance to take a break from the emotional drudgery they are usually asked to do."
"Who doesn't like to see a father dote on his children in a healthy and creative way?"
"The Internet is a sucker for a lovely dad story."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Happy shopping!”
“Click through the slideshow for a roundup of the best bandanas to try the look for yourself.”
“If you're looking for a few to shop, we've got you covered.”
“While it’s not a huge diversion from her traditional go-to, we’re loving this casual take on the trend, and the good news is you probably own a bandana already.”
“The look gave off a casual cool vibe, perfect for their low-key family gathering.”
“Instead, she tied a bandana around her neck to accessorize her off-shoulder top.”
“For grandma MJ’s birthday bash in San Diego, her go-to ‘90s choker was noticeably absent.”
“We think so!”
“Has Kendall Jenner just found a new must-have accessory?”


"Happy shopping!"
"Click on the slide to see a summary of the best headscarves and try your own look."
"If you want to buy some, we can help you."
"Although it's not a huge shift away from her tradition, we love this leisure trend, and the good news is that you may already have a big handkerchief."
"This style exudes a casual sense of cool, very suitable for their low-key family gatherings."
Instead, she tied a large handkerchief around her neck as an accessory to her off shoulder top
"Grandma MJ was at her birthday party in San Diego, and her 90's bib was obviously absent."
"We think so!"
"Did Kendall Jenner find a new essential part?"



**Something goes wrong**
“...already have.”
“But as a vocal social activist who’s personally invested $1 million into Chicago Public Schools, he also knows that Democratic leaders in his community haven’t always brought about the sort of change the city needs.”
“Chance The Rapper just apologized for saying that “black people don’t have to be democrats,” in the midst of Kanye West‘s pro-Donald Trump Twitter rant.”
“After the 25-year-old Chicago native was slammed online by fans for his “poorly timed” remarks, he issued a length apology on the social media platform.”
““Anyone who knows me knows how passionate I am about my city and my loved ones.”
“Kanye West is not just a mentor or big homie to me.”
“He’s my family.”
“No matter how much I may disagree with him, it’s hard for me to watch people talk about someone I love–even if they were justified in doing so,” Chance wrote.”
““I didn’t speak up because I agree with what Kanye had to say or cause I f*** with trump, I did it because I wanted to help my friend and cause I felt like I was being used to attack him.”
“Unfortunately my attempt to support Kanye is being used to discredit my brothers and sisters in the movement and I can t sit by and let that happen either Chance went on to explain that he understands why his fans are upset and that he would never side with someone...”


“… There are already
"But as a powerful social activist, he personally invested $1 million in Chicago public schools, and he knows that the Democratic leaders in his community don't always bring the kind of change Chicago needs."
"The rapper just yelled on Kanye West's Pro Donald Trump tweet, apologizing for saying, 'black people don't have to be Democrats.'"
The 25-year-old Chicago native made a lengthy apology on the social media platform after his "untimely" comments were slammed by fans online
"People who know me know how enthusiastic I am about my city and my family."
"Kanye West is more than a mentor or a great partner to me."
"He's my family."
"No matter how much I disagree with him, it's hard for me to see people talk about people I love - even if they do it for a reason," chance wrote
"I didn't say it because I agreed with Kanye, or because I had sex with trump, because I wanted to help my friend, because I felt I was being used to attack him."
"Unfortunately, my support for Kanye's efforts has been used to slander my brothers and sisters in the movement. I can't sit back and ignore it. No matter what chance it is, I will continue to explain. He understands why his fans are not happy and he will never stand by someone..."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The second I had kids, they immediately became my priority and everything I did existed to support the life that was all about them in a good way,” he said.”
“Van Der Beek further explained that becoming a father changed his perspective on the work he chooses to do...”
“...show runner and star James Van Der Beek is expecting his fifth child with wife Kimberly, they announced on Instagram FridayFifth Child on the Way for James Van Der BeekJames Van Der Beek is about to be back on newborn diaper duty.”
“The What Would Diplo Do?”
“...show runner and star — who is currently shooting for Ryan Murphy‘s new FX series, Pose — is going to be a dad for the fifth time.”
“Wife Kimberly is pregnant, he announced on Instagram Friday, sharing a photo of their four children placing their hands on their mama’s bare belly.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Thrilled beyond belief to announce that we are once again adding to our family ,” Van Der Beek captioned the adorable shot.”
““And I say ‘beyond belief’ because some people are probably wondering if we’re out of our minds,” he added.”
““Which we might very well be … but I couldn’t be more excited.”


"The moment I gave birth, they immediately became my top priority and everything I did was to support their lives in a good way," he said
"Vanderbilt further explained that becoming a father changed his view of the job he chose to take up..."
“…… Host and star James Van der Beek and his wife Kimberly will have their fifth child, and they announced on instagram on Friday that James Van der Beek's fifth child will return to the newborn diaper class. "
"What will diplo do?"
“… "Runner and star," which is being filmed for Ryan Murphy's new FX series "pose," will be a dad for the fifth time. "
"His wife Kimberly is pregnant," he announced on instagram on Friday, sharing photos of their four children putting their hands on their mother's bare stomach
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's incredible to announce that we're doing something for our family again," van der Beek wrote in the title of this lovely photo
"I say 'unbelievable' because some people may want to know if we're crazy," he added
"We are likely to be But I can't be more excited. "



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"I never really envisioned wearing something like that for my wedding," Iman told Brides.com.”
“The 27-year-old Victoria's Secret model and 25-year-old New York Giants wide receiver tied the knot this weekend in a ceremony at the Beverly Hills Hotel in Los Angeles, according to People.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The couple, who met in November 2016 at Victor Cruz's birthday party, got engaged in December and announced the happy news today on Instagram.”
“"A night full of tears of happiness I’m beyond excited to spend the rest of my life with you @sterl_shep3 you are my soulmate, my best friend, my everything!”
“Can’t wait to be your Mrs. ," Chanel captioned the photo of their engagement.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"It never occurred to me to wear such a dress at a wedding," eman said Bride's net. "
The 27 year old Victoria's Secret model married the 25-year-old New York Giants wide angle catcher at the Beverly Hills Hotel in Los Angeles this weekend, people magazine reported
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The couple met at Victor Cruz's birthday party in November 2016 and got engaged in December, which was announced on instagram today."
"It's a night full of happy tears. I'm very excited to spend the rest of my life with you. You are my soul mate, my best friend and everything to me!"
"I can't wait to be your wife," Chanel added to the photo of their engagement



**Something goes wrong**
“Speaking of Rihanna’s relationships, here’s a timeline of Rihanna’s most infamous relationship with Drake.”
“Get the tea below!”
“Aside from that gorgeous, full head of hair and beaming smile, there are more than a few special qualities about Hassan that we suspect made Rihanna want to break her single streak.”
“Being that he’s not a celebrity and we’ve literally never seen these two in public before, we of course had to go digging into this Mr. Jameel’s background and report the findings.”
“His name is Hassan Jameel and when he’s not making out with Rihanna on an exotic vacation in Spain, he’s busy running a very large company and elbow-rubbing with some high profile people.”
“Well, chill out and let’s regroup because we’ve got some piping hot tea on who this new mystery man is.”
“I mean, we had really nothing to go on save for a few grainy paparazzi photos of Riri and this anonymous Rico Suave getting frisky in a hot tub.”
“And rightfully so.”
“So Rihanna’s allegedly got a new man and the internet doesn’t quite know how to deal.”


"Speaking of Rihanna's relationship, here's a timeline for Rihanna's most notorious relationship with Drake."
"Bring the tea down there!"
"In addition to the gorgeous, plump hair and bright smile, there are many special traits in Hassan, which we suspect make Rihanna want to break her single record."
"Since he is not a celebrity and we have never seen them in public before, we certainly have to dig into Mr. Jamil's background and report the results of our research."
"His name is Hassan Jamil, and when he didn't make out with Rihanna during his foreign vacation in Spain, he was busy running a very big company and passing by some famous people."
"Well, calm down and let's get together again, because we have some hot tea about who this new mystery man is."
"I mean, we really don't have much to go on, except for a few pictures of Riley and this anonymous ricko suaf playing in the hot tub."
"Of course."
"So Rihanna is said to have a new man, but the Internet doesn't know how to deal with it."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Citing production issues, Lovato postponed the South American portion of her tour in April.”
“Lovato’s most recent North American tour leg, which ran from February to April, grossed more than $20 million, according to tracking by Pollstar.”
“When contacted by CNN on Wednesday, a source close to Lovato denied reports she had been treated for an overdose of heroin.”
“She is stable, conscious and breathing, the official said.”
“A senior law enforcement official told CNN that Lovato is at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles.”
“...and transported a 25 year old woman to a hospital...”
“Some of the information being reported is incorrect and they respectfully ask for privacy and not speculation as her health and recovery is the most important thing right now The Los Angeles Fire Department confirmed to CNN it received a call at 11 22 a m for a medical emergency...”
““Demi is awake and with her family, who want to express thanks to everyone for the love, prayers and support,” said the statement from Lovato’s representative.”
“A source close to Lovato’s family previously told CNN the singer’s hospitalization was the result of an apparent drug overdose.”
“(Photo by Neilson Barnard/Getty Images)(CNN) —Singer Demi Lovato is awake and with her family after being hospitalized earlier Tuesday, according to a statement from the singer’s representative.”


Lovato postponed her tour in South America in April on the grounds of production problems
According to pollstar's tracking report, Lovato's latest North American tour lasted from February to April, with a total revenue of more than $20 million
When contacted by CNN on Wednesday, a person familiar with the situation in Lovato denied reports that she had been treated for an overdose of heroin
"She is stable, conscious and breathing," the official said
"A senior law enforcement official told CNN that Lovato is at cedars Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles."
“… Take a 25-year-old woman to the hospital... "
"Some of the information reported is incorrect. They respectfully ask for privacy, not speculation, because her health and recovery are the most important things at present. The Los Angeles Fire Department confirmed to CNN that it received an emergency medical call at 11:22 a.m..."
"Demi wakes up with her family and they want to thank everyone for their love, prayer and support," Lovato's representative said in a statement
"A source close to Lovato's family told CNN earlier that the singer was hospitalized because of an apparent overdose."
(CNN Nielsen Barnard / Getty Images) singer Demi Lovato woke up early Tuesday after she was hospitalized with her family



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FOLLOW NBC OUT ON TWITTER, FACEBOOK AND INSTAGRAM”
“The attorneys for Simmons and the defendants did not immediately respond to requests for comment.”
“Simmons is appealing Keosian’s dismissal.”
“"While, as a practical matter, the characteristic may be held in contempt by a portion of the population, the court will not validate those prejudices by legally recognizing them," Keosian ruled.”
“...pic.twitter.com/6l8p4sch9M — Mike Sington (@MikeSington) August 30, 2017In his tentative ruling, issued in August 2017, Keosian stated that being misidentified as transgender does not inherently expose someone to "hatred, contempt, ridicule or obloquy," and therefore does not rise to the level of defamation.”
“Judge rules reporting a person as transgender is not injurious.”
“Richard Simmons' defamation suit against Enquirer being thrown out.”
“While the National Enquirer stated on its website that its reporting on Simmons was based on "credible sources," Simmons, in his lawsuit, alleged that a former assistant, whom he said has "blackmailed, extorted and stalked" him, was responsible for the false claims.”
“Simmons is transitioning from a male to a female including shocking sex surgery breast implants hormone treatments and consultations on medical castrations Simmons lawsuit stated...”
“A June 2016 cover of the National Enquirer for example read Richard Simmons He s Now a Woman In his lawsuit Simmons claimed the outlets published the stories with calculated malice This case is about a particularly egregious and hurtful campaign of defamations and privacy invasions falsely asserting that Mr...”


Focus on NBC on twitter, Facebook and instagram
"Simmons' lawyers and defendants did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Simmons is appealing against keosian's dismissal."
"Although, as a practical matter, this feature may be despised by some people, the court will not confirm these prejudices by legitimately admitting them," keosian ruled
“... pic.twitter.com/6l8p4sch9M -Mike Sington (@ Mike Sington) on August 30, 2017, keosian pointed out in his interim ruling issued in August 2017 that being mistaken for transgender does not mean that a person is born with "hatred, contempt, ridicule or defamation", so it will not rise to the level of defamation
"The judge ruled that it was not harmful to report a transgender person."
"Richard Simmons' libel suit against the inquirer was dismissed."
"Although the National Enquirer stated on its website that its coverage of Simmons was based on" credible sources, "Simmons alleged in the lawsuit that a former assistant was responsible for the false charges, saying that the assistant had" blackmailed, blackmailed and followed "him."
"Simmons is transiting from male to female, including shocking sexual surgery, breast augmentation, hormone therapy and medical castration consultation. Simmons sued to claim that..."
"For example, on the cover of the national inquirer in June 2016, Richard Simmons, who is now a woman in the lawsuit, claimed that the media reports were deliberately malicious. This case is about a particularly vicious and damaging campaign of defamation and invasion of privacy, falsely claiming that



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maksim Chmerkovskiy was unable to perform due to an unspecified personal issue, so eliminated pro Alan Bersten danced with Vanessa Lachey instead.”
“[24] It was announced at the beginning of the show that, due to the tragedy, no elimination would take place.”
“30 30 140 Lindsey Mark 2 22 21 24 27 51 26 28 40 27 24 51 26 28 54 29 28 57 40 40 80 30 30 140 Frankie Witney 3 19 23 25 21 46 24 29 31 30 30 60 26 27 53 25 26 51 38”
“19 Scoring charts edit Couple Place 1 2 3 2 2 3 4 5 6 a 7 8 9 10 b 1 2 Top 4 Top 3 Jordan Lindsay 1 22 24 24 25 49 29 30 39 30 24 54 30 30 60 28 30 58 40 40 80”
“[18]Dance troupe [ edit ]The dance troupe members for the season are former pros Sasha Farber and Jenna Johnson, and season 24 troupe members Artur Adamski, Brandon Armstrong, Hayley Erbert, and Britt Stewart.”
“[17] On October 23, singer Shania Twain joined the panel as a guest judge.”
“[16] Julianne Hough did not return as a permanent judge this season, though she did return as a guest judge during the first night of the finals.”
“[5]Hosts and judges [ edit ]Tom Bergeron and Erin Andrews returned as hosts, while Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, and Bruno Tonioli returned as judges.”
“[4] On September 6, the rest of the cast was revealed on Good Morning America.”
“[3] Drew Scott was announced as the first celebrity competing for the season partnered with Emma Slater.”


"Maxim chimmelkovsky couldn't perform because of an unspecified personal problem, so the eliminated professional Alan belsten turned to dance with Vanessa Lach."
"[24] announced at the beginning that it would not be eliminated due to this tragedy."
"30 30 140 Lindsay Mark 2 22 21 24 27 51 26 28 40 27 51 26 54 29 28 57 40 30 140 Frankie wittney 3 19 23 25 21 46 24 29 31 30 60 26 27 53 25 51 38"
"19 score table editing positions of lovers 1 23 2 3 4 5 6 a 7 8 9 10 B 1 2 top 4 top 3 Jordan Lindsay 1 22 24 25 49 29 30 39 30 24 54 30 60 28 30 58 40 80"
Members of this season's dance company include former professional Sasha Farber and Jenna Johnson, as well as season 24 members Artur adansky, Brandon Armstrong, Haley Albert and Britt Stewart
[17] Singer Shania Twain joined the jury as a guest judge on October 23
Julian Hoff has not returned as a permanent judge this season, although she returned as a visiting judge on the first night of the final
Host and judge Tom bergeran and Irene Andrews were the hosts again, while Carrie Ann Inaba, Ron Goodman and Bruno tonioli were the judges again
"[4] on September 6, other actors appeared on Good Morning America."
"[3] drew Scott has been announced as the first celebrity to partner Emma Slater in this season's competition."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I did say no, and when he was on top of me I said, ‘I don’t want to do this.’ He kept humping me and it was disgusting.”
“.”
“I felt afraid.”
““Then he pushed me onto the bed and his pants were down and he lifted up my skirt.”
““Immediately when we got inside the house, he started to kiss me and I kind of brushed [him] away,” de la Huerta said.”
““Things got very uncomfortable very fast,” the actress, now 33, told Vanity Fair in a phone interview on Wednesday.”
“In de la Huerta’s account of the night, Weinstein arrived at her apartment demanding to come inside and have a drink.”
“Weinstein offered de la Huerta a ride home to Tribeca.”


"I did refuse, and when he pressed on me, I said, 'I don't want to do that.' It's disgusting that he keeps carrying me on his back
“.”
"I'm scared."
"Then he pushed me to the bed, his pants fell off, and he lifted up my skirt."
"As soon as we came in, he started kissing me, and I kind of drove him away," he said
"Things quickly get uncomfortable," the 33 year old actress said in a telephone interview with Vanity Fair on Wednesday
"According to delahuerta's description of the night, Weinstein came to her apartment and asked to come in for a drink."
"Weinstein gave delahuerta a lift back to Tribeca."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I think maybe it'd be good for her to try to be a little more empathetic to other people that are in the same situation."”
“I'm sure she's getting judged all the time as well by people who don't really know her.”
“...of in the same shoes...”
“In response Azalea told Smallzy I thought it was a bit of a strange thing to throw that out there but she s young and I hope she learns maybe to be a bit less judgmental when she s kind...”
“I watched her career dissolve and it fascinated me."”
“F---king moron.”
“Of Azalea, the singer said, "She had a complete disregard for black culture.”
“In an interview published last week, Halsey targeted Azalea as someone she would never put on one of her records.”
“"And I don't know her, I've never met her."”
“...don t know Azalea continued...”


"So I thought, maybe it's good for her to try to be more compassionate to other people in the same situation."
"I'm sure she's been judged by people who don't know her very well."
“… Wearing the same shoes... "
"In response, Rhododendron told smudge that I thought it was a bit strange to throw it out, but she was still young. I hope she learned to judge less when she was kind..."
"I watched her career disappear, which fascinated me."
"F - idiot king."
On the azalea, the singer said, "she totally ignores black culture."
"In an interview published last week, Halsey described the Rhododendron as someone she would never put on a record."
"I don't know her. I've never met her."
“… I don't know. Cuckoo goes on



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’d talk on the phone, me sharing my own coming-out story and her talking about things she was discovering.”
“Because Lauren was finding out who she was, I became a confidant to her.”
“I was on set, sitting in front of the monitors, and she and Lea DeLaria, who plays Big Boo, walked up to me.”
“I came to New York to shoot my first episode.”
“Lauren Morelli, Writer-Producer: I’d already seen Samira’s audition tape and immediately had a crush on her — the complication being that I was married to a man at the time.”
“Honestly, I thought she was gay the first time I met her.”
“We spent four days in a row working together.”
“Lauren wrote episode six of the first season, one of the first scripts really featuring my character, Poussey.”
“The cast would get every script to read, and with every new script came a new writer whom they’d fly out from Los Angeles to meet us.”
“We were both working on Orange Is the New Black, our first big jobs in the industry.”


"We talked on the phone, I shared my own story, she talked about what she found out."
"Because Lauren found out who she was, I became her confidant."
"I was on set, sitting in front of the monitor, and she came up to me with Leah Dellia, who played big boo."
"I came to New York to make my first episode."
"Lauren Morelli, screenwriter and producer: I've seen the video of Samira's audition and immediately fell in love with her - the complicated thing is that I married a man."
"To be honest, I thought she was gay the first time I saw her."
"We work together for four days in a row."
"Lauren wrote the sixth episode of season one, which is the first play that really takes my character Percy as the leading role."
"Actors will read every play, every new play will bring a new writer, and they will fly out of Los Angeles to meet us."
"We are all in orange is the new black, our first big job in this industry."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Cheryl retweeted the track to her 4.9 million followers, Liam has stayed fairly quiet on his new venture.”
“The new track will be released by Cheryl as her second single from her new album, Only Human.”
“Going under the name ‘Payno’, Liam has collaborated on the new single with Afterhrs and Cheryl on the dance remix, which was first released on I-D magazine’s website.”
“She also messaged the 1D star: "Thanks Payno, I love it," along with dancing emojis.”
“Cheryl retweeted the track earlier today, surprising the millions of Directioners around the world.”
“...has only gone and dropped a surprise remix of Cheryl Fernandez Versini s new track I Don t Care...”
“Get a daily dose of showbiz gossip straight to your inbox with our free email newsletter Sign up Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email Liam Payne might have just wrapped his world stadium tour with One Direction but the star...”


"When Cheryl forwarded the song to her 4.9 million fans, Liam was silent about her new career."
"This new song will be released by Cheryl as the second single of her new album only humans."
"Liam collaborated with afterhrs and Cheryl on the dance mix of the new single under the name of 'payno', which was first published on the website of I-D magazine."
She also sent a message to 1D Star: "thank you, I love it," and the expression of dancing
"Cheryl forwarded the song earlier today, which surprised millions of directors around the world."
“… Just going to lose a surprising mix of Cheryl Fernandez wesini's new repertoire I don't care... "
"Through our free e-mail communication, we can receive gossip information from the entertainment industry every day. Thank you for your subscription. We have more communication to let me see the invalid e-mail of our privacy statement. Liam Penn may have just finished his trip to the world stadium, but the star..."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think about the SUR family coming to be by Lala's side?”
“Despite their drama, they really stick by their SUR family.”
“Lala's father, Kent Burningham, passed away unexpectedly last month at the age of 64.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDBrittany Cartwright, Katie Maloney-Schwartz, Ariana Madix, and Kristen Doute flew to be by Lala's side.”
“After her father's passing, the singer and reality TV star wrote on Instagram on April 23, "The world seems to be spinning much slower.”
“I’ve never felt so lost.”
“I’ve never felt so sad.”
“My world has crumbled."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDLala, 28, continues to share tributes to her late father on Instagram.”


"Please let us know in the comments."
"Background: what do you think of the sur family coming to Lala?"
"Although they are dramatic, they stick to their families."
Lala's father, Kent Birmingham, died last month at the age of 64
The article continues with the following advertising sources: Brittany Cartwright, Katie malloni Schwartz, Ariana madix and Christine Dutt fly to Lala in the background
After her father's death, the singer and reality star wrote on instagram on April 23: "the world seems to be turning much slower."
"I've never felt so lost."
"I've never been so sad."
"My world has collapsed."
The article continues in the following ad source: 28 year old backgridlala continues to share his mourning for his late father on instagram



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Miley Cyrus Cries While Performing 'Malibu' at Billboard Music Awards...”
“After sitting down for a Tonight Show interview as well, Cyrus closed the show with a performance of two new songs, "Malibu" and "Inspired."”
“Tammi Terrell s Ain t No Mountain High Enough which Google translates into Land Forms Don t Prefer to Get High...”
“WATCH Miley Cyrus Shows Off Her Dance Moves in Ew Sketch With Jimmy Fallon The pair also sang Google translated versions of Rick James Superfreak aka Really Weird Dusty Springfield s Son of a Preacher Man aka A Minister s Male Child and they did a duet of Marvin Gaye...”
“Miley kicked things off with a performance of Ed Sheeran's "Shape of You," which, when translated, is called "Your Body's Curves," and includes the iconic lyric, "I like that cadaver."”
“Later in the episode, the "Malibu" singer joined in on a fun installment of "Google Translate Songs," in which she and Fallon sang lyrics to famous songs that had been translated into various other languages and back into English.”
“WATCH: Watch Miley Cyrus Expertly Channel Her Inner EmojisThe pop star then broke out into a performance of her hit "Party in the U.S.A." and led the giant crowd -- almost all of whom were filming the event on their phones -- in a massive singalong.”
“"This is exciting s**t for me!"”
“"This is my first time [playing] at the subway station," Cyrus yelled out.”
“After finishing the song, Cyrus and Fallon pulled off their thin disguises to the delight of the crowd.”


"Watch: Mary Cyrus weeps when she performs" Malibu "at the Billboard Music Awards..."
Cyrus also sat down for an interview with "Tonight Show" and sang two new songs "Malibu" and "inspired" at the end of the show
"Tammi Terrell's mountain is not high enough, Google translated it into land form, but it doesn't like high..."
"Watch Miley Cyrus and Jimmy Fallon show her steps in the EW sketch. They also sang Google translation's Rick James super fast break, also known as "really strange", Dustin Springfield's son of a missionary, also known as the priest's boy, and they also performed Marvin Gay's duet.... "
"Miley kicked off with ED Sheeran's" your shape, "which is translated as" the curve of your body, "including the iconic lyrics" I like that corpse. "
Later in the episode, the "Malibu" singer joined an interesting "Google Translate songs" program. She and Fallon sang the lyrics of some famous songs, which were translated into other languages and English
"Watch: after watching Miley Cyrus skillfully convey her inner feelings, the pop star suddenly took part in her hit" American party "performance, and led a large audience - almost all of them were filming the event with their mobile phones - to a large-scale concert."
"It's too exciting for me!"
"This is my first time playing in the subway station," Cyrus said aloud
"After singing this song, Cyrus and Fallon took off their thin disguise and made the audience happy."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If we're going to talk about that, you get into a little different category.'"”
“"And I just said, 'Well wait, whoa, whoa, whoa, hang on a second here.”
“Serena Williams is "awesome at a lot of things," according to her fiance, Alexis Ohanian -- and one of those things is sure to be her soon-to-be mom duties.”
“The Reddit co-founder spoke glowingly of Williams, with whom he is expecting his first child, during an appearance on CNBC's Squawk Box on Friday.”
“"She's awesome at a lot of things and she's well on her way to being an awesome mom," Ohanian said.”
“The 34-year-old entrepreneur also revealed he will be taking six weeks of leave when the new baby arrives.”
“"At Reddit, it's really important for us to support men and women when they are welcoming a new member to the family," he said.”
“"And so we have a pretty generous parental leave policy.”
“I'll be taking off for six weeks myself and trying to do the best job possible as a first time dad."”


"If we're going to talk about this, you're going into a slightly different category."
"I just said, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait."
According to her fiance Alexis Ohanian, Serena Williams is brilliant in many ways, one of which must be her responsibility as a soon to be mother
Reddit's co-founder talked enthusiastically about Williams, who is pregnant with his first child, on CNBC's squawkbox on Friday
"She's great at a lot of things and she's becoming a great mom," o'hanian said
"The 34 year old entrepreneur also revealed that when the new baby is born, he will take six weeks off."
"At reddit, when men and women welcome new members into the family, it's very important for us to support them," he said
"So we have a fairly generous policy on parental leave."
"I'm going to take six weeks off myself and try my best to be a dad for the first time."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The MAC x Nicki Minaj lipsticks retail for $17.50, and will be available in stores and online September 21 through October 19.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Time will tell, but until then, start plotting how you’ll get your hands on the Nicki Nudes.”
“And if so, are the nude shades a hint at what’s to come?”
““I'll release these #NickiNudes in September, in preparation for my big surprise announcement with M•A•C.” Does this mean a full collection of makeup inspired by Nicki will be available?”
“But fans have even more to be excited for: This morning, Minaj announced via Instagram that her newest MAC editions were just the start of something bigger.”
“This isn’t the first time Minaj has lent her style to M.A.C—the brand first created a limited edition lipstick in her name in 2010, and she has since appeared in multiple M.A.C Viva Glam campaigns to benefit HIV/AIDS awareness.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The retail price of MAC x Nicki Minaj lipstick is US $17.50, which will be sold in stores and online from September 21st to October 19th.
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Time will tell, but before that, you have to start planning how to get Nicky naked."
"If so, does the shadow of nudity indicate what will happen?"
"I'm going to release these Nicki nudes in September to prepare for my surprise launch with M.A.C." Does that mean there will be a whole set of cosmetics designed by Nicki? "
"But fans are even more excited: this morning, Minagi announced through instagram that her latest Mac version is just the beginning of a bigger career."
"This is not the first time Minaj has promoted its own style to M.A.C brand. She founded limited edition lipstick in 2010. She later appeared in several M.A.C VIVA GLAM campaigns to enhance HIV/AIDS awareness."



**Something goes wrong**
“In the premiere alone, they face possible bullet holes in the windows, unsightly facades, and 100 years worth of potential damage — and that’s all before they step inside.”
“But I’m always looking for growth, always looking into tomorrow,” he says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Chi Town Flip which follows husband and wife team Bryan and Maira Segal as they transform homes in the Windy City follows the same model as Tarek and Christina s successful series and will be the first launched by the production company the El Moussas formed last year before they...”
“...separated...”
““We’ve been working together for a really long time, It’s our job.”
“Obviously, we know each other really well,” says Tarek of the former couple’s dynamic as business partners.”
“They’re co-executive producing the series, which he notes they began working on “before separation.”
“So it’s been a long, long process.”But they’re not simply seeing the project through before parting ways.”
“Tarek tells PEOPLE exclusively, he’s not ruling out the possibility of working together again down the line.”


"At the premiere alone, they were faced with bullet holes in the windows, ugly exterior walls, and 100 years of potential damage - all before they stepped inside."
"But I've been looking for growth, looking forward to tomorrow," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Chi Town flip is launched after the couple team Bryan and Maira Segal renovated the house in Fengcheng. It is the same as Tarek and Christina's successful series. It will be the production company founded by El moussas last year. In their..." The first one launched before
“… Separated... "
"We've been working together for a really long time, it's our job."
"Obviously, we know each other very well," Tariq said of the former couple's vitality as business partners
He said they were co executives of the series, and they started writing the series "before they separated."
"So it's a long process." But they don't simply go through the project before they go their separate ways
"Tariq told people exclusively that he did not rule out the possibility of working together again."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’ll grab a second bus and come out, and I’ll load that bus with kiddie pools and remote control cars and chalk and water balloons and rockets to shoot up in the air — everything.””
““Hangovers last longer than they used to,” he quipped in a 2016 interview, also revealing he brings his brood on the road when he tours.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Dierks Bentley Launches Clothing Line With Flag & AnthemBentley previously opened up to PEOPLE about how his life as a performer has changed as his family expanded.”
“The Music City mainstay married his wife, Cassidy, in 2005, and the pair share three children: daughters Evelyn, 9, and Jordan, 7, and their 4-year-old son Knox.”
“Image zoom Dierks Bentley with daughter Jordan | Credit: Jeff Kravitz/FilmMagicBe sure to check out PEOPLE’s full CMT Awards coverage to get the latest news on country’s big night.”
“Bentley is set to perform at the awards show, where he’ll hit the stage with Brothers Osborne for a rendition of their hit collaboration “Burning Man.” The single appears on Bentley’s upcoming ninth studio album, The Mountain, which will drop Friday.”
“Dad wore grey pants with a white tee, black denim jacket and distressed combat boots, while Jordan sported a graphic tee, black tulle skirt and black kitten heels.”
“The country star, 42, and his middle child rocked matching outfits when they posed outside of Bridgestone Arena.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Dierks Bentley hit up the 2018 CMT Music Awards in Nashville Wednesday night and brought a very special guest: his 7-year-old daughter Jordan.”


"We'll find a second bus, and I'll put a children's pool, a remote-controlled car, chalk, water balloons and rockets on that bus and launch everything into the air."
In a 2016 interview, he joked, "hangover lasted longer than before." he also revealed that he would take his children on the road when traveling.
"Related video: dilx Bentley launched a clothing line with the national flag and antemberty previously opened to people about his life as a performer has changed the expansion of his family."
"The mainstay of the music city married his wife Cassidy in 2005 with three children: nine year old daughter Evelyn, seven year old Jordan and four year old son Knox."
"Zoom in and out Dierks Bentley and his daughter Jordan | photo source: Jeff Kravitz / filmmagicbe be be be sure to check out people magazine's full coverage of the CMT awards to get the latest news on national night."
Bentley will perform at the awards ceremony, when he and the Osborne brothers will sing their hit co OP "burning man". The single will appear in Bentley's upcoming ninth album mountain, which will be released on Friday
"Dad was wearing grey pants with a white T-shirt, a black denim jacket and worn-out boots, while Jordan was wearing a patterned T-shirt, a black tulle skirt and black kitten heels."
The 42 year old country star and his middle child wore matching clothes when they posed outside the Bridgestone arena
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Dierks Bentley won the 2018 CMT Music Awards in Nashville on Wednesday night, bringing a very special guest: his 7-year-old daughter Jordan."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““When that whole thing was going on, like did you guys ever think about how it would affect my life?” he asks, to which the reality stars admits, “No.””
“...clip to get the scoop on the long-running game.”
“The longtime family friend of the Kardashians was often impersonated by Scott Disick — with the help of Kim, Khloé and Kourtney Kardashian — on Keeping Up with the Kardashians in phone calls that confused the hell out of Kris Jenner.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But in a special PSA for E!”
“News, Kraines warns that being the butt of a joke has haunted him for years.”
““Hi.”
“I’m Todd Kraines and you literally would know me from one thing and one thing only,” he says.”
““In honor of April Fools’ Day, I’m here to bring awareness to the consequences seemingly harmless pranks can have on people’s lives — not just for a day, but forever.”
“So f—– up man.”He adds in the E!”


"When all this happened, did you ever think about how it would affect my life?"? He asked, and reality stars admitted, "No."
“… Editing for exclusive news of long-term competitions. "
"Old friends of the Kardashian family are often confused by Chris Jenner by Scott Disick pretending - with the help of Kim, helo and Courtney Kardashian - to keep in touch with Kardashian on the phone."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But in a special PSA for e!"
"In the news, kleins warned that being a butt joke has been bothering him for years."
"Hi."
He said, "I'm Todd kleins, and you'll only know me from one thing and one thing."
"To commemorate April Fool's day, I'm here to make you realize that seemingly harmless pranks can bring about consequences in people's lives - not just one day, but forever."
He added in E: "so, f-up people!" "



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In Season 3, for example, as we see Arya slowly make her way to the Twins, we’re also witnessing what will eventually become the Red Wedding.”
“That aspect paid off well in the TV series.”
“The first book, “Game of Thrones” has her going from Winterfell to King’s Landing.”
“How the act of movement affects the characters can be clearly seen with Arya Stark, who spends most of her time throughout these books getting from one place to another.”
“The fact that it takes forever for characters to get from one city to another is the device used to instigate events.”
“Readers won’t read passages about the intricacies of travel — how to pitch a camp or how to get food, for example — but a lot of the events of the first three novels revolve around transit.”
“Also Read: HBO Hackers Threaten to Release Data on Sunday From 'Game of Thrones' Leak: 'HBO Is Falling'The “Song of Ice and Fire” books are almost too long thanks in part to how much time Martin puts into traveling.”
“The show diverges from the source material at a certain point in all respects, but tweaking with how the story plays with time and distance only shows that the showrunners and HBO are missing a key theme and a deliberate move by Martin to build tension.”
“Martin’s novels.”
“It also breaks away from George R.R.”


"For example, in the third season, when we saw Aya walking slowly towards the twins, we also witnessed the scene that will eventually become a red wedding."
"This is very popular in TV series."
The first book, the game of thrones, tells her story from winterfall to the landing of the king
"It's clear how actions affect people from one place to another in Arya stark, who spends most of her time in these books."
"It takes a long time for characters to move from one city to another. It's a device used to incite incidents."
"Readers won't read complex passages about travel - how to camp or get food, for example - but many of the events in the first three novels revolve around transportation."
"Read at the same time: HBO hackers threatened to release data leaked from game of Thrones on Sunday:" HBO is falling. "The book" song of ice and fire "is almost too long, partly because of how much time Martin spent traveling."
"The play is different from the raw materials in all aspects, but the adjustment of the story to match the time and distance will only show that the host and HBO have missed a key theme, and Martin's intention to create a tense atmosphere."
"Martin's novel."
"It's out of George R.R., too."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hang on to your hats,” he captioned a photo series of the mom-to-be showing off her bare baby belly while out on a hike.”
“Brolin was arrested in 2004 in the West Los Angeles home he shared at the time with Diane Lane, who phoned police claiming that he had hit her.”
“Ever.”
“Maybe in all 50 years,” he told The New York Times about the incident.”
“After years of relative silence, Josh Brolin is finally speaking out about his 2004 arrest for domestic violence.”
““God, I’ve never been so careful with my words.”
““And there’s no reason for me to be other than there’s no explaining it.”
“Do you know what I mean?”


"Hold on to your hats," he wrote in a group of photos of a mother showing her bare little belly on a hike
"Brolin was arrested at his home in West Los Angeles in 2004 when he lived with Diane Ryan, who called the police and claimed that he had called her."
"Never."
"Maybe in the last 50 years," he told the New York Times
"After years of relative silence, Josh Brolin finally spoke about his arrest for domestic violence in 2004."
"Oh, my God, I've never been so careful."
"I have no reason to do that, just no reason to explain."
"Do you know what I mean?"



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Macaulay Culkin’s brother Rory had WWE’s Paul Heyman officiate his weddingMORE : Turns out Willy Wonka’s Charlie Bucket never acted again after starring in 70s classic...”
“The child actor still gets asked to pull this face (Picture: Twentieth Century Fox)He said: ‘I’m like, “No, been there done that already.”
“Macaulay Culkin may be the star of the childhood classic, Home Alone, but don’t ask to watch it with him because he simply won’t.”
“The former child actor revealed that he can’t watch the iconic movie quite the same as everyone else, and is ‘flattered’ and ‘creeped-out’ when people ask to watch it with him.”
“Speaking on The Ellen Show, the actor confessed: ‘It’s background radiation at Christmas time.”
“I’ve had people who want to watch it with me, which is both flattering and creepy.”
“Don t ask to watch Home Alone with Macaulay it s too creepy Picture Michael Rozman Warner Bros When I m watching it I m remembering that day on the set like how I was hiding my Pepsi behind the couch he explained I can t watch it the same...”
“...way other people do The former child star first rose to fame after his award winning performance in Home Alone back in 1990”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe now 37-year-old actor then went on to star in the film’s sequel – Home Alone 2: Lost in New York – which has become such a festive TV favourite that Macaulay can’t bear to go outside because of it.”
“It’s Macaulay season!”


"More: Macaulay Calkin's brother Rory has WWE's Paul Hyman officiate at his wedding. More: Charlie Booker of Willy Wonka has never played in a classic movie of the 1970s..."
Still asked to pull the face (photo source: 20th Century Fox), the child actor said: "I'm like saying, 'no, I've already done it.'
"Macaulay Calkin may be the star of the childhood classic lonely, but don't ask to watch it with him, because he won't do it at all."
"The former child actor revealed that he can't watch this iconic film like others. When people ask to watch it with him, he will feel" flattered "and" creepy. "
"On the Allen Show, the actor confessed:" this is the background radiation at Christmas. "
"Someone wants to watch it with me. It's both endearing and creepy."
"Don't ask to watch it at home with Macaulay. It's terrible. Michael Rothman Warner Bros. when I watched it, I remember how I hid my Pepsi behind the sofa on the set that day. He explained that I couldn't watch it any more..."
“…… As others did, the former child star became famous for the first time after an award-winning performance at home alone in 1990
"The 37 year old actor then starred in the film sequel, lonely 2: lost in New York, which has become a festive television hit, and Macaulay can't bear to go out."
"It's Macaulay's season!"



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I was hoping to get a hug from her when we came here this morning,' Terry said KATE RECYCLES ANOTHER WINTER WARMERAnother official engagement = another recycled dress coat for Kate, the queen of thrifty chic.”
“...real life princess...”
“Earlier in the day as she greeted crowds outside Newcastle’s Civic Centre she made her way along to a group of school children who had been waiting excitedly all morning for a glimpse of the Royal.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge greeted crowds outside Newcastle’s Civic CentreStockton was the third stop on the Duchess's packed itinerary on her first official visit to the North East.”
“The CRI-run service in Stockton is one of the charity's licensed partners and the focus of this visit was to learn about their work with children living with parental substance misuse and addiction.”
“As a patron of Action on Addiction she was particularly moved to meet families involved in Action on Addiction’s Moving Parents and Children Together (M-PACT) programme.”
“Kate was in Stockton to pay a special visit to The Stockton Recovery Service which supports people aged 18 and over who are adicted to drugs.”
“'She’s absolutely beautiful - she really is fantastic,' gushed Diane Holder, 64, from Ingleby Barwick, 'She has beautiful hair - she is just a beautiful woman!'”
“...beaming smile on her face...”
“Write caption here Hundreds of well wishers lined the streets waving Union Jack flags to welcome the Duchess And the hundreds of people who waited patiently behind the barriers to catch a glimpse of the princess were not left disappointed as Kate worked her way down the line with a...”


"When we came here this morning, I wanted to get her hug," Terry said, as Kate recycled another warm winter suit and another official engagement dress for the frugal fashion queen
“… Real life Princess... "
"Earlier in the day, as she met the crowd outside the Newcastle Civic Center, she walked to a group of schoolchildren who had been waiting excitedly for a glimpse of the royal family all morning."
"The Duchess of Cambridge greets the crowd outside Newcastle Civic Center, the third stop of her first official visit to the northeast."
"CRI services in Stockton is one of the authorized partners of the charity, and the focus of this visit is to learn about their cooperation with their parents' drug abusers and addicted children."
"As a sponsor of the drug rehabilitation program, she was particularly moved to meet with the families involved in the m-pact program."
"Kate made a special visit to Stockton rehabilitation service center in Stockton, which provides support to drug users aged 18 and above."
Diane holder, 64, from ingby Barwick, gushes: "she's absolutely beautiful - she's amazing, she has beautiful hair - she's a beautiful woman!"
“… She has a smile on her face... "
"Here, hundreds of benefactors waved flags on both sides of the street to welcome the Duchess. Hundreds of people patiently stood behind the fence waiting to have a look at the princess. When Kate was carrying a..."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is unclear what Harington was doing in New York at the time of the bar incident.”
“According to one eyewitness, Harington was booted out of the bar and left, but then came back in and had to be physically dragged out into the cold by bouncers, TMZ reported.”
“The video, shot Friday night in Barfly, a cozy dive bar in the otherwise upscale Gramercy Park neighborhood, shows the actor who plays Jon Snow arguing with bouncers and patrons.”
“The context of the dispute is unclear, but 31-year-old Harington appears at points to be attempting to locate his coat and belongings in a manner disruptive to the other revelers.”
“His leading-man charm didn't appear to impress one young lady, who tartly tells him 'Say excuse me' as he tries to jostle past her.”
“Kit Harington as Jon Snow is seen with Emilia Clarke as Daenerys Targaryen in Game of Thrones.”
“The show's stars are among the highest paid in televisionHarington leans over the pool table in the crowded neighborhood pub and yells unintelligibly.”
“Bouncers and patrons are seen reeling him back as he strugglesThe bar has only one pool table, squeezed into cramped quarters outside the restrooms.”
“Representatives for Harington did not immediately respond to a message seeking comment.”
“They were previously believed to be on the house hunt in New York, but instead settled on a medieval 15th century timber home in the English countryside.”


"It's not clear what Harrington was doing in New York at the time of the bar incident."
Harrington was kicked out of the bar and left, but then returned to the bar and had to be dragged into the cold by bodyguards, according to a witness, TMZ reported
"This video was shot on Friday night at barfly, a comfortable diving bar in the upscale community of Gramsci park. The actor who plays Jon Snow quarrels with bodyguards and customers."
"The context of the dispute is unclear, but Harrington, 31, seems to be trying to find his coat and belongings in a way that destroys other revelers."
"The charm of his hero didn't seem to move a young lady. When he tried to squeeze past her, she said to him sharply," I'm sorry. "
"Kit Harrington as Jon Snow and Amelia Clark as Denise tangorian in the game of Thrones."
"The stars of the show are among the highest paid in the TV world. Harrington leaned against the billiards table in the crowded neighborhood bar and cried out for no reason
As he struggled, bodyguards and customers dragged him back. The bar has only one billiard table and is crowded in a small room outside the bathroom
"Representatives from Harrington did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
They used to be thought to be looking for a house in New York, but later settled in a medieval 15th century wooden house in rural England



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The script has been written by Michael Werwie and is thought to explore the crimes of the killer through the eyes of Bundy's girlfriend.”
“Alexandra held on to the pink leash of the grey pitbull mix, who kept company with her own precious puppy, Levon.”
“And on Wednesday, Zac Efron, 30, and Alexandra Daddario, 32, added fuel to the dating flames as the two were spotted visiting a neighborhood pet store in Los Feliz.”
“The rumored couple were all smiles as they browsed through the dog toys with their two pets in tow.”
“Puppy love: Zac Efron and Alexandra Daddario fuel dating rumors as the two visit a neighborhood pet store in Los FelizZac dressed casually for the outing, clad in a black cotton Alternative Apparel shirt and dark green pants.”
“He kept his black sunglasses on inside the store and looked undercover in his olive green hat with the number three displayed on the front.”
“The Greatest Showman actor also added a couple of colorful bracelets on his wrists.”
“On the hunt The pair looked every part the happy couple as they looked at dog toys and held on tightly to their two pets Man s best friend In 2016 Zac mourned the death of his precious pooch Puppy but it seems the actor has since adopted a pitbull...”
“...mix Alexandra was ready to play with the precious dogs in a black and white striped sweater with red trim around the wrists...”
“She showed off her enviably long legs in black workout pants and sported a pair of pink and grey lace-up sneakers.”


"The script was written by Michael weaver and is believed to explore the murderer's crimes through Bondi's girlfriend's eyes."
Alexandra holds on to the pink belt of the grey Bulldog mix, which accompanies her precious little dog, Levin
Zac Efron, 30, and Alexandra dadario, 32, were found shopping at a pet store near Los Feliz on Wednesday, adding fuel to their date
"It's said that the couple with two pets are browsing in the dog toy room, smiling."
"Puppy love: Zac Efron and Alexandra dadario will meet. It is rumored that when they visit a nearby pet shop in felizac, Los Angeles, they are wearing casual travel clothes, black cotton alternative shirt and dark green pants."
"He has been wearing black sunglasses in the shop, wearing an olive green hat as an undercover, and the front of the hat is No. 3."
"The greatest performer also added a few colorful bracelets to his wrist."
"During the hunting, the happy couple looked at the dog toys and held their two pets tightly. In 2016, the man's best friend Zach mourned the death of his precious little dog, but it seems that the actor later adopted a Bulldog... "
“… Mix Alexandra ready with precious dog wrists in a black and white striped sweater with red trim
"She's wearing black sweatpants, showing off her enviable long legs, and a pair of pink and gray lace up sneakers."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...having locked lips with 30 women girls...”
“Suddenly it was like a scene from Braveheart where the Scottish and the English just start charging at each other RELATED VIDEO Andrew Garfield on His Sexuality I Have an Openness to Any Impulses That May Arise Garfield said everyone at the party started kissing and he ended the night...”
““It was about 50 young boys and girls on separate sides of this garden and no parental supervision.”
““The rest is history,” he said.”
“There’s all these longings and all these stirrings—and we’re terrified of each other, all of us.”Image zoom Andrew Garfield | Credit: Jenny Anderson/GettyThe Angels in America actor, 34, said his life was “changed” when a female classmate had a party at her house one weekend.”
““None of us know what we’re doing.”
“You remember it,” he said.”
“All we know is that we need it, we want it, and there are these unnamable desires that are coming up, right?”
““We have no framework of how to deal with the opposite sex—or the same sex.”
““As the hormone monster came into my life I went to a co-ed school.”Garfield said that just as his “hormone monster” started raging, he transferred to a co-ed school where he was faced with his sexual desires for the first time.”


“… And 30 women, lips locked... "
"All of a sudden, like a scene in brave heart, Scots and Englishmen start to blame each other. Related video Andrew Garfield talks about his sexual orientation. I'm open to any possible impulse. Garfield says that everyone at the party starts kissing and he ends the night..."
"There are about 50 boys and girls on both sides of the garden, without parental supervision."
"The rest is history," he said
"There's so much desire, so much excitement, we're scared of each other, all of us." Image zooming Andrew Garfield | source: Jenny Anderson / gettythe angels in America, 34, said that one weekend, a schoolgirl had a party at her home, and his life "changed."
"None of us knows what we're doing."
"You remember," he said
"All we know is that we need it, we want it, and these unspeakable desires are coming, right?"
"We don't have a framework for how to treat the opposite sex or the same sex."
"When hormonal monsters came into my life, I went to a coeducation." Just as his "hormonal monster" began to rage, Garfield said, he moved to a coeducation where he faced his sexuality for the first time



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No; she was executed, and then everything was back to bad-normal.”
“Oprah is in exile.”
“Her husband confronts her captor in Canada.”
“She delivers her own baby.”
“Even though people died to help her escape at the beginning of the season, she’s determined now to stay in Gilead, because I guess Season 3 has to be about something.”
“One read is that there’s no escaping the suffocation of a subjugating regime.”
“Except within the show, there actually is escaping it — and yet June has decided not to.”
“Season 2 has been dutifully brutal, complete with ample torture, rapes, executions and murders.”
“It gave in to every one of the show’s most tedious instincts, substituting slow stares and endless montage sequences for any actual development or new interiority.”
“Every inch of existence is awful.”


"No, she was executed, and then everything went back to normal."
"Oprah is in exile."
"Her husband confronted her kidnappers in Canada."
"She had children of her own."
"Although people died at the beginning of the season to help her escape, she is determined to stay at Gilead now because I think there will be something in the third season."
"One interpretation is that there is no escape from the suffocation of the regime of subjugation."
"Except in the show, there's actually an escape from it - but June has decided not to."
"The second season is due diligence and cruelty, full of torture, rape, execution and murder."
"It succumbs to every dullest instinct in the play, replacing any actual development or new interior with a slow gaze and endless montage shots."
"Every inch of being is terrible."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her new husband, Prince Harry, also had some stunning words to say about his beautiful bride.”
“Next: Prince Harry’s sweet wordsA smitten pairThe couple makes the perfect teamMarkle wasn’t the only one to make a speech.”
“Markle also chose to speak at her wedding reception, something that is traditionally underheard of when it comes to British weddings and royal weddings in particular.”
“The bishop gave a rousing 14-minute long sermon on the power of love.”
“The Duchess of Sussex asked Bishop Michael Curry, the first African American leader of the Episcopal Church, to speak at her wedding.”
“It was clear from her wedding day that she was more than ready to do just that.”
“The mix-raced, former actress is determined to forge her own unique path into the British royal family.”
“Breaking protocolTheir celebration was modern and inclusiveIt’s been evident since their engagement that Markle has no interest in being a traditional royal.”
“Next: Meghan Markle is determined to do her own thing.”
“It was said to have been the perfect blend of the duke and duchess’ personalities.”


"Her new husband Prince Harry also said some amazing things to his beautiful bride."
"Next: Prince Harry's sweet words. The couple are a perfect team. Marcel is not the only one to give a speech."
"Marcel also chose to speak at her wedding banquet, which is rarely heard of in tradition, especially at British weddings and royal weddings."
"The Bishop gave an inspiring 14 minute sermon on the power of love."
The Duchess of Sussex asked bishop Michael curry, the first African American leader of the Anglican Church, to address her wedding
"It was clear from the day she got married that she was ready."
"The mixed race is competing, and the former actress is determined to create her own unique path into the British royal family."
"Breaking the agreement, their celebration was modern and inclusive. Obviously, since their engagement, markel has no interest in becoming a traditional member of the royal family
"Next step: Megan markel is determined to do her own thing."
"It's said to be a perfect combination of the character of the Duke and Duchess."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Regarding her suit, the claims are without merit.”Abraham reached a settlement with Viacom in March.”
“Those guys were chiming in and being friendly, but I don’t know.”
“After announcing that she was “moving on” from Teen Mom OG in January, MTV announced Thursday that Abraham has joined the cast of Ex on the Beach.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“As the reality star looks for love on the dating show, she’ll also be joined by her ex-boyfriend Simon Saran.”
“In a brief teaser released by MTV for the show s upcoming second season Abraham 27 can angrily be seen asking a man off camera Are you okay The new season of series which will premiere on Dec 20 will also star a few other familiar faces including The Bachelorette...”
“...s Chad Johnson as well as The Challenge stars Angels Babicz Jozea Flores and Nicole Ramos and their exes of course...”
“Image zoom Farrah Abraham and Simon Saran | Credit: David Livingston/GettyThe MTV personality had an on-again, off-again relationship with Saran for more than two years before calling it quits in 2017.”
“During one of her and Saran’s breaks, Abraham enlisted Million Dollar Matchmaker‘s Patti Stanger to help her find the one, but came up empty handed.”
““It didn’t go so well.”


"With regard to her lawsuit, the claim is worthless." Abraham reconciled with Viacom in March
"Those guys cut in. They're friendly, but I don't know."
After announcing in January that she would "move" from her teenage mother og, MTV announced on Thursday that Abraham had joined the cast of ex on the beach
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When the reality star looks for love on a blind date show, her ex boyfriend Simon saran will join her."
"In a short tease MTV released for the upcoming second season, you can see Abraham 27 angrily asking a man in the camera, are you ok? The new series, which will premiere on December 20, will also star in other familiar faces, including bachelors.... "
“…… Chad Johnson and challenge star angels Babitz Josiah Flores and Nicole Ramos, and of course their predecessors... "
"Photo zoom Farrah Abraham and Simon saran | photo source: David Livingston / gettythe MTV character and saran had more than two years of off and on relationship, until the announcement of the breakup in 2017."
"During a break with Saran, Abraham hired a million dollar matchmaker, Patty stanger, to help her find the man, but he came back empty handed."
"Not very well."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stranger Things season 2 will premiere on Netflix on October 27, 2017.”
“...and now we know the context...”
“Why does she have a perm?”
“And why did she look so angry in the latest trailer for Stranger Things season 2?”
“These are all questions that will likely be answered when Netflix s 80s inspired hit returns in late October I m mostly curious about the perm but you find out the answer to the first question in this new clip which was released at the U K s MCM Comic...”
“Con...”
“Introduced by a p0st perm Millie Bobby Brown the new clip from the second season of Stranger Things depicts a confused pre perm Eleven as she uses her powers to escape from the Upside Down which is where she presumably landed after exploding the Demagorgon and saving the town of...”
“Hawkins Indiana in the season 1 finale...”
“Watch the New Stranger Things Season 2 ClipHere we go!”
“@milliebbrown introduces world exclusive, never before seen footage from @Stranger_Things 2!”


The second season of strange things will premiere on Netflix on October 27, 2017
“… Now we know the context... "
"Why does she have a perm?"
"Why does she look so angry in the trailer for the latest Season 2 of strangers?"
"All of these questions are likely to be answered when Netflix's' 80s hit returns in late October. I'm curious about perms, but you can find the answer to the first question in this new clip released by MCM comics in the UK... "
“Con…”
"Introduced by a p0st perm Millie boby brown, the new clip of the second season of strange things depicts a perplexed 11 people before perm. She uses her own strength to escape from upside down. This is probably the place where she landed after blowing up demagogon and saving the town..."
"Hawkins Indiana in the last episode of season one..."
"Look at the new stranger's stuff season two, let's go!"
"@ millibbrown introduces the world's exclusive, never seen footage from @ stranger's thing 2!"



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The documents state: "The Constitution and the federal rules of criminal procedure protect [Bankston’s] right to be prosecuted in the federal judicial district where the alleged crimes occurred, rather than in a district convenient to the government or its celebrity complaining witnesses.””
“Bankston’s motion filing comes as her defence says she has the right to be prosecuted where the alleged crimes took place, rather than in California, where the ‘Keeping Up with the Kardashians’ stars live.”
“It is unknown at the time of writing if Kourtney, 38, is one of the two unnamed family members from the 2016 filing, or if the accusations are completely new.”
“News, the motion includes fresh accusations against Bankson, alleging that also in 2014, she obtained the username, password and security answers for Kris’ daughter Kourtney's AOL account and gained access to her emails.”
“Bankston’s public defenders have now filed a motion to have eight of the 15 counts against her dismissed, and according to E!”
“In 2016, a woman named Christina Elizabeth Bankston was accused of cyberstalking the 62-year-old reality star and hacking her iCloud account two years earlier, where she allegedly sent threatening messages to her, her former spouse Caitlyn Jenner, two unnamed family members and two assistants.”
“Kris Jenner’s alleged online stalker has been accused of hacking her daughter Kourtney Kardashian.”


"The Constitution and the federal rules of criminal procedure protect the right of [Bankston] to be prosecuted in the federal judicial district where the alleged crime took place, rather than in the district where the government or its celebrities complain about the convenience of witnesses," the documents said
"At the time of Bankston's motion, her defense lawyer said that she had the right to be prosecuted in the place where the suspected crime occurred, not in California, where the" keep up with Kardashian "stars live."
"At the time of writing, it is not clear whether the 38 year old Courtney was one of the two unnamed family members submitted in 2016, or whether the charges are entirely new."
"News, the motion includes new charges against Bankson, claiming that also in 2014, she obtained the user name, password and security answer of Chris's daughter Courtney's AOL account, and obtained access to her email."
"The public defender of Bankston has now moved a motion to dismiss eight of her 15 charges, and according to e!"
"In 2016, a woman named Christina Elizabeth Bankston was accused of tracking the 62 year old reality TV star on the Internet and hacking into her icloud account two years ago. She is said to have made a charge against her and her ex spouse Caitlyn Jenner, two unnamed family members and two assistants sent threat messages
"Chris Jenner's so-called Internet tracker is accused of eavesdropping on his daughter, Courtney Kardashian."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even if you think you're not producing enough milk, it's important to have your child’s pediatrician help you gauge how your baby is growing to see whether or not they’re actually getting the milk they need, Dr. Meek says.”
“If you’re having any difficulties with your milk supply, it’s a good idea to talk to your child’s pediatrician as well as a breastfeeding expert.”
“But now, Bella revealed that she eventually struggled to produce as much milk as she used to.”
““My breast milk’s taken a huge dip,” she said at a breastfeeding support group, as seen in a sneak peek from Wednesday’s episode of Total Divas.”
““I used to have enough where I donate.”
“And now I’ve realized in the last month that I can’t even keep up with her during the day so I’ve had to introduce one bottle of formula a day," she continued.”
“I m trying to pump and do all this stuff but it s the stress I hate pumping to the point it makes me feel bad when I m doing it because I m so miserable Bella also said in the clip that she struggled with mom guilt over her...”
“...milk production adding that it s the worst feeling in the world I thought pumping could balance Birdie and my job but it s not working she said...”
““It’s weird how you just constantly feel like you’re failing.”Your breast milk usually works on a "supply and demand" schedule.”
“So if there's less demand, the supply will go down as well.”


"Even if you think you're not producing enough milk, it's important for your child's pediatrician to help you measure your baby's growth and see if they're really getting the milk they need," Dr. meek said
"If you have any problems with your milk supply, it's best to talk to your child's pediatrician and breastfeeding specialist."
"But now, Bella reveals, it's hard for her to produce as much milk as before in the end."
"My breast milk is down a lot," she told a breastfeeding support group, as can be seen from a peek in total queen on Wednesday
"I used to donate enough."
"I realized last month that I couldn't even keep up with her during the day, so I had to introduce a bottle of formula every day," she added
"I try to smoke, do these things, but it's pressure, I hate to smoke, which makes me feel very sad, because I'm so miserable. Bella also said that she struggled with her mother and felt sorry for her..."
“… Milk production added that it was the worst feeling in the world, and I thought pumping would balance the bird and my work, but it didn't work, she said
"It's strange that you always feel like you've failed." Your breast milk usually works on a "supply and demand" schedule
"So if there is less demand, there will be less supply."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Khloe Kardashian Goes Glam in Latest Baby Bump Pic: '29 Weeks and Counting'Khloe Kardashian Says She Considered Surrogacy Before Getting PregnantPregnant Khloe Kardashian Gushes Over How She Knew Tristan Thompson Was 'The One'”
“"We're both not very needy when it comes to this kind of stuff, so we're just going to go to my mom's and have a couples' dinner with my family.”
“The 33-year-old reality star, who is pregnant with her first child, reminisced on her and Thompson's "magical" first kiss on her app on Wednesday.”
“"I was so nervous.”
“I liked Tristan so much," Kardashian began.”
“"It was after a night of us hanging out and we were with a bunch of friends at one of their houses.”
“We were all drinking and telling stories and just enjoying each other's company."”
“"I forget what led up to that moment, but I do remember that we both started kissing in the kitchen -- in front of everyone.”
“I think we were really passionate, so we made everybody a little uncomfortable, LOL!"”
“...she wrote.”


"Related content: Khloe Kardashian Kardashian said in a new picture of a baby lump:" 29 weeks, counting. "Kardashian said she had considered surrogacy before she became pregnant. Kardashian talked endlessly about how she knew Tristan Thompson was" that person. "
"In this kind of thing, we don't really need it, so we went to mom's house and had a couple's dinner with our family."
The 33 year old reality star, who is pregnant with her first child, recalled her "magic" first kiss with Thompson on her app on Wednesday
"I'm so nervous."
"I like Tristan so much," Kardashian began
"That was after we had a night together, we were in one of their houses with a group of friends."
"We're all drinking, telling stories, just enjoying each other's company."
"I forgot what caused that moment, but I do remember that we all started kissing in the kitchen - in front of everyone."
"I think we are really enthusiastic, so we make everyone a little uncomfortable, ha ha!"
“…… She wrote



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just like to get them for free.””
““I don’t like to pay for [drugs].”
““I just like smoking weed and whatever other drug comes my way,” He said.”
“In an interview with Pitchfork, the rapper said he never took prescriptions for depression but enjoyed taking drugs.”
“...driven emo was recently held in Long Beach New York featuring speakers and a public gathering...”
“Another supposedly read He passed the fuck out my brother called and I tried to get him to say hi to my brother but he wouldn t wake up A memorial for the rapper who blended hip hop with guitar...”
““GBC [Lil Peep] high af because of me and my friend lol,” read one allegedly.”
“The authorities said they were investigating text messages sent by a woman who’d visited Peep’s tour bus before his death.”
“Local authorities speculated that the circumstances around the rapper’s death were “suspicious,” though at the time the Tucson police department was under the assumption his death was caused by a combination of Xanax and other drugs.”
“He was 21.”


"I just want to get it for free."
"I don't like to pay for it."
"I just like to smoke marijuana and any other drugs," he said
"In an interview with pitchfork, the rapper said he had never prescribed depression, but he liked to take drugs."
“… "Emo" was recently held in Long Beach, New York, with speakers and a public gathering
"The other one is said to have read that he had spread the damn news. My brother called. I wanted him to say hello to my brother, but he refused to wake up a monument to a rapper who combines hip-hop and guitar..."
"GBC [lil peep] is high AF because of me and my friend lol," it is said
"Authorities say they are investigating a text message sent by a woman who visited Pip's tour bus before he died."
The local government speculated that the death of the rapper was "suspicious", although Tucson police believed that his death was caused by a mixture of Kazakh medicine and other drugs
"He was 21."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET on E!”
““Mr.”
““I was in the middle of my second movie for his company, and I get assaulted,” she says in the first look at E!’s Citizen Rose.”
““And I decided not to stay silent.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Golden Globes coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
“Image zoom Rose McGowan | Credit: AP/Shutterstock“I knew others were out there, and I knew it was a lot of us,” she adds.”
“The New York Times reported that McGowan was part of a settlement with Weinstein in 1997 following an encounter in a hotel room during the Sundance Film Festival.”
“The $100,000 payout was “not to be construed as an admission” by Weinstein, but intended to “avoid litigation and buy peace,” according to a legal document reportedly reviewed by the NYT.”
“Over 50 women have now accused Weinstein of sexual misconduct since The Times and The New Yorker documented decades of allegations in investigative stories published in October.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Rose McGowan Speaks Out Against Stars Wearing Black at the Golden GlobesIn a statement to PEOPLE, Weinstein’s attorneys have denied any allegations of sexual assault.”


"Wait!"
"Sir."
"I'm making a second film for his company and I'm under attack," she said at first sight! His citizens stood up
"I decided not to remain silent." Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of the Golden Globes and get the latest news on Hollywood night."
"Image zoom rose McGowan | image source: AP / shutterstock," she added, "I know other people are there, I know a lot of us are there."
"According to the New York Times, in 1997, during the Sundance Film Festival, McGovern met Weinstein in a hotel room, and then McGovern and Weinstein reached a settlement."
According to reports, a legal document reviewed by the New York Times said that the $100000 compensation "should not be understood by Weinstein as recognition", but to "avoid litigation and strive for peace"
"More than 50 women have now accused Weinstein of sexual misconduct since the times and the new Yorker documented decades of allegations in their October investigative reports."
"Related video: Rose McGovern publicly opposes the star in black at the Golden Globe Awards. In a statement to people, Weinstein's lawyer denied any sexual assault charges."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Drake told me that he has read great things about me and appreciates how hard I’ve worked through so many trials and decided to give me $50K for my tuition.””
““This was the surprise the whole time,” James wrote on Instagram.”
“...of scholarships...”
“RELATED New Drake Song God s Plan Breaks Single Day Streaming Record On Spotify Apple Music James explained that she had submitted her story to various scholarships last year and that she was contacted over the weekend about doing a video to talk about her personal story and the importance...”
“Later that day, he surprised University of Miami student Destiny James with $50,000 toward her tuition.”
“First he gave $25,000 and a collection of OVO-designed school uniforms to Miami Senior High School.”
“On Monday, Drake also spent his day giving away even more of his money.”
“According to Deza, the rumour among the shoppers and employees at the store was that the giveaway was part of the upcoming music video for Drake’s song “God’s Plan”.”
“Cameras were being set up so we were all wondering what was to happen.”In total, the 31-year-old gave away $50,000 in groceries to the customers at the store.”
“News, “No one knew he was coming at all, we just came to do groceries.”


"Drake told me that he read a lot of good things about me, and thanks to my efforts in so many tests, he decided to give me $50000 for tuition."
"It's always been a surprise," James wrote on instagram
“… Scholarship... "
"The related new Drake song god plan broke Spotify Apple Music's one-day streaming record. James explained that she had submitted her story to various scholarships last year and contacted her at the weekend to make a video to talk about her personal story and importance..."
"Later that day, he surprised destiny James, a student at the University of Miami, with $50000 in tuition."
"First of all, he donated $25000 and a batch of uniforms designed by ovo to Miami high school."
On Monday, Drake also spent a day donating more money
According to diza, there are rumors among shoppers and employees in the store that the gift is part of the upcoming music video of Drake's song "plan for God."
"The cameras are installed, so we all want to know what's going to happen." The 31 year old presented a total of $50000 in groceries to customers in the store
"News," no one knows he's coming. We're just here to make groceries. "



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...look at my mind," she wrote along with a lightbulb emoji and a lightning bolt.”
“"I thought u into my life woah !”
“...social media after it was announced he proposed to Ariana Grande just weeks after the pair started dating...”
“The Saturday Night Live star is believed to have forked out almost $100,000 for the pop singer's pear-shaped ring.”
“Before getting with Ariana, comedian and actor Pete had been dating Cazzie David for two years.”
“Seemingly reacting to the shock news, Cazzie - who is Larry David's daughter - shared a picture of herself with a huge glass of red wine after spending the day drinking at South Africa's Franschhoek Wine Valley.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Getty Images North America)"Came to wine country a person, leaving a human bottle of wine," she wrote.”
“One of her followers quickly responded with some pearls of wisdom: "You will bounce back sis keep ya head up xoxoxox sending you lots of love and positivity enjoy your summer and wine."”
“Just after Pete and Ariana went public with their relationship, Cazzie also seemingly reacted on social media.”
“"Been in Africa, what'd I miss?"”


"Look at my brain," she wrote with a light bulb expression and lightning
"I thought you were in my life!"
“… Social media announced that he proposed to Ariana Grande a few weeks after they started dating... "
"The Saturday night live star is believed to have spent nearly $100000 on the pop singer's pear shaped ring."
"Before going out with Ariana, comedian Pete had been going out with Katie David for two years."
Katie, the daughter of Larry David, seems to have responded to the shocking news by sharing a picture of herself drinking a large glass of red wine after a day in the wine valley of South Africa
"(photo: instagram) (photo: Getty Images North America)" a man came to the land of wine and left a bottle of human wine, "she wrote
One of her followers quickly responded with the Pearl of wisdom: "you'll cheer up, sister, let you hold your head high, XOX gives you a lot of love and enthusiasm, enjoy your summer and wine."
"Just after Pitt and Ariana's public love affair, Kazi seems to have reacted on social media as well."
"I've been to Africa. What did I miss?"



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After five years of marriage, Williams filed for divorce in April 2017.”
“They first met while Williams was working as a teacher in New York.”
“At the time, they had been dating for over five years.”
“Williams wed Drake-Lee, a real estate broker, in Los Angeles in September 2012.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“(Communicating via text message or phone is permitted “in the event of an emergency,” according to the order.)”
“...the children involved...”
“Image zoom Credit Stefanie Keenan Getty Aryn Drake Lee and Jesse Williams The documents also states that Williams and Drake Lee are to communicate exclusively through OurFamilyWizard which is a website designed to facilitate communications between divorced or separated parents in order to remove conflict and improve the lives of...”
“Williams and Drake-Lee will alternate custody of the kids for major holidays, such as Thanksgiving, Easter Sunday and the Fourth of July.”


"After five years of marriage, Williams filed for divorce in April 2017."
"The first time they met was when Williams was a teacher in New York."
"At that time, they had been dating for more than five years."
Williams married real estate agent Drake Lee in Los Angeles in September 2012
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
(according to the order, "in case of emergency" is allowed to communicate by SMS or telephone.)
“… The child involved in the case... "
"The Stefanie Keenan Getty Aryn Drake Lee and Jesse Williams documents also stipulate that Williams and Drake Lee will communicate exclusively through our family guide, a website designed to promote communication between divorced or separated parents in order to eliminate conflicts and improve their lives..."
Williams and Drake Lee will take turns looking after the children on important festivals such as Thanksgiving, Easter and July 4



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even Judd Apatow, whose TV series Girls was constantly at the vanguard of important conversations surrounding feminism throughout its five-year-run, doesn’t call himself a “feminist”.”
“It's very exciting.”
“However, despite stratospheric sporting and entrepreneurial successes and being a fierce advocate for equal pay in her industry, Venus Williams does not identify as a “feminist”, at least not in the lexical sense.”
“In an interview with Elle UK, the 37-year-old was eager to distinguish herself from the term: “I don’t like labels, though I do think as women we have much more power and opportunities in our hands than ever before.”
“(ELLE UK/ Jamel Shabazz/ Patrick Waugh (ELLE UK/ Jamel Shabazz/ Patrick Waugh)“We truly don't know how powerful we are.”
“There's nothing like a powerful woman walking into a room; her presence is like nothing else."”
“The seven-time-grand-slam winner went on to laud the powerful women she sees in sport today.”
““There are so many emerging forces,” she said, “there's been so much growth for women in sports.”
““You have to be able to stand up for what you believe in and I think I've done a good job.”
“Some abhor it as "old-fashioned" while others choose to identify with what they perceive to be less loaded terms, opting for the "humanist" moniker, which funnily enough has nothing to do with equality at all and is actually a Renaissance philosophy that advocates human agency over supernatural superstitions.”


Even Judd Apatow's TV series "girls" has been a pioneer on the important topic of feminism during its five years of broadcasting, and he does not call himself a "feminist"
"It's very exciting."
However, despite her great success in sports and entrepreneurship, and her strong advocacy of equal pay for equal work in the same industry, Venus Williams does not agree that she is a "feminist", at least in the lexical sense
In an interview with Elle UK, the 37 year old woman is eager to stand out from the word: "I don't like labels, but I do think that as women, we have more power and opportunities than ever before."
"(Elle UK / JAMEL Shabazz / Patrick Waugh) (Elle UK / JAMEL Shabazz / Patrick Waugh)" we really don't know how strong we are. "
"There is nothing like a powerful woman walking into a room; her presence is different from anything else."
"The seven time Grand Slam winner went on to praise the powerful women she saw in sports today."
"There are so many emerging forces," she said, "and women are growing so fast in sports."
"You have to be able to stick to your beliefs, and I think I'm doing well."
"Some people detest that it is' out of date ', while others choose to agree with the term that they think is not so heavy, and choose the nickname of' Humanist '. Interestingly, this nickname has nothing to do with equality. In fact, it is a Renaissance philosophy, which advocates that human initiative is superior to supernatural superstition."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She didn’t have as much time for her as Meghan would have liked.”
“But, equally understandably, Kate was busy.”
“He knew Harry was already head-over-heels for the US actress but wanted him to take it slowly.”
“Once she’d returned home to Canada, William reportedly sat Harry down for a chat, meant as brotherly advice.”
“The first hint of friction came after William was introduced to Meghan, 37, when she was staying at Kensington Palace.”
“But they always turned to each other when times were tough.”
“And their teasing about everything from who’s the most bald to the better soldier has always been rife.”
“William, 36, was said to be furious with Harry, 34, for getting caught on camera stripping in a Las Vegas hotel room six years ago.”
““He will brook absolutely no criticism of Meghan — and he is so sensitive he often sees criticism or negativity where there isn’t any.”Of course, like any family, the brothers have locked horns before.”
“This is his way of atoning,” a source told The Sun.”


"She didn't have as much time for Megan as she wanted."
"But it's also understandable that Kate is busy."
"He knows that Harry has coveted the American actress, but he wants him to take his time."
It is reported that when William returned to Canada, he sat down and chatted with Harry, meaning brotherly advice
"After William was introduced to 37 year old Meghan at Kensington Palace, there was the first sign of friction."
"But in difficult times, they always turn to each other for help."
"Their ridicule of soldiers from the baldest to the better has always been common."
"William, 36, is said to be furious with Harry, 34, because he was photographed undressing in a hotel room in Las Vegas six years ago."
"He will never tolerate criticism of Megan - and he is very sensitive and often sees criticism or negation where there is no criticism or negation." Of course, like any family, the brothers have quarreled before. "
"It's his way of atoning," a source told the sun



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Declaring on June 16 that they were assessing the allegations, NBC has not announced whether Hardwick will be back for more of The Wall later this year.”
“The details were indicative of the now married Hardwick, who announced online his break-up with Dykstra in 2014.”
““Following a comprehensive assessment by AMC, working with Ivy Kagan Bierman of the firm Loeb & Loeb, who has considerable experience in this area, Chris Hardwick will return to AMC as the host of Talking Dead and Talking with Chris Hardwick,” the cabler said in a statement Wednesday.”
“We take these matters very seriously and given the information available to us after a very careful review including interviews with numerous individuals we believe returning Chris to work is the appropriate step With AMC taking the stage at TCA on July 29 the timing is obviously somewhat directed to...”
“...clearing the slate for the cabler so its annual Hall H session would not turn into a one issue discussion...”
“The plan is for Hardwick to be back on Talking Dead for its August 12 premiere, right after the Season 4 mid-season debut of Fear The Walking Dead.”
“Frequent Talking Dead participant and Hardwick’s SDCC panel replacement Yvette Nicole Brown will still front the previously set TWD Season 9 preview special August 5 and appear as a guest on Talking Dead the following week.”
“No return date for Season 2 of Talking With Chris Hardwick has been set yet due to scheduling issues, I hear.”
“All episodes are already in the can.”
“Deadline revealed July 4 that Community actor Brown would be taking over Hardwick’s SDCC duties.”


"NBC announced on June 16 that they were evaluating the charges, but did not announce whether hadwick would return to Wall Street later this year."
"These details show that hadwick, who is now married, announced on the Internet in 2014 that he broke up with Dykstra."
"After AMC's comprehensive assessment and working with ivy Kagan Bierman of Loeb & Loeb, Chris Hardwick will return to AMC as the host of talk to death and talk to Chris Hardwick," a cable reporter said in a statement on Wednesday
"We take these issues very seriously, and considering the information provided to us after a very careful review (including interviews with many people), we think that getting Chris back to work is an appropriate step for AMC to step onto the TCA stage on July 29, and the time obviously points to..."
“… Clean up the list of cable TV companies so that their annual hall h meeting will not become a single issue discussion... "
"Our plan is that after the premiere of fear of the walking dead in the middle of the fourth quarter, Hardwick will start talking about death again at the premiere on August 12."
"It's often said that participants of the dead and hadwick's Sdcc panel replace Yvette Nicole Brown will still be set before the season 9 preview of TWD special on August 5, and will appear as a guest to talk about the dead next week."
"Due to the schedule, I heard that the return date of the second season of talk to Chris hadwick has not been set yet."
"All the episodes are already in the jar."
"The deadline shows that on July 4, community actor Brown will take over the Sdcc responsibilities of hadwick."



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He loves spending time with her.”Mary 21, 2018: "I'm Not Single"In a very awkward moment, Katy confirmed she was no longer single on an episode of American Idol.”
“Orlando always had the nicest things to say about Katy.”
“The couple spared no expense dressing in realistic prosthetics, with Katy rocking a red pantsuit.”
“October 31, 2016: Couple's CostumeIn the spirit of the 2016 presidential election, Katy and Orlando took their relationship to the next level by dressing as Hillary and Bill Clinton for a star-studded Halloween party.”
“Katy seemed unbothered by her boyfriend baring it all behind her.”
“The best part?”
“Not only did they ride a paddleboard together in the Mediterranean, but Bloom paddled completely naked.”
“August 4, 2016: Those Paddleboarding PicsThe paparazzi pictures of their Italian holiday in the summer of 2016 will probably live in infamy.”
“The duo was in Cannes, France together for the Cannes Film Festival and Katy shared a snap of the two dressed in robes, lying on the grand stairs outside a mansion with the clever caption, "we cannes't."”
“May 20, 2016: Instagram OfficialThe American Idol judge finally confirmed her relationship with Bloom by posting a photo of the pair on Instagram.”


"He likes to be with her." On August 21, 2018, Mary: "I'm not single." at a very embarrassing moment, Katie confirmed in an episode of "American Idol" that she is no longer single
"Orlando always says good things to Katie."
"The couple went to great lengths to put on realistic prosthetics, and Katie was wearing a pair of red trousers."
"October 31, 2016: in the spirit of the 2016 presidential election, Katie and Orlando take their relationship to a new level by dressing up as Hillary and Bill Clinton at a star studded Halloween party."
"Katie doesn't seem to be bound by her boyfriend, exposing everything behind her."
"The best part?"
"Not only are they rowing together in the middle of the earth, but bloom is completely naked."
"August 4, 2016: those photos of paparazzi vacationing in Italy in the summer of 2016 are likely to be notorious."
"The two were in Cannes, France, for the Cannes Film Festival. Katie shared a group photo of them in long robes, lying on the stairs outside a mansion, cleverly saying 'we can't'"
"May 20, 2016: the judges of American Idol, the official website of instagram, released photos of the two on instagram, which finally confirmed her relationship with bloom."



**Something goes wrong**
“In classic Prince Philip fashion, he reportedly snapped, ‘Don’t be ridiculous.’Well, you win some – you lose some.”
“It’s not a huge surprise that Princess Eugenie was allegedly the one to spill the beans, as she’s a big The Crown stan and we’re here for it.”
“When you purchase through links on our site, we may earn commission on some of the items you choose to buy.”
“We'd watch a show about our lives too tbh, but it'd probably be way more boringIf we were Claire Foy, we’d be sweating a little bit right now.”
“Netflix’s hit show The Crown has become one of the biggest contenders on the television scene and it turns out not even Queen Elizabeth is immune to its charms, according to a reported conversation with Princess Eugenie.”
“Vanessa Kirby who played Princess Margaret on the show was recently interviewed for Vanity Fair and revealed A friend of mine was at a party and didn t know anyone so he sidled up to this group who were talking...”
“...about The Crown when one said Well my granny watches it and really likes it It slowly dawned on him that the girl was Princess Eugenie and her granny was the queen It makes sense given that the Daily Express...”
“...revealed that Prince Edward and his wife Sophie of Wessex were supposedly the ones to introduce the Queen to it...”
“(They share a Netflix account and everything.)”
“We wonder what else the Queen’s been queueing up – maybe she’s a big Orange is the New Black fan?”


According to reports, Prince Philip snapped in a classic way: "don't be silly. Well, you win some, you lose some. "
"It's not surprising that Princess Eugenie is said to be the one who divulges secrets, because she's a big figure in the crown, and that's why we're here."
"When you buy through the links on our website, we may earn a commission on some of the items you choose to buy."
"We'll also watch a show about our lives, but it's probably more boring. If we were Claire foy, we'd sweat a little now."
"It is reported that Netflix's hit TV series" crown "has become one of the biggest competitors in the TV industry. It has been proved that even Queen Elizabeth is not immune from its charm. It is reported that she has a dialogue with Princess Eugenie."
"Vanessa Kirby, who plays Princess Margaret in the show, recently gave an interview to vanity fair. She revealed that a friend of mine didn't know anyone at a party, so he quietly walked up to the group of people who were talking..."
“… As for the crown, when someone said that my grandmother saw it and really liked it, he gradually realized that the girl was Princess Eugenie and her grandmother was the queen. Considering the daily express
“…… It was revealed that Prince Edward and his wife Sophie in Wessex should be the people who introduced it to the queen.... "
"(they share a Netflix account and everything.)
"We want to know what other line the queen is in - maybe she's a big orange, a new black fan?"



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“De Lesseps announced their divorce in August.”
“They divorced in 2009, and she re-married in 2016 to Tom D’Agostino Jr., sacrificing her noble title.”
“Born in Connecticut, she earned the title of “Countess” when she wed French Count Alexandre de Lesseps in 1993.”
“De Lesseps rose to fame in 2008 on the Bravo show, which recently wrapped up its ninth season.”
“...officer disorderly intoxication resisting arrest with violence and two corruption by threat charges according to the Palm Beach County Sheriff s Office...”
“I am so grateful for the love and support that I am receiving from my family friends and loyal supporters Also Read Real Housewives Star Luann De Lesseps Arrested in Florida for Battery De Lesseps was arrested in Palm Beach Fla on Christmas Eve on charges of battery on an...”
“My actions alleged in the police report do not reflect my core values and my law abiding character.”
““I have the greatest respect for police officers and the job they do.”
“I intend to turn this unfortunate incident into a positive life changing event.”“Once again, I sincerely apologize for my actions,” her tweet continued.”
““I have decided to seek professional guidance and will be voluntarily checking into an alcohol treatment center.”


"Dreiseps announced his divorce in August."
"They divorced in 2009, and in 2016 she married little Tom dagostino, sacrificing her noble title."
Born in Connecticut, she married French Earl Alexandre Lesseps in 1993 and won the title of "Countess"
"Dreiseps made a big name in 2008's Bravo show, which recently ended its ninth season."
"According to the Palm Beach County Sheriff's office, police officers drank too much, violently resisted arrest and twice threatened corruption..."
"I am very grateful to my family and friends for their love and support. My loyal supporters also read that the star of Real Housewives, LuAnn de Lesseps, was arrested in Florida for shelling. De Lesseps was arrested on Christmas Eve in Palm Beach, Florida, on charges of being in a prison
"The conduct I allege in the police report does not reflect my core values and law-abiding character."
"I respect the police and their work the most."
"I intend to turn this unfortunate event into a positive life changing event." "Once again, I sincerely apologize for my behavior," she continued
"I have decided to seek professional guidance and will volunteer to stay in an alcohol treatment center."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“"I’d like to make an announcement.”
“The Game of Thrones actress took to Instagram on Monday to share the news with some photos of their cute puppy, Waldo Picasso Jonas.”
“One photo is of Turner embracing the Alaskan Klee Kai in a loving hug, while the other photo shows Waldo sitting alongside the couple's other pooch, Porky Basquiat Jonas.”
“"Welcome to the family @waldopicassojonas," Turner wrote, tagging Waldo's personal Instagram handle in the caption, because of course their awesome dog has his own Instagram.”
“Venturing over to Waldo's Instagram page, the inquisitive canine has only one photo so far, and it's of Waldo and Porky sniffing eachother through a window.”
“The photo is adorably captioned, "Bruthuz" along with a fist bump emoji.”
“Meanwhile, the official announcement regarding Waldo's adoption was posted by Porky's personal Instagram, which Turner and Jonas started in September.”
“In a super cute photo of the nearly identical dogs, it was revealed that Waldo is actually Porky's real, biological brother.”
“Me, my parents and I have adopted my actual brother from the same litter," the photo caption reads.”


Related libraries
"I want to make an announcement."
The heroine of game of Thrones shared a picture of their adorable dog, Waldo Picasso Jonas, on instagram on Monday
"One picture shows Turner embracing Alaska's Clarke in love, while the other shows Waldo sitting next to the couple's other puppy, boki Basquet Jonas."
"Welcome to the family @ waldopicassojonas," Turner wrote, noting Waldo's personal instagram handle in the title, because of course their awe inspiring dog has its own instagram
"Venture into Waldo's instagram page. There's only one picture of this curious dog so far. It's a picture of Waldo and poky sniffing each other through the window."
The title of this photo is lovely, "bruthuz" and a fist collision emoticon
Meanwhile, the official news about Waldo's adoption was released by poky's personal instagram, which Turner and Jonas started using in September
"As like as two peas in a brother's eyes, he is actually a brother of the family."
"I, my parents and I adopted my real brother from the same nest," read the title of the photo



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Prince Harry and Ms. Markle both feel honoured that Lady Jane will be representing her family and helping to celebrate the memory of the late Princess on the wedding day."”
“"All three siblings of Diana, Princess of Wales will be in attendance and Lady Jane Fellowes will give the reading," the statement reads.”
“A statement from the communications secretary to Prince Harry was released on Friday saying that the royal is "keen to involve his mother's family in his wedding."”
“Meghan and Harry will also be honoring his late mother, Princess Diana, at the ceremony.”
“Last week, we learned more details about the upcoming royal wedding, including that Meghan's father, Thomas Markle, will be walking her down the aisle.”
“2018 Met Gala Red Carpet FashionBeatrice and sister Princess Eugenie are expected to be there at the ceremony supporting their cousin as he ties the knot.”
“The couple is set to tie the knot on May 19 at St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle.”
“Beatrice's appearance at the event comes just under two weeks before her cousin Prince Harry marries Meghan Markle.”
“This year's theme for the event was "Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination."”
“The event takes place each year at the Metropolitan Museum of Art on the first Monday in May.”


"Prince Harry and Ms. markel are honored, and Ms. Jane will represent her family and help celebrate the wedding anniversary of the late princess."
"Diana, the three brothers and sisters of the princess of Wales will be present, and Mrs. Jane fallows will read it out," the statement said
On Friday, Prince Harry's Communications Minister issued a statement saying the royal family "is eager to have his mother's family at his wedding."
Megan and Harry will also pay tribute to his late mother, Princess Diana, at the ceremony
"Last week, we learned more about the upcoming royal wedding, including that Megan's father, Thomas markel, will accompany her to the wedding aisle."
"Beatrice and her sister princess Eugenie are expected to attend the wedding in support of their cousin's marriage at the 2018 blind date party."
"The couple are due to get married on May 19 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"Beatrice was at the event less than two weeks before her cousin Prince Harry married Megan markel."
"The theme of this year's event is" celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination. "
"This event is held every year at the Metropolitan Museum of art on the first Monday of May."



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And the seventh trip I convinced her.”Image zoom Sam Hunt and Hannah Lee Fowler | Credit: Kevin Mazur/ACMA2017/GettyWhile his career has been taking off, Hunt recognized that Fowler has been making many sacrifices for her husband.”
““Trying to talk to her about coming back.”
““I think last summer I went out [to Hawaii] about seven times in about three months,” Hunt told Entertainment Tonight at last year’s CMT Awards.”
“The couple were engaged in January 2017 and wed in an intimate Georgia ceremony just months later — but it took some work on Hunt’s part to get to that point.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up with the latest from PEOPLE?”
“...for me and our future he said...”
“Image zoom Sam Hunt and Hannah Lee Fowler Credit John Shearer WireImage The country crooner 33 made sure to give Fowler a shout out while accepting his award for the song Body Like a Back Road My wife Thank you for being so selfless this past year sacrificing so much...”
“Check out PEOPLE’s full Billboard Music Awards coverage to get the latest news on music’s big night.”
“The occasion marked Hunt and Fowler’s first joint appearance since the CMT Music Awards in June 2017.”


"On the seventh trip, I convinced her." Sam hunt and Hannah Lee Fowler photo source: Kevin Mazu / acma2017 / Getty as his career took off, hunt realized that Fowler had made a lot of sacrifices for her husband
"I want to talk to her about coming back."
"I think I went to Hawaii seven times in about three months last summer," Hunter told entertainment tonight at last year's CMT awards
"The couple got engaged in January 2017, and a few months later they had a close wedding in Georgia - but hunt did something about it."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"For me and our future, he said
"Picture zoom Sam hunt and Hannah Lee Fowler credit John shearer WireImage country singer 33 make sure to give Fowler a shout while accepting his song body like a path my wife thanks you for being so selfless and sacrificing so much in the past year..."
"Check out all the Billboard Music Awards in people magazine for the latest news on music night."
"This is hunt and Fowler's first joint debut since the CMT Music Awards in June 2017."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kroy said slavery ended a long time ago sweety.”The topic turned to Kim’s strained relationship with her parents, who she hasn’t seen or spoken to in over six years, as she revealed they remain estranged.”
“They called and said he can no longer drive [you], two of the women have complained.”
““She’s like the devil.”
“Host Brandi, who has also feuded with Kenya in the past during their time on Celebrity Apprentice, also got in on the Kenya bashing action!”
“You don’t have a good heart,” continued Kim.”
“Kenya’s not a good person.”
“She’s evil.”
“She’s pretty nasty.”
“Kenya Moore was saying my kids are so ugly, they’re so stupid, and they’re not going anywhere.”“She’s disgusting.”
“They were talking [about] my kids are so ugly.”


Chloe says slavery is long over, sweetheart. The topic turns to Kim Jong Il's tense relationship with her parents. For more than six years, she has never met or spoken to them, because she revealed that they are still distant
"They called and said he couldn't drive (you), and two of the women complained."
"She's like a devil."
"In the past, brandy, the host of Celebrity Apprentice, was also at odds with Kenya. He also took part in the attack against Kenya!"
"You have a bad heart," Kim continued
"Kenya is not a good man."
"She's evil."
"She's a pain in the neck."
"Kenyan Moore said my children are ugly. They are too stupid to go anywhere." "She's disgusting."
"They say my child is too ugly."



**Something goes wrong**
“A post shared by Madonna (@madonna) on Feb 22, 2017 at 1:17pm PST”
“Pajama Game on..........,,,, The Revolution of ♥️ starts at home!”
“She's also mother to Lourdes, 20, and Rocco, 16.”
“In addition to Mercy, Madonna adopted three other children from Malawi -- David, 11, and 4-year-old twins Estere and Stella.”
“"In a country with only three pediatric surgeons and 50% of the population under 15 years old, this new facility could make a significant difference in the lives of Malawian children."”
“"In addition to serving more children, this new facility will become a training center of excellence for Southern Africa, with more local doctors acquiring the skills needed to perform pediatric surgery," the post explains.”
“Named after her 11-year-old Malawi-born daughter, Mercy James, the Mercy James Institute for Pediatric Surgery and Intensive Care will officially open its doors on July 11.”
“The "Living for Love" singer has developed a clinic at the Queen Elizabeth Central Hospital in Blantyre.”
“All of Madonna's adopted children are from Malawi, so it's no surprise that she would give back to the country that gave her so much love and happiness.”


"A post shared by Madonna (@ Madonna) at 1:17 PM PST on February 22, 2017"
"Pajamas game, about Revolutionary ♥️  Start at home
"She's also the mother of Lourdes, 20, and Rocco, 16."
"In addition to kindness, Madonna has adopted three other children from Malawi - David, 11, and twins Esther and Stella, 4."
"In a country with only three child surgeons and 50% of the population under the age of 15, this new facility could have a significant impact on the lives of Malawian children."
"In addition to serving more children, this new facility will become an excellent training center for more local doctors in southern Africa to acquire the skills they need to perform pediatric surgery," the post explained
"Named after her 11 year old daughter, Macy James, who was born in Malawi, the Macy James Institute of pediatric surgery and intensive care will officially open on July 11."
The "live for love" singer runs a clinic at Queen Elizabeth Central Hospital in Blantyre
"All of Madonna's adopted children are from Malawi, so it's not surprising that she will give back so much love and happiness to her country."



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 37 year old dancer who did not perform with Vanessa Lachey during this week s Guilty Pleasures themed night on Dancing With the Stars due to personal issues took to Twitter on Wednesday to apologize to his partner and confirm that he will be back in the ballroom next...”
“Monday...”
“"As you are all aware, I had to leave the show last week to take care of some personal issues," he wrote in a series of tweets.”
“"I take full responsibility for my absence... and want to apologize to my partner Vanessa."”
“"We are both looking forward to dancing for our fans next week!"”
“...he added.”
“MORE: 'Dancing With the Stars' Season 25, Week 3: Best Lifts, Kicks, Tricks and Flips!”
“As you are all aware, I had to leave the show last week to take care of some personal issues.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 37 year old dancer, due to personal problems, didn't perform with Vanessa Lachey on the guilt theme night of dancing with the stars this week. He apologized to his partner on twitter on Wednesday and confirmed that he would return to the ballroom next..."
"Monday..."
"As you all know, I had to leave the show last week to deal with some personal issues," he wrote in a series of microblogs
"I take full responsibility for my absence... I want to apologize to my partner Vanessa
"We're all looking forward to dancing for our fans next week!"
“…… He added
"More: 'dancing with stars' season 25, week 3: the best lifts, kicks, tricks and flips!"
"As you all know, I had to leave the show last week to deal with some personal issues."



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kelly Clarkson will go head-to-head with Blake Shelton next season on The Voice.”
“She says Stefani always starts out with something sweet and positive to say, then she and Shelton take it somewhere else.”
“Kelly Clarkson and her husband, Brandon Blackstock, have found the coolest couple to go on a double date with — Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani.”
“After knowing Shelton for years (Blackstock is his manager), Clarkson started spending time and talking with Stefani after she began dating the country superstar.”
“Clarkson is a big fan of the No Doubt singer, and she says Stefani is the “most chill girl ever.”Who Wouldn’t Want To Hang With Blake And Gwen?”
“Clarkson told E!”
“News that at first, she was nervous to hang out with the “Rich Girl” singer, but Stefani is such a cool lady that the two instantly became friends.”
“She added that all it takes is meeting Stefani one time and you feel close to her.”
“The former American Idol winner says she and her husband double-dated with Stefani and Shelton at Stefani’s home, which she called “magnificent.” She says the first time she walked in, it was like the scene from Pretty Woman where Julia Roberts didn’t belong in the store.”
“When she was at Stefani s home she also got the chance to meet members of her family who Clarkson says are super rad and down to earth The Superstar Couples Even Have Group Text Messages Clarkson also revealed what it s like to be part of group texts with...”


"Kelly Clarkson will face Blake Shelton on the sound next season
"She said Stefani was always sweet and positive at first, and then she and Sheldon took it elsewhere."
"Kelly Clarkson and her husband Brandon Blackstock have found the coolest couple - Black Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie."
After years of knowing Sheldon (Blackstock is his agent), Clarkson began to spend time talking to her after she started dating the country superstar
Clarkson, a big fan of the undoubted singer, said Stephanie was "the coldest girl ever.". Who doesn't want to be with Blake and Gwen? "
"Clarkson, tell me!"
It is reported that at the beginning, she was very nervous to go out with the "rich girl" singer, but Stephanie was a cool woman and they soon became friends
"She added that once you see Stefani, you feel close to her."
The former American idol winner said she and her husband had two dates with Stephanie and Sheldon at Stephanie's home, which she called "beautiful.". The first time she walked in, she said, was like the scene in pretty woman where Julia Roberts didn't belong to the store
"When she was at Stefanie's house, she also had the opportunity to meet her family. Clarkson said they were super celebrities and down-to-earth superstar couples, and even sent mass text messages. Clarkson also revealed his relationship with It's like texting together. "



**Something goes wrong**
“News)Also On Black America Web:”
“(Source: Hot New Hip Hop & E!”
“Hot New Hip Hop reports that Rae spoke out on the matter but didn’t give a specific answer to the question.”
“Some background information to know about Rae is that she is a huge Drake fan.”
“She’s so much of a fan that she puts the rapper’s lyrics into every episode of Insecure as sort of an easter egg for fans to listen for.”
“She told Hot New Hip Hop doing, “that was a personal thing for me, but that’s not something that we bang you over the head with.”Supposedly at the after party, E!”
“News reports that Drake made his entourage stop when he passed by Rae.”
“He then asked if she wanted to go with him to a Netflix party.”
“Sources say she declined the invite because she was with her friends and the walked away.”
“Another source says that it didn’t happen that way.”


"News" is also on the black American website:
"Source: popular new hip hop music and entertainment!"
"The hot new hip-hop report said Ray was straight on the matter, but didn't give a specific answer to the question."
"Some background information about ray is that she's a big fan of Drake."
"She's a huge fan. She put the lyrics of rappers into every episode of unsafe, just like an Easter egg."
She told the hot new hip-hop show, "it's my personal business, but it's not something we hit you on the head." It's said that at the post party, e! "
"The news report said Drake stopped his entourage as he passed by ray."
"Then he asked if she would like to go to Netflix's party with him."
"The source said she declined the invitation because she was with friends and the children walked away."
"Another source said that's not how it happened."



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“GARETH FULLER Getty ImagesThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The Duchess of Sussex, however, opted for a navy Givenchy dress and matching fascinator.”
“Getty ImagesLike Kate, Meghan Markle also went for a monochromatic look at Eugenie and Jack's wedding.”
“Kate Middleton and Princess Charlotte at Meghan and Harry’s wedding.”
“It was the third time she re-wore the pale yellow frock—she had previously worn it to both Princess Charlotte's christening and to Queen Elizabeth II's birthday party.”
“For her last royal wedding appearance, at the May nuptials for Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, Kate also wore an Alexander McQueen dress.”
“During the ceremony, the couple was seated without their two eldest kids, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, because the tots were busy serving as pageboy and bridesmaid in the ceremony.”
“After arriving with Prince William, the couple shared a rare moment of PDA inside St. George's Chapel, holding hands sweetly as they sat in the pews.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email addresses
However, the Duchess of Sussex chose a navy blue Givenchy dress and a matching infatuator
Like Kate, Megan markel likes to watch the wedding of Eugene and Jack in monochrome
"Kate Middleton and Princess Charlotte at Megan and Harry's wedding."
"This is the third time she has put on the pale yellow dress she wore at the baptism of Princess Charlotte and the birthday party of Queen Elizabeth II."
Kate wore an Alexander McQueen dress for her last royal wedding to Prince Harry and Megan markel in May
At the wedding, the couple didn't bring their two oldest children, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, because they were busy working as pagers and bridesmaids
After arriving with Prince William, the couple had a rare time in St. George's church, sitting on a bench and holding hands sweetly
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The publication reported that she then made a lowkey appearance at the reception.”
“News, Ms Markle arrived at Heathrow Airport on Tuesday and was immediately taken to Kensington Palace.”
“Harry went all the way back to London to get Meghan and bring her to the party,' a source told the Sun on Sunday.”
“'Harry knew this was all about Pippa’s big day and he and Meghan jointly decided they didn’t want to upstage her.”
“He then slipped away in his dark grey Audi accompanied by a security guard to pick Meghan up from the Palace in West London, where she has reportedly been staying since flying into the UK on Tuesday.”
“Pictured arriving at the ceremony with WilliamHarry, 32, watched the wedding ceremony at St Mark's Church and stayed for the champagne reception at Englefield House.”
“...flypast was no doubt the perfect interlude to entertain attendees after a lavish Scottish themed dinner with haggis and whisky The fighter plane performed impressive manoeuvres for ten minutes for the guests on Saturday evening Harry attended Pippa s wedding earlier on Saturday without Meghan...”
“...couple watched the spectacular aerial display from a 100 000 glass marquee erected in the back garden just six miles away from the village of Englefield where they tied the knot Guests at the evening reception had a stunning view of the aerial display thanks to the vast glasshouse The...”
“...her up from Kensington Palace on Saturday evening Harry slipped away after the champagne reception in a dark grey Audi accompanied by a security guard to pick Meghan up from the Palace in West London where she has reportedly been staying since flying into the UK on Tuesday The happy...”
“...with the spectacular flypast A skilled pilot masterfully flew the plane across the skies for ten minutes as guests watched on from the Middletons back garden Prince Harry beamed as he drove his actress girlfriend 35 to the Middletons estate in Berkshire after making a 100 mile dash to pick...”


"The magazine reported that she then appeared in a low profile at the reception."
"As soon as the news came out, Ms. markel arrived at Heathrow airport on Tuesday and was immediately taken to Kensington Palace."
"Harry traveled all the way back to London to bring Megan to the party," a source told the sun on Sunday
"Harry knew it was Pippa's big day. He and Megan decided together that they didn't want to make a fool of her."
"Then, accompanied by a security guard, he slipped in his dark gray Audi to meet Megan at the palace in West London, where he has been reported to have lived since his flight to the UK on Tuesday."
"The picture shows William Harry, 32, watching the wedding ceremony at St. Mark's church and attending a champagne reception at the engelfield house."
“… After a sumptuous Scottish themed dinner with haggis and whiskey, flying by is undoubtedly the perfect interlude for the guests. The fighter plane performed an impressive ten minute action for the guests on Saturday night. Harry attended Pippa's wedding without Megan earlier on Saturday... "
“…… The couple set up a 100000 piece glass tent in the back garden six miles from engelfield village to watch the spectacular aerial display. At the evening reception, the guests saw the beautiful scenery displayed in the air, thanks to the huge greenhouse... "
“…… She came back from Kensington Palace on Saturday night. Harry drove a dark gray Audi and held a champagne party. Accompanied by a security guard, he picked up Megan from the palace in West London. It is reported that Megan has been living there since he flew to England on Tuesday... "
“…… In the spectacular flight, a skilled pilot expertly flew the plane over the sky for 10 minutes. Among the guests watching in Middleton's back garden, Prince Harry drove his actress girlfriend No. 35 100 miles to Middleton manor in Berkshire... "



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#GoldenGlobes pic.twitter.com/fXm4pygZ41 — Golden Globe Awards (@goldenglobes) January 8, 2018Advertisement...”
“A round of applause for Saoirse Ronan taking home the award for Best Performance by an Actress in a Motion Picture - Musical or Comedy for her role in @LadyBirdMovie!”
“Check out the acceptance speech below.”
“...family and friends and everyone in the room at The Beverly Hilton in Beverly Hills...”
“Due to time constraints Saoirse was limited in what she could say in her acceptance speech but she did give a shout out to her mother watching on Facetime over there on someone s phone right now as well as some of the important women in her life all her...”
“As big a deal as the award is in itself, when you consider the competition she faced on the night – Emma Stone, Margot Robbie, Judi Dench and Helen Mirren – it really brings home the scale of the achievement.”
“You can see the list of winners in full here.”
“...student in the coming of age movie Ladybird...”
“Advertisement Saoirse had been touted as a potential winner in the build up to the ceremony and so it proved on Sunday night as she came away with the award for Best Performance by an Actress in a Motion Picture Musical or Comedy for her role as a high school...”
“We can’t remember there being too many in the past, but regardless of whether it was or not, Saoirse Ronan, nor her mother, Monica, will forget the 2018 Golden Globe Awards in a hurry.”


"# Gordon lobes pic.twitter.com/fXm4pygZ41 -Golden Globe Award (@ goldenglobes) January 8, 2018 advertisement.... "
"Applause for saoirse Ronan winning the best film performance award - the role of a musical or comedian in @ ladybirdmovie!"
"Take a look at the award speech below."
“… Family, friends and everyone at the Beverly Hilton Hotel... "
"Due to time constraints, saorse can only say something in her acceptance speech, but she did give her mother a shout, she is watching FaceTime through other people's phone, and some important women in her life..."
"Despite the significance of the award itself, when you think about the competitors she faced that night - Emma stone, Margot Robbie, Judy Dench and Helen Mirren - you will find that she has indeed made great achievements."
"You can see all the winners here."
“… The students in the adult movie Ladybug... "
"Saoirse was touted as a potential winner in the preparation for the awards ceremony, so on Sunday night, she won the best performance award for her role as a high school movie, musical or comedian..."
"We can't remember too much of the past, but saorse Ronan and her mother, Monica, will soon forget the 2018 Golden Globes, whether or not."



**Something goes wrong**
“You're not in this alone!"”
“Great music documentaries to watch now Show all 6 1 /6 Great music documentaries to watch now Great music documentaries to watch now Glastonbury The Movie (In Flashback) Glastonbury is taking a fallow year but if you’re still craving your Pilton fix, look no further.”
“...them...”
“Responding to Williams Instagram post Missy Elliot wrote on Twitter I want to lift our sis up in prayer because there are so many people battling this and many trying to deal with it alone Let s keep the ones who are openly dealing with it uplifted be encouraging to...”
“I wanted out."”
“"I was at that place where it got so dark and heavy because sometimes you feel like 'I'm the provider, I take care of people, I'm not supposed to be feeling this way - what do I do?”
“...with depression she said...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here For years I m in one of the top selling female groups of all time suffering...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors...”


"It's not your business!"
"The good music documentaries to see now show all 61 / 6 of the good music documentaries to see the good music documentaries to see the good music documentaries to see now Glastonbury film (flashback) Glastonbury is resting for a year, but if you are still eager for your pilton restoration, please don't watch it any more."
“… They... "
"In response to Williams instagram's post, Miss Eliot tweeted," I want to raise our sister to pray, because there are so many people fighting against it, and many people are trying to deal with it alone. Let's continue to encourage those who deal with it openly... "
"I want to go out."
"I'm in that place, it's dark and heavy, because sometimes you think, 'I'm a provider, I take care of others, I shouldn't feel like that - what should I do?"
“…… She said dejectedly... "
"The independent would like to email you information about offers and updates. Please check the box. If you would like to contact us, please read our complete mailing list agreement terms. I have been one of the best-selling female groups for many years
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering with verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors..."



**Something goes wrong**
“27 2017 The Four Seasons Toronto official Twitter account tweeted about the incident writing Lemon Ricotta Pancakes so famous even PageSix is talking about them wakeupwithFS Lemon Ricotta Pancakes so famous even PageSix is talking about them wakeupwithFS pic twitter com hwbYw2nnkt Four Seasons Toronto FSToronto May 29 2017”
“The get down bel 79WANG May 27 2017 officialjaden Netflix Canceling The Get Down Just Made Me Want To Throw Up On Myself Phee LARRY_4_LIFE May 27 2017 officialjaden the Get Down Was Cancelled and You Haven t Said Anything But That s not of my business nsfr Iegsofwoodwaves May...”
“Will Smith and Jada Pinkett Smith’s son is in Toronto to film a romantic drama titled Life In A Year, about a teen who learns his girlfriend, played by Cara Delevingne, only has one year left to live.”
“On Saturday afternoon, the 18-year-old actor took to Twitter to complain about the service he received at the hotel.”
“READ MORE: Will Smith explains why he doesn’t impose gender stereotypes on son, JadenHe began with “The Four Seasons In Toronto Just Made Me Want to Throw Up On MySelf.”The Four Seasons In Toronto Just Made Me Want to Throw Up On MySelf.”
“— Jaden Smith (@officialjaden) May 27, 2017He added, “I Hope The Four Seasons In Toronto Puts Me On The No Stay List.”Story continues below advertisementI Hope The Four Seasons In Toronto Puts Me On The No Stay List.”
“— Jaden Smith (@officialjaden) May 27, 2017From there he claimed that the hotel “spiked my pancakes with cheese,” and that “I’m surprised I’m still alive.”The Four Seasons In Toronto Spiked My Pancakes With Cheese, I'm Surprised I'm Still Alive.”
“Jaden Smith officialjaden May 27 2017 Then he wrote After They Kicked Me Out Of My Room After They Kicked Me Out Of My Room Jaden Smith officialjaden May 27 2017 READ MORE Jaden Smith is the new face of Louis Vuitton models womenswear Smith s tweets raised many questions...”
“...among his 6 38 million Twitter followers with some people pointing out that ricotta is a type of cheese...”
“@officialjaden You're vegan, right?”


"27 in 2017, the official twitter account of four seasons hotel in Toronto posted an event on twitter about how famous it was to write lemon whey pancakes. Even page 6 talked about how famous they were to wake up with FS lemon whey pancakes. Even page 6 talked about how famous they were to wake up with FS pic twitter com hww2nnkt four seasons hotel in Toronto May 29, 2017"
"On May 27, 2017, the official website Netflix cancelled the download, which made me want to abandon myself. On May 27, 2017, the official website cancelled the download. You didn't say anything, but it's none of my business. nsfr Iegsofwoodwaves May…”
Will Smith and Jada pinkert Smith's son are shooting a romantic drama called "life in a year" in Toronto. It's about a teenager played by Carla delaviny who has known his girlfriend for only one year
"On Saturday afternoon, the 18-year-old actor tweeted about the service he got at the hotel."
Read more: Will Smith explains why he doesn't impose gender stereotypes on his son, starting with "the four seasons of Toronto just make me want to vomit myself.". The four seasons in Toronto just make me want to vomit
——Jaden Smith (@ officialjaden) on May 27, 2017, he added: "I hope Four Seasons Toronto will put me on the no check-in list." I hope the four seasons hotel in Toronto will put me on the list of no stay
——Jaden Smith (@ officialjaden) was there on May 27, 2017, claiming that the hotel "added cheese to my pancakes" and "I'm surprised I'm still alive." Four Seasons Toronto put cheese on my pancakes and I was surprised I was still alive
"Jaden Smith officialjaden May 27, 2017, and then he wrote after they kicked me out of my room that Jaden Smith officialjaden May 27, 2017 read more Jaden Smith is Louis Vuitton's model's new face, and Smith's Micro blog raised a lot of questions..."
“…… Among his 6.38 million twitter followers, someone pointed out that Italian whey cheese is a kind of cheese... "
"@ officialjaden, you're a vegetarian, right?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Admittedly more than the other two episodes we watched, and maybe because it was the “first” and the writers felt compelled to, next week’s premiere leans heavy on not just Trump jokes, but also the urgency for people to be social activists.”
“Well, let’s just say that halfway into the premiere, Grace and Karen are in Trump’s Oval Office while Jack and Will are being hit on by a gay secret serviceman on the White House lawn.”
“That clue: “He’s a man but he ages like a lesbian.”The next clue, however, is right on the money.”
“It happens during a game of Heads Up.”
“Topical.”
“Two celebrities young gays probably have never heard of and a Speaker of the House who left office during the sitcom’s first season.”
“The first three celebrities name-checked on the new Will & Grace—and everyone knows celebrity name-checking is 40 percent of the fun of Will & Grace—are Steven Tyler, Jon Voight, and Newt Gingrich.”
“Those worried about how the show plays in modern times will go through a real roller coaster of emotions in the first scene of next Thursday’s premiere.”
“The new episodes are certainly more political and even a little gayer than we expected, but just as funny and nostalgic as we hoped they would be.”
“In fact, they would call it “problematic.”Relax.”


"It's undeniable that we've seen more than the other two episodes. Maybe because it's the first episode, the writers feel compelled. Next week's premiere not only focuses on Trump's jokes, but also on the urgency of people becoming social activists."
"Well, halfway through the premiere, grace and Karen were in Trump's Oval Office, while Jack and will were hit by a gay agent on the White House lawn."
The clue: "he's a man, but he's as old as a lesbian." The next clue, however, is money
"It happened in a head-on game."
"Special topics."
"Two celebrities young comrades may never have heard of and a speaker of the house of representatives who left office in the first season of sitcom."
"The top three celebrity names in the new will and grace check, as we all know, celebrity name check is 40 percent fun. Will and grace are Steven Taylor, Jon Voith and Newt Gingrich."
"Those who are worried about how the show will perform in modern times will experience a real emotional roller coaster in the first show, which premieres next Thursday."
"The new series is certainly more political and even a bit more entertaining than we expected, but it's just as interesting and nostalgic as we wanted it to be."
In fact, they call it "problem" relaxation



**Something goes wrong**
“On top of all that goes into being a working mom, Amal is also helping pal Meghan Markle settle into her new life in the U.K.”
“They are parents to 1-year-old twins Alexander and Ella.”
“Splash NewsOn Thursday, Amal, 40, and husband George, 57, celebrated their fourth wedding anniversary.”
“The brunette donned a whimsy polka-dot, black-and-white frock with Le Vian black diamond studs, pumps and a tote.”
“Jackson Lee/Splash NewsThe British beauty showed off her 9 to 5 style on Wednesday as well.”
“For glam, Clooney rocked her signature berry lip and voluminous waves.”
“The human rights lawyer attended the Committee to Protect Journalists event in a bright dress with mid-length sleeves and overlay, paired with nude suede pumps, a satchel by Michael Kors Collection and Maxior gold earrings as she walked with a classic camel coat hung over her arm.”
“Amal Clooney radiated in red as she headed to the United Nations headquarters in New York City on Friday.”
“Event The human rights lawyer radiated in the bright color in New York City.”
“Amal Clooney Is a Gorgeous Lady in Red Ahead of U.N.”


"In addition to being a working mother, Amar helped Khan Megan markel settle down in his new life in the UK."
"They are the parents of one year old twins Alexander and Ella."
Amar, 40, and her husband George, 57, celebrated their fourth wedding anniversary on Thursday
"The brunette was wearing a fantastic black and white polka dot dress with Levi's black diamond studs, high heels and a handbag."
"Jackson Lee / the British beauty also showed her 9-5 style on Wednesday."
"To dazzle, Clooney shakes her signature berry lips and waves."
"The human rights lawyer attended the Committee for the protection of journalists in a bright dress, medium sleeves and overlays, with nude suede shoes, Michael kors' collection of satchels and maxior gold earrings. She walked with a classic camel coat on her arm."
"When Amal Clooney went to the United Nations headquarters in New York City on Friday, he was shining red."
"Incident human rights lawyers radiate bright colors in New York City."
"Amar Clooney is a beautiful woman in red in front of the United Nations."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m going to bring my computer and sit next to you until you fall asleep.” So I bring my computer and I start to read all the reviews.”
“I said, “Okay.”
“I read all the articles about how the previous female-led superhero movies didn’t work out very well.”
“I’ve got to be honest and say not really.”
“Did you ever get a sense from anyone in the industry before the movie came out that they were skeptical?”
“Before Wonder Woman there was a story about a leaked memo at Marvel where an executive suggested female superhero movies don’t work.”
“But slowly and gradually the journey to the pinnacle of this mountain was fascinating and exhilarating and exciting and it has a lot to do with the people you’re working with.”
“I felt like the little girl looking at Mount Kilimanjaro and thinking: How am I going to climb all the way up?”
“So I was worried at the beginning.”
“The heavy lifting was on my shoulders.”


"I'll sit next to you with my computer until you fall asleep." So I started reading all the reviews with my computer
I said, "OK."
"I've read all the articles about previous female dominated superhero movies that didn't work very well."
"I have to be honest. It's not true."
"Before the film was released, did you feel skeptical from people in the industry?"
"Before wonder woman, there was a report that a memo from Marvel had been leaked, and an executive suggested that female superhero movies would not work."
"But slowly, the journey to the top of the mountain is fascinating, exciting and exciting, which has a lot to do with your colleagues."
"I feel like a little girl looking at Mount Kilimanjaro, thinking: how can I climb all the way up?"
"So I was worried at first."
"The burden is on my shoulders."



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The teenager, who became a household name after her role in the Netflix series, chose a silver and white strapless ballerina inspired look by Calvin Klein.”
“Stranger Things star Millie Bobby Brown, 13, led the way for gowns with voluminous skirts at this year's awards show.”
“...incredible frock by Calvin Klein Date night The Big Little Lies actress arrived with her handsome husband country singer Keith Urban Glamorous Nicole was hard to miss in her dramatic dress dress sweeping her train around in style Reese 41 flaunted her legs in a midnight blue blazer inspired Stella...”
“...red The German supermodel looked incredible in the red hot ensemble teasing a hint of leg in the eye catching dress Playful Nicole was a vision as she hit the carpet in a red dress the actress showed off her slim waist and a hint of her cleavage in the...”
“Sultry Heidi also chose a Peter Dundas dress with a deep slit the mother of four stunned in her crimson number which she accessorized with an Atelier Swarovski by Fiona Katur clutch What a natural Heidi added layers of textured bangles on each hand adding a matching clutch Lady in...”
“Her co-star Reese Witherspoon went for a completely different look for this year's Emmys.”
“The Big Little Lies actress arrived with her handsome and very dapper husband, country singer Keith Urban.”
“...the carpet in a red Calvin Klein dress the actress showed off her slim waist and a hint of her cleavage in the incredible frock...”
“The brunette beauty showed off her long legs in the dazzling silver and peach dress Turning heads The TV star s shimmering frock had a plunging back and a sheer cape like detail adding even more glamour to the eye catching look Nicole 50 was a vision as she hit...”
“Posing confidently with her hands on her hips Sofia twirled around in front of the cameras showing off every angle Wow Jessica who is married to Justin Timberlake slipped on a blush and silver Ralph Russo gown complete with a low cut neckline and thigh high slit Legs for days...”


"The girl, who became a household name in the Netflix series, chose a silver Strapless Ballerina by Calvin Klein."
Millie Bobby Brown, 13, starred in the dress at this year's awards ceremony
“… Incredible dress Calvin Klein date night big lie actress arrives with her handsome husband country singer Keith City glamorous Nicole is hard to miss her dramatic dress sweeping her train around the style of Reese 41 showing off her legs in the midnight blue jacket inspired Stella
“… The red German supermodel looks unbelievable in the ensemble of red hot. In a glint dress, a little bit of a witty Nicole is a mirage. When she goes to the carpet in a red dress, the actress shows her slender waist and a little bit of cleavage. "
"The sultry Heidi also chose a deep split Peter Dundas dress. The mother of four mothers was stunned by her crimson numbers. She decorated a natural Heidi with Swarovski, Fiona katur clutch's studio, added a texture bracelet to each hand, and added a matching clutch lady..."
"Her partner Reese Witherspoon designed a completely different look for this year's Emmy."
The "big lie" actress came here with her handsome husband, country singer Keith Urban
“…… Wearing the carpet in Calvin Klein's red dress, the actress shows off her slim waist and the cleavage in her incredible dress... "
"The brunette shows off her long legs in a dazzling silver and peach dress. Turning her head, the TV star's glittering dress has a falling back and a transparent Cape like detail, adding more charm to the eye-catching shape. Nicole 50 is an illusion when she attacks..."
"Sophia poses confidently, hands on his hips, turns around in front of the camera, shows every angle. Jessica, who marries Justinn Timberlake, slips on the blush. The silver Ralph roxo robe is tied up with the low neckline and the thigh to open the slant leg for several days."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...dancing martinis in hand to prove it...”
“Image zoom Still unsatisfied with Jenner s response however Harvey asks again How did she end up naked in this damn closet She just took off her jeans and went for it Jenner says joking that it all went down after 22 martinis and sharing a video of the two...”
“...in a black mini dress leopard print coat and matching slippers...”
“And so you know as girls do when they all get together we ended up in my closet looking at clothes and some stuff and she started trying some stuff on There she is now in my black sequin Tom Ford dress Jenner says sharing a photo of Lawrence dressed...”
““We started having a few cocktails and we were having so much fun.”
““She had some time off and I invited her over for dinner,” Jenner explains of how the night unfolded.”
“Yes, that definitely happened.”
“Her response?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““There was a story that Jennifer Lawrence ended up naked in your closet a few weeks ago,” he said to Jenner during her appearance on his talk show.”


“… Take the martini dance to prove that... "
"Image zooming is still not satisfied with Jenner's answer, but Harvey asked her again how she could be naked in this damned wardrobe. She just took off her jeans and went to Jenner. Jenner joked that after 22 Martinis, everything was over, and shared their video..."
“… Wearing a black miniskirt, leopard print coat and matching slippers... "
"So you know, when the girls get together, we look at clothes and other things in my closet, and she starts to try something, and she's wearing my black sequined Tom Ford dress, Jenner said, sharing pictures of Lawrence wearing..."
"We started to have a few cocktails and had a good time."
"She took a break and I invited her over for dinner," Jenner explained how the night unfolded
"Yes, that must have happened."
"Her reaction?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A few weeks ago, there was a story about Jennifer Lawrence naked in your closet," he told Jenna on the talk show



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It kind of makes my fashion choices, I think better because you end up whooping things together and end up discovering something really cool.””
““I think there’s something kind of cool to me not having much time,” she said.”
“...singer and mom of two Ciara captioned an adorable bath time snap of her daughter, who turns 11 months on WednesdayCiara and Russell Wilson‘s daughter may have the most dazzling smile of all time.”
“Sienna Princess, 11 months on Wednesday, is too cute in a new photo series posted to her mom’s Instagram account, looking positively delighted in the bathtub as she flashes a huge grin at the camera.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Sienna Says Happy Sunday Everybody!”
“Smile!”
“☺,” the “Goodies” singer, 32, captioned the post.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"It's a bit of a fashion choice for me, and I think it's better because you'll end up putting things together and finding something really cool."
"I don't think too much time is a bit cool for me," she said
“…… Singer and mother of two Sheila wrote an inscription for a lovely snapshot of her daughter's bath time, who turns 11 months on Wednesday. Sheila and Russell Wilson's daughter may have the brightest smile ever
"Sienna princess, 11 months old, was so cute in a series of new photos posted on her mother's instagram account on Wednesday that she grinned at the camera in the bathtub and looked very happy."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Siena said happy Sunday, everyone!"
"Smile
“ ☺ The 32 year old "candy" singer wrote under the title of the post
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But nine days after reports of the romance surfaced Jeremy filed for divorce from her.”
“...on his daughter s new love interest telling The Telegraph With respect I am not getting involved in it...”
“Green's father, Sir Philip Green is the owner of retail giant Arcadia and has a net worth of $5 billion (£3.53 billion), according to Forbes.”
“34-year-old Meeks is a model, nicknamed 'Hot Felon' after his mugshot went viral.”
“Topshop heiress Chloe Green is expecting a baby with boyfriend Jeremy Meeks, according to reports.”
“US Weekly reported the 27-year-old is expecting her first child with the 34-year-old model, nicknamed the ‘Hot Felon' after his mugshot went viral.”
“It comes just days after Meeks was spotted reportedly shopping for engagement rings in Beverly Hills.”
“Without you my year wouldn t be complete jmeeksofficial 31 12 17 Happynewyear goodbye2017hello2018 I Love you xxx newyear love happy A post shared by Chloe green chloegreen5 on Dec 31 2017 at 5 22am PST Dec 31 2017 at 5 22am PST Sir Philip Green previously refused to comment...”
“However, her parents have now reportedly given the relationship their backing.”
“Meeks' wife Melissa said she was left in shock after seeing the couple kissing and hugging during the summer.”


"But nine days after reports of the relationship surfaced, Jeremy filed for a divorce."
“… As for his daughter's new love interest, I respectfully told the Daily Telegraph
"Green's father, Sir Philip Green, is the boss of retail giant Arcadia. According to Forbes, he has a net asset of $5 billion (3.53 billion pounds)," he said
"Mikes, 34, is a model. After his photo became popular, he was nicknamed" hot criminal. "
"Topshop heiress Chloe green is reported to be pregnant with her boyfriend Jeremy Meeks."
The 27 year old model is pregnant with her first child, while the 34 year old model was nicknamed "spice girl" after his photo became popular, US Weekly reported
"Just a few days ago, Mikes was found buying an engagement ring at Beverly Hills."
"Without you, my year would be incomplete. Jmeeksofficial 31 12 17 happy New Year Goodyear 2017 Hello 2018 I love you XXX Happy New Year Chloe green2017 December 31 5:22 am PST Sir Philip Green declined to comment before..."
"However, it is reported that her parents have now provided support for the relationship."
"Michaels' wife Melissa said she was shocked to see the couple kissing and hugging in the summer."



**Something goes wrong**
“...video below...”
“...https t co 6x7FoYrUoP what will u do with no tabloids to call no one to blame but u u child u same same same ROSIE Rosie September 20 2017 RELATED Rosie O Donnell Reunites With Estranged Daughter Chelsea See more on Rosie and Chelsea s tumultuous relationship in the...”
“The former View co-host took to Twitter on Tuesday to respond to her estranged daughter Chelsea's pregnancy reveal and comments about their relationship.”
“In an interview with the Daily Mail on Tuesday, 20-year-old Chelsea announced that she is expecting her first child with husband Nick Alliegro and that Rosie "will not have a part in this child's life."”
“Chelsea, who was reported missing by her mother in 2015 (she was later found at the house of another man), said she and Rosie "don't have a relationship anymore" and she doesn't think "it can be mended."”
“RELATED: Rosie O'Donnell's Estranged Daughter Is Pregnant, Says 'Rosie Will Not Be In My Child's Life'Rosie, clearly upset over Chelsea's comments, first tweeted, "Protecting your family.”
“Not words I would use to describe u," on Tuesday before sharing a handwritten note that appears to be written by Chelsea after she left home.”
“...protecting ur familynot words I would use to describe u — ROSIE (@Rosie) September 19, 2017"She's 20...not a teen...she is married and pregnant...she doesn't want anything to do with me...great stop...doing interviews go live ur life," Rosie wrote in another tweet.”
“"We have been here before Chelsea...u wanna go a few rounds in public...seems so...Michelle's death = money 4 Chelsea."”
“Rosie's ex-wife, Michelle Rounds, died unexpectedly at her home last week.”


“… Here's the video... "
“… HTTPS t Co 6x7foyruop if there were no tabloids, what would you do? No one accused you, but you, you, child, you, Rossi, Rossi, Rossi, September 20, 2017, Rossi, Donna, reunite with estranged daughter, Chelsea, more about the messy relationship between Rossi and Chelsea... "
"The former co presenter tweeted on Tuesday about the pregnancy of her separated daughter, Chelsea, and comments on their relationship
"In an interview with the daily mail on Tuesday, the 20-year-old announced that she would have her first child with her husband Nick alliegro and that Rossi" would not be involved in the life of this child. "
"Chelsea was reported missing by her mother in 2015 (she was later found in another man's home), she said she and Rosie" no longer have a relationship ", she did not think" can make up "
"Related reports: Rosie O'Donnell's separated daughter is pregnant and says' Rosie won't be in my child's life '," Rosie was obviously upset by Chelsea's comments and tweeted for the first time, "protect your family."
"It's not a word I use to describe you," on Tuesday, before sharing a handwritten note that Chelsea wrote after leaving home
“… Protecting your family I won't use any words to describe you - Rosie (@ Rosie) September 19, 2017, "Rosie wrote in another tweet," she's 20 years old Not teenagers She's married and pregnant She didn't want to have anything to do with me Great, stop Do interviews and live your life. "
"We've been here before Chelsea How many turns do you want in public It seems that Michelle's death = money
"Rosie's ex-wife Michelle died at home last week."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“❤️ pic.twitter.com/JPrqQgkPqC @katiesalmon24”
“Fly high beautiful so high!”
“A report will now be prepared for the coroner.”Fellow “Love Island” contestant Katie Salmon, who coupled up with Sophie on the show, shared a heartbreaking message, alluding to suicide.”
“At the time of Sophie's death, the Northumbria Police told NME in a statement, “There are not believed to be any suspicious circumstances surrounding her death.”
“I love you princess.”Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“I need them days back...”
“On Monday he shared a photo of him and Sophie with the message just wish I could cuddle you all day miss you so much man Sophie not a minute goes by with out your gorgeous smile being a picture in my mind everyday we spent together was so amazing...”
“Since her death, Armstrong had posted a series of heartbroken messages on social media.”
“She was 32.”
“...the U K on June 20”


“ ❤️  pic.twitter.com/jprqgkpqc @Cartisarmon 24“
"How high and beautiful you are flying
"A report will now be prepared for the coroner." Katie salmon, also a "Love Island" player, shares a heartbreaking message with Sophie, implying suicide
"At the time of Sophie's death, Northumbria police told NME in a statement," there is no doubt about her death. "
"I love you, princess." Waiting for your permission to load instagram media
"I need them back..."
"On Monday, he shared a picture of him and Sophie and left a message saying that I hope I can hug you and miss you all day. Sophie didn't forget your bright smile for a minute. Every day we were together was so wonderful..."
"After Armstrong's death, he posted a series of heartbreaking news on social media."
"She was 32."
“… Britain, June 20



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


"Star, best fan and social media, best new 2017, best 2018 show, most expected rookie, saddest cancellation and best series ending..."
"The following are the best comedy and the best drama, the best drama performance, the best comedy performance, the best breakthrough star, the best couple and the sexiest moment, the best reality show and the best and the worst shock star, the best battle and music moment, the saddest death and the actor's exit, the best villain and the best guest..."
"Other nominations include magician, sharp weapon, shadow hunter, will and grace, new girl, Kerry Washington (scandal), James scodon, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Kimmel and Michelle wolf."
"Beautiful little liar: perfectionists will participate in the 2018 / 2019" most anticipated show. "
"Any program broadcast between June 9, 2017 and June 8, 2018 is eligible."
"News TV exclusive Award"
"Short link to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday , June 29, 2018, 7:37 a.m. EDT press release ends today (June 29) at 5 p.m. this year's e! "



**Something goes wrong**
“...which introduced the world to the dancing sensation Teyana Taylor...”
“Rihanna opened the show and received the Michael Jackson Video Vanguard Award performing four times with a medley of her biggest hits including Don t Stop the Music Only Girl in the World We Found Love and Where Have You Been Kanye West also premiered the music video to Fade...”
“...for the first time in almost 10 years...”
“Inglewood Mayor James Butts says the city welcomes the return of the MTV VMAs to the number one concert venue in California the Forum In 2016 the MTV VMAs were held in New York City s Madison Square Garden which saw the return of Britney Spears to the VMA stage...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The award show will be broadcast from the Forum in Inglewood, California on Aug. 27 at 8:00 p.m. ET/PT.”
“The awards show will return to the Forum in Inglewood, California on Aug. 27The 2017 MTV Video Music Awards Will Return to Los AngelesThe 2017 MTV Video Music Awards are making a much-anticipated return to the West Coast!”


“… Introducing Teyana Taylor to the world... "
"Rihanna hosted the show and won the Michael Jackson video Pioneer Award. She has performed her most popular songs four times, including" never stop, "the world's only music girl," we found love "and" where have you been? "Kanye West also premiered the music video" fading "...."
“… For the first time in nearly 10 years... "
"Inglewood Mayor James Bates said that the city welcomes MTV VMA back to California's largest concert venue. In 2016, MTV VMA was held in Madison Square Garden in New York City, and Britney Spears returned to VMA stage..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The awards ceremony will be broadcast at 8 p.m. EST on August 27 at a forum in Inglewood, California
"The awards ceremony will be held on August 27 in Inglewood, California, and the MTV Music Video Awards 2017 will be held in Los Angeles. MTV Music Video Awards 2017 will be held on the west coast



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was only when he picked me back up and kinda dusted me off, I was like, 'Who are you?'"”
“"Well I guess the sun rises in the west and sets in the east then huh?"”
“Now that's what we call an epic deleted scene.”
“"When life is so good that your sun and stars is in your city...you loose your eyes and gain 5 grins (and gins) where until now they'd only been one... (*grins- there's always more gins)," the British actress wrote.”
“"@prideofgypsies YOU ALWAYS MOTHER OF DRAGONS MAIN MAN ���� #happinessishere The actor, who recently married the real love moon of his life, Lisa Bonet, is in London to promote the movie Justice League with his co-stars.”
“He makes his debut as Aquaman in the DC superhero ensemble film, which is set for release on November 17.”
“Production on the HBO show's eighth and final season began last month and is set to continue through next summer.”
“In September, Clarke dyed hair platinum blond to match her Game of Thrones character's locks after years of remaining a brunette under the long, braided wigs she wears onscreen.”
“She and Momoa have reunited offscreen several times over the past few years.”
“In 2015, Clarke posted on Instagram a photo of the two laughing and cuddling.”


"It wasn't until he picked me up and dusted me off that I thought," who are you? "
"Then I guess the sun rises in the West and sets in the East, right?"
"This is what we call the epic deletion scene."
"When life is so beautiful that your sun and stars are in your city You open your eyes and get five smiles (and canaries), until now they only have one... (* grin - there are always more ginners), "the British actress wrote
"@ prideofgypsies you always more of dreams the actor, who recently married Lisa Bonet, the month of true love in his life, is in London with his partner to promote the film justice alliance."
"He made his debut as Aquarius man in the Washington superhero ensemble film, which is due to be released on November 17."
"Last month, HBO's eighth and final season began production and will continue until next summer."
In September, Clark dyed his hair platinum to match the hair of the characters in game of Thrones. For many years, she has been a brunette, wearing a long braided wig and wearing it on the screen
"She and Momo have reunited off screen several times in the past few years."
"In 2015, Clark posted photos of the two laughing and hugging on instagram."



**Something goes wrong**
“Kylie posed in her trendy look for an Instagram picture she shared in the early hours of Thursday morning Kicking off a new trend Kylie flashed her her legs and derriere in a skintight white dress which she knotted along the hemline she added a loose zippered hoodie Her older...”
“'20!'”
“Jenner was sent a sweet note from her pal HeatherKylie gave a closer look at the piece, which was seemingly modeled after her torso and derriere.”
“Time for a treat: Jenner also posted a mouth-watering snap of her decadent little cakesFlower power: Jenner was also lavished with numerous bouquets'Love you KY!'”
“The birthday girl shared the sculpture to her Snapchat in the early hours of Thursday.”
“Her family had the ice artwork made in the shape of Kylie's curves.”
“The birthday girl showed off her personalized giftAnd during her birthday party the night before Kylie got the surprise of a lifetime - in the form of an ice sculpture.”
“The whole family took part in a Happy Birthday singalongK for Kylie!”
“Her big day!”
“From the heaps of bouquets to the desserts sent her way, Kylie was one lucky girl.”


"Kelly opened a new trend by showing off her trendy look in an instagram photo she shared early Thursday morning. Kelly wore a tight white dress, tied a knot on the hem, and added a loose zipper Hoodie to her old model... "
“'20!'”
"Jenner received a sweet note from her friend. Heather Carey looked at the work carefully. It seemed to imitate her torso and delier."
"It's time for the treat: Jenna also posted a mouth watering photo to show the power of her decadent little red flower: Jenna also generously presented countless bouquets of flowers:" love you, faggot! "
"The birthday girl shared the sculpture with snapchat in the early hours of Thursday morning."
"Her ice sculpture is made of Kelly's curves."
"The birthday girl showed her personal talent at the birthday party, and Kelly got a lifetime surprise - in the form of ice sculpture."
"The whole family took part in the celebration of Kelly's birthday!"
"Her big day!"
"From bunches of flowers to desserts, Kelly is a lucky girl."



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Bob Odenkirk Looks Back on the Waiter Job Where He Couldn’t Stop Scaring CustomersFor full Emmys coverage, click here.”
“Plus, we’ll bring you exclusive access to the This Is Us season 2 premiere party – with all the scoop from your favorite cast.”
“Go to People.com and EW.com during the premiere episode on NBC, Tuesday, Sept. 26 at 9 p.m.”
“Don’t miss People and EW’s This Is Us LIVE viewing party!”
“Better than Mr. Drummond, better than the white folks that raised Webster.”Brown had so much to say that the music began playing during his speech and his microphone was eventually turned down, which was met with boos by the audience.”
““I want to thank my cast, Milo [Ventimiglia], Mandy [Moore], Justin [Hartley], Chrissy [Metz]: you are the best white TV family that a brother has ever had.”
“And 19 years ago Detective Frank Pembleton held this joint, as impeccably played by Andre Braugher,” he continued.”
“I may have lost some of y’all but you know, Google it.”
“Dick Whitman held this joint.”
““This joint right here, like Walter White held this joint here.”


"Note: Bob odenke reviews the work of the waiter. He constantly scares customers to win Emmy Awards. Please click here."
"In addition, we will give you an exclusive access to the premiere of this is us Season 2, as well as all the exclusive news of your favorite crew."
"Go to the people's network and EW on Tuesday, September 26, at 9 p.m., at the premiere of NBC
"Don't miss people and EW's this is our Live Watch party!"
"Better than Mr. Drummond, better than the white man who raised Webster." Brown had so much to say, the music began to play in his speech, his microphone was turned off and the audience booed
"I want to thank my actors, Milo [Ventimiglia], Mandy [Moore], Justin [Hartley], Chris [Metz]: you are the best white TV family a brother has."
"19 years ago, detective Frank pembleton hosted the show, and Andre Brauch played that role perfectly," he continued
"I may have lost some of you, but you know, Google it."
"Dick Whitman, take this joint."
"This joint is here, just like Walter white held this joint here."



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He added, “We might have skated on the line of dating.””
“In 2013, Groban addressed the rumors, telling Details magazine that he did “not really” date Katy.”
“It's very sweet.”Rumors started swirling about Katy and Josh in 2009.”
“I think we're both very taken at the moment, but it's very sweet.”
“I'm very flattered by it, but I was very surprised by it, too.”When Andy suggested that Josh call Katy, he said, “I'm not ghosting Katy!”
“Are you sure that's about me?'”
“I don't have a tattoo.”
“That was a double take and a spit of my coffee when I saw that.”Groban did note that he didn't relate to some of the lyrics, explaining, “I listened to the lyrics, and I'm just like, 'I never owned a Mustang.”
“But I was not expecting that.”
““She's the best.”


"We might have skated on a date," he added
In 2013, Groban responded to the rumors, telling details that he did not "really" date Katie
In 2009, rumors about Katie and Josh began to stir
"I think we're all infatuated now, but it's sweet."
When Andy suggested that Josh call Katie, he said, "I'm not acting like a ghost for Katie!"
"Are you sure it's because of me?"
"I don't have a tattoo."
"When I saw that song, I had a sip of coffee and two drinks." Groban noticed that he had nothing to do with some of the lyrics and explained, "when I heard the lyrics, I thought, 'I never had a Mustang.'
"But I didn't think of it."
"She's the best."



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As seen here, ultra violet does play well with others.”
“Time to look at the world with from a violet-hued POV.”
“This year, we basked in all kinds of greenery, and 2016 found us floating back and forth between the equally dreamy rose quartz and serenity.”
“This year, Pantone suggests a year filled with the rich and regal Ultra Violet.”
“According to Pantone, “Ultra Violet suggests the mysteries of the cosmos, the intrigue of what lies ahead, and the discoveries beyond where we are now.”
“The vast and limitless night sky is symbolic of what is possible and continues to inspire the desire to pursue a world beyond our own.” Purple/violet is known to be a spiritual, and religious color, that calms and aids in balancing one’s life and overcoming obstacles.”
“It is also the color of royalty, courage, and justice.”
“In a time where we need courage, leadership, and the ability to overcome obstacles, this color proves to be right on point.”
“Pantone also points out that the color “symbolizes experimentation and non-conformity, spurring individuals to imagine their unique mark on the world, and push boundaries through creative outlets.” This beautiful shade of purple is also a reminder of great musicians.”
“Selena, Prince, Jimi Hendrix, and David Bowie all used the color as part of their image.”


"As the picture shows, UV really gets along well with others."
"It's time to see the world from a violet perspective."
"This year, we bathed in all kinds of green, 2016 found us in the same dream between Rose Quartz and tranquility
"This year, Pantone hinted that the year was full of rich and imperial ultraviolet light."
"According to Pantone," ultraviolet light hints at the mysteries of the universe, future intrigues, and discoveries beyond our present. "
"The vast night sky symbolizes what is possible and continues to inspire people's desire to pursue a world beyond our own." Purple / violet is considered to be a spiritual and religious color. It can make people calm and help to balance life and overcome obstacles
"It's also the color of royalty, courage and justice."
"In an era when we need courage, leadership and the ability to overcome obstacles, this color has proved right."
Pantone also noted that the color "symbolizes experimentation and non-compliance, motivates individuals to imagine their unique mark in the world, and promotes boundaries through creative channels." This beautiful purple shadow is also reminiscent of great musicians
"Serena, Prince, Jimi Hendrix and David Bowie all use this color as part of their image."



**Something goes wrong**
““There is plenty of room for ‘Fearless Girl.’ It just interferes with another artist's work/vision.””
“State Street is also the creator of the Gender Diversity Index SHE, which tracks gender diversity in companies.”
“That’s when artist Alex Gardega installed a pug statue called “Sketchy Dog,” which appeared to be urinating on the “Fearless Girl” statue’s leg.”
“"Most people were amused or perplexed by it," Gardega told NBC News.”
“"Kids petted it, people were taking pictures with it.”
“A few were upset and kicked it."”
“Gardega said he created his clay and faux bronze “Sketchy Dog” as an act of solidarity with guerilla artist Arturo Di Modica, who created Wall Street’s iconic “Charging Bull” statue.”
““I have a lot of empathy for the creator of the bull, Arturo.”
“He is very upset,” Gardega said.”
“Artist Alex Gardega placed his "sketchy dog" statue next to "Fearless Girl."”


"There's plenty of space for the fearless girl. It only interferes with the work / vision of another artist. "
"State Street is also the creator of the gender diversity index she, which tracks the gender diversity of companies."
"At that time, the artist Alex gardega installed a pug statue called" sketch dog ", which seemed to pee on the legs of the statue of" fearless girl. "
"Most people are funny or confused about it," gardega told NBC news
"Children touch it, people take pictures with it."
"A few people were upset and kicked away."
He created his clay and man-made bronze "sketch dog" in support of guerrilla artist Arturo di Modica, who created Wall Street's iconic "assault bull," he said
"I feel for Arturo, the creator of the bull."
"He's depressed," gardgar said
Artist Alex gardgar puts his "sketch dog" statue next to "intrepid girl."



**Something goes wrong**
“In 2014, Farley announced in a since-deleted blog post that she had a miscarriage scare before announcing she was expecting Meilani Alexandra.”
“This is not the first time Farley has been candid about her pregnancies.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“RELATED VIDEO: Snooki & JWOWW Talk Dealing With Mom-ShamingFast forward to the present, Farley and Mathews are proud parents to 3-year-old daughter Meilani Alexandra and 23-month-old son Greyson Valor.”
“I was a f—— mess,” she remembered.”
““Then I started taking uppers with it, segway right into Italy.”
“Image zoom Credit: Phillip Faraone/FilmMagic“And they put me on medication because of it, I couldn’t handle life,” Farley explained, adding that she was taking medication, including “downers” such as Xanax, that made her “so groggy” at the time.”
“Not a lot of people know,” she confided in Sorrentino.”
“And me and Roger actually lost a baby, like I ended up pregnant.”


"In 2014, Farley announced in a deleted blog post that she was afraid of miscarriage before announcing that she was pregnant with Melanie Alexandra."
"It's not the first time Farley has said he's pregnant."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Related video: snooki & jwoww talks about how to deal with mother's humiliation fast forward to now, Farley and Mathews are proud parents of three-year-old daughter meilani Alexandra and 23-month-old son Greyson valor."
"I was a mess," she recalls
"Then I started to carry the vamp and Segway went straight into Italy."
"The credit for image zooming: Phillip faraone / filmmagic" they gave me medicine, so I couldn't cope with life, "Farley explained. She was taking drugs, including" tranquilizers "such as xanax, which made her" very sleepy. "
"Not many people know," she confided to Sorrentino
"Roger and I actually lost a child, as if I were pregnant."



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Well, the player who has a staggering net worth of $25 Million, is dating someone who looks rather good with him so safe to speak, they can go along for a while.”
“His last rumored girlfriend, Bella even attended his match whilst making his jersey number as her tattoo and his T-shirt.”
“According to many reports, the professional Basketball player is dating actress Chloe Bennet.”
“Though Chandler is famous for keeping his long-list of girlfriend's going so is he serious about his current relationship or is it the same old story?”
“Let's find out.”
“Chandler Parsons & Chloe-Officially DatingBeing famous, hot, and young is going pretty good for Chandler.”
“Up until now, he dated a lot of big stars from all fields.”
“And this time he is dating another beautiful actress.”
“Chandler and Chloe are dating now, Source: Aceshow BizHe is dating, Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D star Chloe.”
“Last week, the rumored couple was spotted on a romantic date night in an Italian restaurant in Los Angeles, California.”


"Well, a player with an amazing net worth of $25 million is dating someone who looks good. It's safe to say that they can get along for a while."
"His last gossip girlfriend Bella even took part in his game and made his jersey number as her tattoo and his T-shirt."
According to many reports, the professional basketball player is dating actress Chloe Bennett
"Although Chandler is famous for maintaining his long list of girlfriends, does he take his current relationship seriously or is it a cliche?"
"Let's see."
"Chandler Parsons and Chloe have a formal date. It's good for Chandler to be famous, sexy and young."
"So far, he's dating a lot of big stars from all walks of life."
"And this time he's dating another beautiful actress."
"Chandler and Chloe are dating, source: acehow bizhe is dating, s.h.i.e.l.d. star Chloe's agent."
Last week, the rumored couple had a romantic date at an Italian restaurant in Los Angeles, California



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Zoe is also expected to reprise her role as Neytiri in the Avatar sequel, which hits theaters in December 2018.”
“...and Inverness born Karen Gillan as Nebula a character from Marvel s Guardians Of The Galaxy comics and movies...”
“The 38 year old actress is to don green body paint once again to play the Guardians Of The Galaxy character in The Marvel Cinematic Universe movie alongside Robert Downey Jr as Iron Man Chris Hemsworth as Thor Chris Evans as Captain America and the rest of the superhero squad...”
“...again to battle supervillain Thanos in the blockbuster...”
“And while Saldana is thrilled to be returning to the franchise, she is not looking forward to spending hours getting her green paint done.”
“Scroll down for videoAvengers fun: Zoe Saldana is set to play her Guardians Of The Galaxy character Gamora in the upcoming film Avengers: Infinity War.”
“Here is the actress at the Golden Globes last SundayShe told MTV news: 'I don't know when they're going to let me read it.'”
“'I'm not looking forward to the five hours of green make-up, but every film I finally arrive on set, I feel so happy and lucky to be there.'”
“Meanwhile, according to the Daily Record newspaper, locations in Edinburgh, Glasgow and the Highlands are set to be used for filming which is expected to start in February.”
“Gone green: Here is a shot of the star as Gamora in Guardians Of The GalaxyThe decision to make Avengers: Infinity War - which has a budget of £400 million - is expected to boost the Scottish economy by £10 million.”


"Avatar" sequel will be released in December 2018, Zoe is expected to play Neytiri in the sequel
“…… Inverness born Karen gilland is the nebula character in Marvel's Galaxy comics and movie guardian... "
"The 38 year old actress will be painted in green again, playing iron man with Robert Downey Jr. and Thor Chris with Chris Hemsworth Evans) plays Captain America, along with other members of the superhero team, the guardian of the galaxy in the marvel movie universe... "
“… Fight against the super villain tanos in the blockbuster again... "
"Although Saldana is happy to be back in the team, she doesn't expect to spend hours finishing her green paint
"Scroll down video Avenger fun: Zoe Saldana will play her guardian galactic character gamorra in the upcoming movie Avenger: Infinite War."
"This is the actress who won last Sunday's Golden Globe Award, and she told MTV News:" I don't know when they will let me see it. "
"I don't expect five hours of green make-up, but every movie I finally get to the set, I feel so happy and lucky to be there."
Meanwhile, shooting sites in Edinburgh, Glasgow and highland will be used for filming, which is expected to begin in February, the daily record reported
"Popular: This is a picture of a star playing gamorra in the guardian of galaxy. The decision of Avengers: Infinite War - with a budget of 400 million pounds - is expected to boost Scotland's economic growth by 10 million pounds."



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We, along with the cast, writers and crew, are extremely appreciative of the show’s success and aim to deliver a final season, and series finale, that will bring The Big Bang Theory to an epic creative close,” WBTV, CBS and Chuck Lorre Productions said in the joint statement.”
“I hear Parsons informed Lorre about his decision to leave after the end of the season on Friday, when I hear renewal talks with CBS were still ongoing.”
“Many people on the show felt it might have been a meeting to discuss a possible 13th season, as CBS had started talks with producer Warner Bros TV about anther two-season pickup, though the actors had not yet been approached by the studio for new deals.”
“Instead, I hear Lorre gave the floor to star Jim Parsons, who made a tearful announcement that he would not be continuing on the series beyond the upcoming 12th season.”
“With the entire room still reeling from the shock, I hear Lorre revealed that the series too would end with Season 12.”
“Yesterday was a very emotional day in the offices of The Big Bang Theory, with cast and crew hanging out and hugging each other.”
““It’s family over there,” one insider said about the team that had been together for many, many years.”
“That’s why Lorre made the decision not to continue with the show unless all key auspices were coming back.”
“Parsons is one of the series’ “big three,” along with Johnny Galecki and Kaley Cuoco.”
“Lorre had publicly said he would not do the series without any of the original three leads.”


Wbtv, CBS and chuck Lorre productions said in a joint statement: "we, as well as the actors, writers and crew, appreciate the success of the show. Our goal is to launch the final season and episode, which will push the big bang theory to an epic climax."
"I heard Parsons told Lowe on Friday about his decision to leave at the end of the season, when I heard that the renewal negotiations with CBS were still in progress
"A lot of people think this could be a meeting to discuss a possible 13th season, because CBS has already started talking to producer Warner Bros. about picking up another two seasons, although the studio has not contacted the actors to get a new deal."
"On the contrary, I heard that Lowe gave up his voice to star Jim Parsons, who announced with tears that he would not continue to coach the series after his 12th season
"The whole room is shaking in shock, and I heard that rolle revealed that the series will also end in season 12."
"Yesterday was a very emotional day in the office of big bang theory. The actors and crew were together and hugged each other."
"It's the family over there," an insider said of the team that has been together for many years
"That's why rolle decided not to continue the show unless all the main hosts are back."
Parsons is one of the "big three" in the series, along with Johnny gelecki and Kelly cuckoo
"Lol has publicly said that he would not have made the series without any of the first three clues."



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite Raphael's objections, Leonardo persuades his brothers to accept Karai's offer and all four Turtles successfully work with Karai to eliminate the Elite Guard.”
“She presents the Turtles with an offer of a truce between the Foot and the Turtles if they help her kill Shredder's Elite Guards, which are a major obstacle to her reorganizing the Foot.”
“During this time, Leonardo recovers from his physical wounds.”
“In the end, the building catches fire and the police arrive, but they secretly escape to Northampton.”
“The remaining Turtles and Splinter are forced to continue the fight, but even with the aid of Casey Jones, the odds are against them.”
“Beaten to near unconsciousness, he is thrown through April O'Neil's apartment window.”
“He puts up an admirable fight against an army of Foot Ninja, but is eventually overwhelmed.”
“In Leonardo #1, Leonardo goes out for a run on the rooftops of New York City and is ambushed by the Foot Clan.”
“He is often at odds with his more hot-headed younger brother Raphael.”
“He is the one to usually take charge of the turtles when Master Splinter is not present.”


"Despite Rafael's opposition, Leonardo convinced his brothers to accept Calais's proposal. All four turtles successfully cooperated with Calais to eliminate the elite guards."
"She suggested to the turtles that if the turtles helped her kill the elite guards of the shredder, they would stop fighting between the feet and the turtles, which was the main obstacle to her reorganization of the feet."
"During this time, Leonardo recovered from the physical trauma."
"In the end, the building caught fire and the police arrived, but they snuck to Northampton."
"The rest of the turtles and sprint are forced to continue fighting, but even with Casey Jones' help, the odds are slim."
"He was beaten almost unconscious and thrown into the window of April O'Neill's apartment."
"He had an admirable fight with a large army of walking ninjas, but he was still overwhelmed in the end."
In Leonardo 1, Leonardo runs on the roof of New York City and is ambushed by the foot clan
"He often disagrees with his hotter brother Rafael."
"In master sprint's absence, he's usually in charge of turtles."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, Forbes has also claimed that Prince Harry received between £35,704 and £37,840 while working as a helicopter pilot for the Army Air Corps.”
“While serving as an officer in the Army Air Corps, he was reportedly granted a salary of around £32,134 per year, as stated by Fortune.”
“Last month, thousands of people signed a petition demanding that the royal family fund the wedding themselves and not take any money from the British taxpayer.”
“With that in mind, the net worth of the royal family and Prince Harry have becoming interesting topics of conversation.”
“Here’s everything you need to know about Prince Harry’s age, royal status and net worth as he prepares to welcome Ms Markle into the fold.”
“What’s his royal status and occupation?”
“Prince Harry, who was born Henry Charles Albert David on September 15 1984, is formally known as Prince Henry of Wales.”
“He’s currently 33 years old.”
“He’s sixth in line to the throne behind his father the Prince of Wales, his older brother the Duke of Cambridge, his nephew Prince George, his niece Princess Charlotte and the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge’s third child, who is expected to arrive later this month.”
“Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the News newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick...”


"However, Forbes also claimed that Prince Harry was paid between 35704 and 37840 when he was a helicopter pilot in the army aviation force."
"It is reported that during his time as an officer in the army aviation, he received an annual salary of about 32134, as described in Fortune magazine."
"Last month, thousands of people signed a petition asking the royal family to pay for the wedding itself and not to take money from British taxpayers."
"With that in mind, the net worth of the royal family and Prince Harry has become an interesting topic to talk about."
"As Prince Harry prepares to welcome Ms. markel to the White House, here's all the information about his age, royal status and net worth."
"What is his royal status and occupation?"
Prince Harry was born on September 15, 1984 in Henry Charles Albert David, officially known as Prince Henry of Wales
"He's 33 now."
He is the sixth heir to the British throne, second only to his father, the prince of Wales, his brother, the Duke of Cambridge, his nephew, Prince George, his niece, Princess Charlotte, and the third child of the couple. The Duchess of Cambridge will have their third child later this month
"Please enter your e-mail address please enter a valid e-mail address please enter a valid e-mail address to register thank you for registering the newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by e-mail please check..."



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But he shared another entry from November 2016, revealing he was the happiest he'd ever been after 'taking control' of his life by seeking help and speaking out.”
“The 'Arrow' actor previously revealed he had struggled with mental health issues before coming out as gay in 2016.”
“The 29-year-old actor and the 46-year-old celebrity florist wed in a lavish Palm Springs ceremony officiated by Kardashian matriarch Kris Jenner in October.”
“Sofia Vergara and husband Joe Manganiello, Jesse Tyler Ferguson, Lisa Rinna, Chelsea Clinton, Dylan O'Brien, Melanie Griffith, Emily Rickards, Cheyenne Jackson, Billie Lourd and Leslie Grossman were among the guest list.”
“Insiders claim the marriage is now over, however it is unclear what caused the split, TMZ reports.”
“Split Colton Haynes marriage to Jeff Leatham is over just six months after they wed in a star studded Palm Springs ceremony Matriarch Kris Jenner officiated the glitzy wedding It follows are heartbreaking few months for Hayes his mother Dana died in March after being diagnosed with cirrhosis of the...”
“...liver and kidney failure...”
“Hayes recently unfollowed Jeff on Instagram, and appears to have removed photos of Jeff from his social media page.”
“He has also just released a song called Man It Sucks.”
“Leatham proposed during a romantic getaway to the Las Ventanas al Paraiso resort in Cabo, Mexico in March 2017.”


"But he shared another record in November 2016, revealing that he was the happiest ever to" take control "of his life by asking for help and speaking out."
"The 'arrow' actor previously revealed that he had been fighting mental health problems before he made his debut as a homosexual in 2016."
"The 29 year old actor and 46 year old celebrity Florist had a big palm spring wedding in October, hosted by Kardashian's matriarch, Chris Jenner."
"Sophia figara and her husband Joe manganiello, Jesse Taylor Ferguson, Lisa Lina, Chelsea Clinton, Dylan O'Brien, Melanie Griffith, Emily Ricardo, Cheyenne Jackson, Billy Lloyd and Leslie Grossman are all on the guest list."
According to TMZ, people familiar with the matter said the marriage had ended, but it was not clear what caused it to break down
"Colton Haines and Jeff Latham's marriage broke down, and just six months after their star studded wedding in Palm Springs, patriarch Chris Jenner officiated at the magnificent wedding. The next few months were heartbreaking for Hayes. His mother Dana died in March after she was diagnosed with liver cirrhosis. "
“… Liver and kidney failure... "
"Hayes recently removed Jeff's attention from instagram and seems to have removed his photo from his social media page."
"He's just released a song called love when you see it."
"In March 2017, lissam proposed during a romantic vacation at La sventana spaleso resort in Cabo, Mexico."



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Emmy winning Louis-Dreyfus also thanked Katy Perry by quoting her 2013 hit song Roar, as well as her Veep co-stars Tony Hale and Timothy Simons for being "hilarious and loving inspiration" during her treatment.”
“The Fighter dancing through the fire cuz I am a champion and you're going to hear me ROAR," she wrote alongside a snap of herself sporting a drawn-on moustache.”
“'I've got the eye of the tiger.”
“We are NOT f--ing around here.”
“Credit:AP"Chemo #2: finito.”
“Julia Louis-Dreyfus arrives at the 69th Primetime Emmy Awards last month.”
“The star of the satirical series Veep, took to Instagram to share a picture to signify the completion of her second round of chemotherapy this month.”
“After revealing her breast cancer diagnosis last month, Seinfeld actor Julia Louis-Dreyfus said she is "not f---ing around" when it comes to treatment.”


"Emmy winner Louis Dreyfus also cited Katie Perry's 2013 hit" roar "and her co stars with veep, Tony hale and Timothy Simmons, for their" funny and loving inspiration "during treatment
"Fighters dance in the fire, because I'm the champion, and you'll hear me roar," she wrote, taking pictures of herself with a beard
"I have tiger eyes."
"We're not hanging out here."
"Credits: AP" chemotherapy 2: finitol. "
"Julia Louis Dreyfus attended the 69th Emmy prime time awards ceremony last month."
"The star of the satirical series veep shared a picture on instagram that she completed her second round of chemotherapy this month."
Julia Louis Dreyfus, the leading actor of Seinfeld, revealed her breast cancer diagnosis last month and said that she "didn't hang out" in terms of treatment



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News in an interview last month that he performed oral sex on Olympios during filming, and that she was the “aggressor.” He said he was not mad at her, but that he was “mad at the situation.”“Paradise” Season 4 is set to premiere on ABC later this summer.”
“Jackson told E!”
“Jackson also said he will not return as a Season 4 contestant.”
“Also Read: 'The Bachelorette' Raises Ugly Stereotypes About 'Aggressive' Black MenShe pointed out that producers offered her a chance to return to the action, but she declined.”
“...studio announced on June 20 that the results of its investigation did not support any charge of misconduct by a cast member Olympios said in a statement released on June 29 that her team had concluded its investigation into the allegations that led to the shutdown...”
“Also Read How Reality TV Producers Prevent a Bachelor in Paradise Type Mess Jackson and Olympios were both involved in an incident that led Warner Bros to announce on June 11 that it was shutting down production due to allegations of misconduct The ABC dating series resumed production after the...”
“Her former “Paradise” co-star DeMario Jackson recently said he is also attending the reunion.”
““I am very happy to be appearing on the ‘Bachelor in Paradise’ special,” Olympios said in a statement released to TheWrap on Wednesday.”
“Corinne Olympios is returning to “Bachelor in Paradise” for its upcoming cast reunion following the show temporarily shutting down production on Season 4.”


"In an interview last month, it was reported that he had oral sex in Olympus during filming, and she was the" aggressor. ". He said he was not angry with her, but "very angry with the situation.". "Paradise season four will premiere on ABC later this summer."
"Jackson, tell me!"
"Jackson also said he would not come back as a fourth season contestant."
"Bachelor" has created a stereotype of "aggressive" black men. She pointed out that the producer had given her a chance to return to the stage, but she refused
“…… The studio announced on June 20 that its findings do not support any charges of misconduct against the actors. Olympus said in a statement released on June 29 that her team has ended the investigation into the charges that led to the suspension of the show.... "
"While reading how reality TV producers prevent the paradise bachelor style chaos, Jackson and Olympus were involved in an incident that led Warner Bros. to announce on June 11 that it would close production of the ABC dating series and resume production due to misconduct charges..."
Her former "paradise" co star, demario Jackson, recently said he would also attend the reunion
"I'm very happy to be on the singles in heaven special," Olympus said in a statement to the wrap on Wednesday
Corinne olympios will return to "Bacher in paradise" for an upcoming cast reunion after the show was suspended for the fourth season



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I picked a funny profession for someone who doesn't like all the attention focused on them.'”
“: 'It's not going to be some lavish affair, it's maybe something that isn't going to require as much planning or at least that's what I'm telling myself.”
“The This Is Us star, 34, and the musician, 33, tied the knot at sunset in front of just 50 guests, including Mandy's co-stars Milo Ventimiglia and Chrissy Metz, three years after meeting on Instagram.”
“The actress is said to have arranged 'very boho' nuptials with 'rugs on the floor surrounding the altar' and a selection of 'beautiful' floral arrangements.”
“Wedding bells: Mandy Moore wowed in a stunning pink wedding gown as she tied the knot to fiancé Taylor Goldsmith in a romantic ceremony at her home on Sunday eveningAn insider told E!”
“...of their special day: 'It was an intimate backyard wedding at Mandy's home that started just after sundown on Sunday evening.”
“'There was a small group of family and friends that looked to be about 50 people.'”
“After the couple exchanged their 'I dos', they continued the celebrations at The Fig House, which is a private event space in the Highland Park neighborhood of Los Angeles.”
“Minka Kelly, Sterling K. Brown and even Mandy's former flame Wilmer Valderrama were also among the famous faces who turned out for the couple's big day.”
“Another insider told E!”


"I chose an interesting career for someone who didn't like all the attention being focused on them."
":" it won't be a luxury. It may be something that doesn't need so much planning, or at least that's what I told myself. "
"Three years after meeting the 33 year old musician on instagram, the 34 year old" this is America "star married 50 guests at sunset, including Mandy's partners, Milo Ventimiglia and Chris Metz."
"The actress is said to have arranged a 'very Bohemian' wedding, a 'carpet on the floor around the altar' and a series of 'beautiful' flower arrangements."
Wedding Bell: on Sunday night, Mandy Moore held a romantic wedding at home. She wore an amazing pink wedding dress and married her fiancee Taylor goldsmith! "
“… About their special day: 'it's a close backyard wedding, at Mandy's home, starting after sunset on Sunday evening.'
"There is a small group of friends and relatives. It looks like there are about 50 people."
"After the couple exchanged their" I do, "they continued to celebrate at the fig house, a private venue near Los Angeles Highland Park."
"Minka Kelly, sterling K. brown, and even Mandy's ex lover Wilmer waldrama are all famous faces on the couple's big day."
"Another insider told reporters!"



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was met with blank stares and had the sense that I wasn’t telling that person anything they didn’t already know.””
““I was on the ‘True Lies’ set for three weeks and reported Joel Kramer’s inappropriate sexual behavior towards 12-year-old Eliza to a person in authority.”
“Kramer has denied the allegations.”
“Her account, posted early Saturday morning, comes in the wake of the continuing #metoo movement and the launch of the Time’s Up campaign to combat sexual harassment and assault.”
“In a Facebook post Dushku wrote that she was assaulted while working with Kramer on the 1994 James Cameron film True Lies According to her post Kramer molested her in a Miami hotel room where he laid me down on the bed wrapped me with his gigantic writhing body and...”
“...rubbed all over me Kramer would have been 36 at the time...”
“Dushku alleges that he “methodically built my and my parents’ trust, for months grooming me,” and told her parent that he would take her for a swim in the hotel’s pool.”
“Instead her took her to his hotel room where he disappeared in the bathroom and emerged naked bearing nothing but a small hand towel held flimsy at his mid section Kramer told Variety Saturday morning that Dushku s allegations were absolutely not true According to Kramer Dushku swam in the...”
“...hotel pool with him and other members of the stunt crew including Dushku s stunt double...”
“Afterwards, he took her to her first ever sushi meal, and then took her home.”


"I was staring blankly and felt that I didn't tell that person anything they didn't know yet."
"I spent three weeks on true lies, reporting to an authority on Joel Kramer's sexual misconduct against 12-year-old Eliza."
"Kramer denied the charges."
"Her account was released early Saturday morning, following the continuation of the Mayo campaign and the time campaign against sexual harassment and abuse."
"On Facebook, Dushku wrote that she was attacked when she was working with Kramer in James Cameron's 1994 movie true lies. According to her post, Kramer molested her in a hotel room in Miami, put me on the bed, wrapped me in his giant wiggle, and then..."
“… All over me was Kramer, who was 36 years old at the time. "
Dushku claimed that he had "methodically built up the trust between me and my parents and had been grooming me for months" and told her parents that he would take her to the hotel swimming pool
"Instead, she took her to his hotel room. He disappeared in the bathroom and appeared naked, standing in the middle of him with only a small handkerchief. Kramer told variety on Saturday morning that Dushku's accusations were absolutely untrue, and Kramer said Dushku was..."
“… The hotel's swimming pool works with him and other stunts, including Dushku's stunt duo
Later, he took her to her first sushi meal and then took her home



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2602739726027397
Correct number is  57
Total number is  219
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
